Part 1. Chapter 1 to Chapter 31.

“What are you thinking, not taking what you wanted when it’s right in front of you?”

Livia, trembling beneath her rich red hair, glared at Triton with fierce determination, clutching her chest with shaking hands. Despite everything she had endured, the potent influence of Dionysus’s wine left her body overly sensitive. A lingering desire slithered up her spine like a snake, ignited by her tingling nipples.

What she wanted…

Suddenly, she remembered why she had dared to confront the sea god so boldly. In a rush, Livia reached out and grabbed his neck, demanding urgently,

“Hand it over, Triton. Your weakness.”

“You should be grateful for my mercy, Livia.”

Just because you have a pretty mouth doesn’t mean you can say whatever you want.

Triton chuckled at her incredulous expression, gently removing her hand from his neck and placing it over his heart—the very spot Livia always aimed for but had never managed to pierce.

“Look closely, Livia. Don’t look anywhere else.”

With those words, Triton guided her hand downward. As fear crept over her face, Livia felt something firm yet soft within her palm. It was his manhood.

“Ah…!”

Startled, she tried to pull away, but his large hand held hers firmly in place. He moved her hand slowly, keeping it pressed against him.

“What are you doing…!”

“I told you to look straight at it,” he commanded in a voice that growled like a beast. Simultaneously, Triton moved Livia’s hand up and down along the cock. It thickened and twitched under her touch, barely fitting within her grasp.

A low moan escaped Triton’s lips. The sight was so lewd and enticing that Livia struggled to resist staring at his face. Just then, she noticed something strange happening where Triton had told her to focus.

Why was it doing that…?

Beneath his skin, it was red. Not just flushed from heat, but his heart seemed to glow and burn beneath a thin membrane. It was an unusual sight, and she was certain it had something to do with the weakness he had mentioned. At that moment, Livia brought her free hand to the glowing spot.

As soon as her fingers touched it, Triton whispered with a groan,

“…A merman’s pleasure is also his weakness. When the heart heats up.”

Just as he said, it was hot. Really hot.

Though his body was cold like a cold-blooded creature, this spot was uniquely warm. As her trembling fingers caressed his heart, Triton exhaled roughly, like a beast growling.

“When it turns bright red and looks ready to burst… that’s when you strike, Livia.”

Though she had asked for his weakness, she hadn’t imagined it would be like this. Watching him with disbelief, Livia pressed her fingers gently against the glowing heart. He laughed, gripping her hand and whispered,

“Not that you could burst it with just a finger.”



“And this level of pleasure isn’t enough.”

Triton tightened his grip on Livia’s hand, intensifying the motion up and down the smooth pillar. As his arousal grew, so did the vividness of the red glow over his heart.

“So, Livia,” he whispered, drawing her gaze from his reddening heart back to him.

“To break my heart, you’ll have to drown me in pleasure…”

She felt it pulsing and swelling in her palm. He leaned in, whispering softly in her ear,

“…Can you do it?”

His voice was so sweet that it sent shivers up her arms. How could he make such an irresistible offer in such a honeyed tone?

How could she refuse?

Livia, who had been glaring at him, smiled with tear-filled eyes. Her first smile towards Triton was fierce.

“With a god personally revealing his weakness and even presenting his arousal to this humble, lowly human, why wouldn’t I take on the challenge?”

Livia roughly tore off her soaked clothes.

Whether he killed her or she harmed him, one of them had to be destroyed for this ordeal to end.

Hadn’t she vowed to endure any trial for revenge against those who had killed her family? Livia had not forgotten that vow.

Watching her with narrowed eyes, he suddenly let out a light laugh. It was a smile that resembled the calm before a storm.

“Indeed, you are brave.”

“…You flatter me.”

“Then I’ll gladly swallow you whole.”

As Triton moved, the once calm spring water engulfed their entwined bodies like a tidal wave. Livia closed her eyes tightly and willingly spread her legs towards the raging waves.



A woman with the face of an old man and the tail of a snake approached Tyche, the goddess of fortune and misfortune, pleading.

“Oh beloved and revered goddess of fate, please show mercy to this foolish friend.”

In the darkness, the goddess stirred and looked up with sleepy eyes at the witch, momentarily too surprised to close her mouth.

“Oh… my old friend, what happened while I was asleep?”

At the goddess’s lament, the old witch approached her feet, curling up and sobbing.

“If you pity me, please lend me your wise eyes.”

“…What curiosity brings you to me?”

There were many goddesses who could foresee fate, but the most celebrated were the three sisters of the Moirai.

Most humans, when seeking to know their destiny, would turn to the Moirai or think of their brother Moros.

It was foolish. If they understood how much their fate and future could change in the realm of fortune, they wouldn’t do so…

The black witch worshipped Tyche, the goddess of fortune and misfortune. She was always warm and kind to Tyche, praising her, believing that one day everyone would recognize Tyche’s abilities as the greatest.

Thus, the goddess was merciful and generous to the witch Echidna. Even if everyone whispered that she was ominous, Tyche silently cherished Echidna.

“Even the smallest clue would be enough; please reveal the fate of the god who shares my Blood.”

“O foolish ghost of the sea, even a god cannot dare to predict the fate assigned to another god.”

“Anything will do! Even the tiniest thread, please, I beg you…!”

Watching her old friend and supporter huddled at her feet, pleading repeatedly, the goddess felt a pang in her heart. After a sigh and some thought, she whispered in a small voice, avoiding the ears of other gods.

“…Then, for the sake of our long friendship, I will tell you.”

“I am all ears, listening intently.”

The goddess’s blue breath scattered into the air, and finally, a thread of fate flowed from her lips.

A red-haired human would split the heart of the sea in two.

Red hair.

Red hair.

Red hair…

The blind black witch immediately set out to find the red-haired human.

The human who would divide the heart of the sea.

This was the witch’s long-held desire.

For the downfall of the sibling she so fervently wished for.

And finally…

“Oh goddess of vengeance, I offer this woman’s life as a sacrifice; please allow this poor shepherd to avenge her enemy!”

After wandering for a long time, the red-haired woman, crying desperately, fell into her hands.

It was the smell of massacre.

A faint, acrid scent of death wafted up from below Ludike Hill.

“…Dad, Iason, Lete!”

Seeing the red smoke rising over the hill, Livia Horn dropped her flock of sheep and rushed frantically toward the cabin.

Woof! Woof woof!

Mumu, Livia’s old friend and shepherd dog, hurriedly rounded up the stray sheep in her absence.

“She’s here! Grab her!”

As she reached the top of the hill, villagers holding torches seized Livia, apparently waiting for her.

Rough hands grabbed her vibrant red hair and bound her. Yet even such violent and malicious hands could not deter Livia.

“Move, move! Father, Iason! Lete! No, no!!!”

She screamed, reaching desperately toward the burning cabin, wild with desperation.

“You witch! You’ll soon follow them, you filthy, vile witch!”

“Aah!”

A man shouted harshly and yanked Livia’s hair back. A stifled groan escaped her throat as her head was pulled backward.

“Let, let go, I said…, aah!”

“What are you yelling about when you’ve clearly done something wrong?”

“Witch!”

“Kill her! She must be killed!”

“Let go, let go! Father! Lete! Lete!!!”

Livia’s screams and the villagers’ curses blended into a chaotic uproar.

Amidst the loud and vile noise, only the burning cabin remained silent. The heavy silence was truly eerie.

The life of a shepherd was always accompanied by silence, and Livia cherished that kind of quiet.

She enjoyed the sound of grass swaying, the stillness flowing with the stars, and the gentle interplay of wind, trees, and earth, which could only be felt in solitude.

But not now. The silence surrounding the burning cabin felt horrifying.

“Let go, let go…! Let go! Why are you doing this! Why!!!”

I have to go….

I have to save my father, brother, and sister from that burning cabin. Why were these people stopping me?

Why? Why…!

“Don’t you know why? You wretched woman!”

“They say you consorted with Satan, you filthy, vile thing!”

Overwhelming shock and grief trampled her mind. She wanted to deny this horrific reality.

Could it be that she was having a terrible dream? Maybe she was near Lake Arangeti, grazing the sheep, and had dozed off.

Mumu, who had been watching the sheep, was napping beside her, and soon Iason would come to fetch her, tickling her nose with a grass stalk to wake her.

When she returned home, Dad would tell her he had caught plenty of fish and would make delicious grilled fish, while Lete would serve cheese made from sheep’s milk.

“Sis, the sheep’s milk soup is especially savory today!”

“Come on in, Livia. I hurt my leg, so our Livia is having a hard time. I’ll go out next week.”

“No, Dad. Our sheep are gentle, so it’s manageable.”

“Livia, could it be that your sheep behave because your personality is so fierce?”

“What did you say? Iason!”

They would prepare for tomorrow while having a dinner that was not abundant but not lacking either.

Yes, if only she could wake up from this terrible nightmare….

“Now, Gary! Throw that wretched thing in there! Put her in the burning house!”

The sharp voice jolted her dazed mind back to reality. It was a voice she recognized well. With a chill running down her spine, Livia turned her head.

Dull gray hair, freckles spread across her face, a round and plump figure….

It was Maya, the mother of her former fiancé, Phedum.

As their gazes locked, Maya’s face contorted into a cruel sneer as she stepped closer. Upon closer inspection, her son Phedum was already hiding behind her, peeking at Livia fearfully.

“Gary! Don’t waste time! It’s her, it’s her! She’s the one who consorted with Satan and caused all this!”

Consorted with Satan? Who? Her?

“What nonsense…!”

“All the village sheep have died from some strange disease. All except the ones you were raising. Phedum claims you bewitched Satan to make it happen, Killing all the other sheep and saving only yours!”

In that moment, Livia’s eyes filled with murderous intent. The entire situation became clear in her mind.

“What? You’re blaming me? Are you saying this is my fault, Phedum Grocke?”

Livia’s eyes blazed with anger, her heart boiling with rage.

As she glared at Phedum, who was clearly spouting nonsense, his mother Maya hurriedly hid him behind her and stepped forward, shouting.

“Shut up! How dare you falsely accuse Phedum!”

Maya rushed over and instantly grabbed Livia’s hair. Her heavy, rough hands clawed at Livia’s neck and cheeks, beating her mercilessly.

“You wretched woman! How dare you consort with Satan? Spit! You filthy witch, go to hell with your family! What are you waiting for? Purify her now!”

“Yes, yes! We must purify her! For the sake of the village!”

Caught up in excitement, the villagers followed Maya’s lead and began to attack Livia.

Someone kicked her in the waist, while another tore at her clothes, grabbing her breasts.

Tossed about, Livia fell to the ground, her once fair cheeks pressed into the dirt.

Hands that seemed unsure whether they were striking her or satisfying their own desires turned Livia into rags, but she had no time to care.

The acrid smoke and the awful smell of ash stung Livia’s eyes and nose. Through the Blood and tears that blurred her vision, she saw the cabin turning to blackened ash.

Ah, what was this smell? Was it the scent of the cozy cabin burning, or the smell of her family’s skin burning?

Did these people, with their wicked faces turned against the gray smoke and red flames, not realize they were more satanic than the Satan they speak of?

With Blood running down her face and tears of Blood in her eyes, Livia pleaded to the gods.

Oh, Pan, god of shepherds. Hera, goddess of the hearth…!

Punish these wicked and evil ones! Do not forgive those who violated the innocent sheep and burned down a blameless family!

But she knew that the great gods of Olympus would not heed the wishes of a mere shepherd. She could only face an unjust death….

Yet, the only thing the fading Livia could do was pray and plead for some absolute, miraculous power.

Even if it meant opening herself to the Satan they spoke of…!

Woof woof!!

The growl of an angry dog echoed just as Blood began to flow from Livia’s split forehead. Mumu, who had left the sheep, charged fiercely at the villagers attacking Livia.

“Aah!”

“What, what is this!”

Grr! Growl!

The dog, once thought to be gentle, bared its teeth savagely, Blood staining its mouth.

It seemed ready to tear apart anyone who dared to touch Livia.

“Damn it! This dog…!”

The people who had been greedily assaulting Livia stumbled back, bitten by the beast.

Woof, woof woof! Growl! Woof woof!

The dog pushed Livia back with its body, baring its teeth even more fiercely.

“Mumu….”

While the dazed Livia staggered to her feet, Maya, holding the badly bitten Phedum, screamed.

“Look, look at that! She’s bewitched the dog too! See, she turns both humans and dogs into that!”

Maya’s shrill voice and the thick smell of Blood heightened the villagers’ excitement.

“…Maya’s right. We can’t let her die easily.”


Gary, who was clutching his arm where Mumu had bitten him, swung a torch, his eyes filled with a murderous glare.

Woof! Woof woof!

The dog glanced back at Livia, barking urgently. Somehow, Livia understood what Mumu was trying to convey. She just knew.

‘Run.’

Woof!

‘Hurry!’

Livia squeezed her eyes shut and suddenly stood up.

“Catch her!”

Gary and the villagers, brandishing their torches, chased after the fleeing Livia. The dog, which had been barking fiercely, was mercilessly kicked aside by the crowd and struck with flaming sticks.

Hearing the cries of her last remaining family member, her lifelong companion, Livia sprinted up the hill. A fierce cry that felt as though it would shatter her heart tore from her lungs.

Branches and the wind whipped harshly against her bare skin, but Livia did not stop. Pausing now would mean death.

She wasn’t afraid of dying itself; she simply could not bear the thought of dying at their hands. She would survive at all costs and avenge her father and brothers, who had been falsely accused and brutally burned to death by them!

She would gladly become the most devoted follower of Nemesis, the goddess of retribution, and drive a torch into their hearts with her own hands. If only she could survive…

If that were possible.

“Huff, sob, huff huff!”

Livia crawled up the hill, sobbing and gasping for breath. Below the cliff, fierce waves crashed, and the flickering torches of her pursuers danced beneath her.

Her eyes, once filled with resolve for revenge, trembled with despair. Anger surged at her own helplessness.

She clawed at the dirt, tearing at her chest, and desperately prayed.

“O goddess of vengeance, I offer this girl’s life as a sacrifice; please, let this poor shepherdess have her revenge!”

Rumble—

In response to her plea, dark clouds churned violently in the sky, and the torches that had climbed the hill broke through the bushes, rushing toward Livia.

“Catch her!”

Sobbing, Livia did not hesitate and threw herself into the raging sea.



Her frail body was endlessly pulled into the dark, churning waters. Icy seawater surged into every pore. Her lungs filled with water, and her breath faded away.

Ah, so this is how she dies.

Unable to close her eyes in her despair, she heard someone speak to her as her consciousness darkened.

“Do you wish to live?”

Was it the voice of a reaper guiding her to the underworld, or perhaps the voice of the goddess she had so desperately called upon?

“Do you wish to live and take revenge on them?”

Livia weakly opened her eyes to see a black ray gliding around her.

“Answer, human.”

She had heard that sometimes gods approached humans in the form of animals. But… could ‘this’ truly be a god?

Livia stared dazedly at the black ray, trying to meet its gaze.

The voice echoing in her mind was raspy and grating, reminiscent of an old man, lacking any divine quality. Yet, Livia could clearly sense that this strange presence could save her and fulfill her desires.

“I am one who can rescue you from death in this sea and grant your wishes.”

As the black ray circled around her, bubbles rose, and a whirlpool formed. The swirling water soon enveloped Livia, and thousands of air bubbles clung to her, breathing life back into her.

Livia, who hadn’t even realized she was suffocating, squinted at the black ray. What did it matter whether it was a god or not? Even if that dark entity had emerged from hell, Livia didn’t care.

“I’ll ask again. Do you want to live? Do you want to live and take revenge on those who wronged your family?”

‘…Yes. I want to live. I want to live and take my revenge on them!’

“That’s simple. I’ll make it happen. Let’s form a contract.”

The ray responded smoothly, but Livia hesitated. Her instincts screamed that this would be a very dangerous contract. Above all, she was suspicious of the ray’s identity, which had appeared the moment she jumped into the sea.

‘Who are you, and what do you want from me?’

The ray laughed at Livia’s distrustful question.

“A foolish yet wise human. I am like you. I seek revenge. But since I cannot do it myself, I have been searching for someone to act on my behalf.”

‘So, you’re proposing a trade of revenge with me?’

“Exactly. It’s a very simple contract.”

The soothing voice sounded friendly and kind, but was it truly so? It was an incredibly tempting offer, yet Livia couldn’t respond immediately. Noticing her hesitation, the ray circled around her again, gathering the bubbles, and spoke.

“You have the luxury of hesitation, human. Without me, you will die here. Is that acceptable? If you wish to die, I will let you go.”

In an instant, her breath constricted again. Her body, which had been floating, began to sink. The witch’s words rang true. Without the ray, Livia would perish here. If that happened, her entire family would be lost forever.

That couldn’t happen. She couldn’t die. Hadn’t she sworn to take revenge, even if it meant consorting with darkness?

‘I accept the contract. But I have one condition.’

“A condition? How amusing. Go ahead, tell me.”

‘I don’t want revenge carried out by someone else. I will punish them with my own hands!’

“A demanding human, indeed. Well… fine. You to me, and I to you… we shall fulfill each other’s desires. Very fairly, I might add.”

As soon as the sweet-talking ray finished speaking, the bubbles surrounding Livia exploded with a loud noise.

Boom!

The sea roared violently in rage, and the black ray swiftly transformed before Livia. A woman with the upper body of a human and the long tail of a snake grinned widely, circling around Livia and bursting into laughter.

Ahahaha! Hehehe! Hahaha!

The laughter that shook her mind made Livia cover her ears. The black witch circling around her reached out and lifted her chin.

“You are mine now.”

The witch’s whisper lingered over Livia’s lips, and her breath slipped deep into Livia’s mouth. At that moment, something bitter flowed down her throat and spread throughout her body.

Livia’s consciousness flickered and faded.



In the realm of humans, the gods reigned supreme. They ruled over the earth, the sky, the sea, and even the darker, more obscure places, wielding the power over life and death.

Fate, love, anger, and war lay firmly within the gods’ control, making humans seem insignificant by comparison. The gods were undeniably powerful, but they were also chaotic, violent, and unassailable.

Not only humans but even nymphs and monsters had to resign themselves to their fate at the hands of the gods. After all, it wasn’t just mortals who suffered; even among the gods, when their attention waned, they would disregard familial bonds, consorting with or violating one another, leading to the birth of new deities.

Thus, the gods were entwined with all things in the world. Beyond the renowned twelve Olympian gods, domains such as jealousy, oblivion, victory, defeat, fortune, and revenge also fell under their jurisdiction.

Though she never voiced it, Livia harbored a deep distrust of the gods. No, she longed for a life unconnected to them and believed she was achieving that—until this cruel fate completely upended her existence.

‘There’s not much time left until the witch’s appointed moment…’

Livia hid deep within the temple of the sea god, constructed of pure white coral, gold, and jewels, clenching her trembling fists tightly. It had been four days since she had slipped into this place under the witch’s influence.

To eliminate the scent of the earth and mimic a sea nymph, she had crouched motionless in a shell grave. Now, that torturous time was nearly over, and the moment to finally leave was approaching.

Livia took ragged breaths, watching for the shadow of the moon to fall over the red coral ceiling. Her heart began to pound wildly with tension. Habitually, she raised her nails to scratch her skin but stopped abruptly.

A vivid red scar ran along the dark line extending vertically on her wrist—a strange, foreign black mark. It was the trace left by the witch.

“This is the sword of one who harms the gods.”

After completing their contract, the witch had pulled out a dagger gleaming entirely in gold and dragged it down her own wrist. Ominous dark red Blood trickled down her slack skin.

“Only those of bloodline can wield it,” the witch’s eerie red eyes met Livia’s. At that moment, she added, “I will grant you the authority, if only for a short while.”



The witch raised her golden knife, stained with her own dead Blood, and swiftly thrust it toward Livia’s wrist.

Thunk!

The blade cut through Livia’s flesh and bone. The pain was beyond imagination, and Livia had to clench her teeth to suppress a scream.

It felt as though a freshly forged knife from a blazing furnace was piercing her raw flesh.

The golden knife, which melted, crushed, and tore through her fragile flesh and bone, slowly burrowed deeper into her body.

It was indeed a remarkable sight, yet at the same time, it was horrifying and grotesque.

The black Blood encasing the golden knife first seeped into her, and following the trail left by that Blood, the golden knife followed.

And once it completely disappeared, the excruciating pain vanished without a trace.

“Until our contract ends, that knife is yours.”

Recalling that moment, Livia gently stroked the black line on her wrist with her fingertip.

Except for its color, it looked like an ordinary, slightly raised scar. However, within it lay the very golden knife that could harm a god.

‘Is this really possible?’

She had pondered it for three days, but the answer was already determined. Even if it wasn’t possible, she had to make it so.

Only then would she be granted the ‘power for revenge.’

“Oh, and… even if you don’t stab his heart with the knife, there is another way to harm him.”

The witch’s voice, casual and unbothered, settled in Livia’s ears like a dance.

If the god of the sea fell in love with a human, they would vanish into sea foam.

Livia had heard this saying before—an ancient legend that had drifted along the shores for centuries without any known origin.

Some called it a mermaid, others the god of the sea, but the meaning was the same. If they fell in love with a human, they would turn into sea foam.

Whether it was true or not was unknown, but it was something close to impossible.

Winning the heart of a sea god… it would be more difficult than stabbing a god’s heart with a knife. Livia shook her head.

“That’s impossible.”

“Child, humans sometimes make the impossible possible, don’t they? I hold human potential in high regard. So if you turn him into sea foam… yes, I will give you all my power.”

The witch must have been playing tricks just to unsettle her mind.

It wasn’t merely because they were called gods and humans that it seemed impossible. Though rare, stories of humans falling in love with gods had been passed down from time to time.

But with this sea god, it was difficult. He was notoriously known for his extreme hatred of humans.

He never easily yielded the sea even to fishermen, and merchant ships always had to be wary of the sea’s mood as they passed.

If there was any commotion on the sea or more ships than necessary roamed its surface, storms were sure to arise.

In various places along the paths to the deep sea, sirens, known to lure and devour humans, lived in abundance.

Countless lives were swallowed by the sea. At least in this country, Arakne, the sea was an absolutely fearsome and hostile entity.

For such a master of the sea to fall in love with a human…

Well, it seemed as unlikely as her returning alive from the afterlife.

In truth, what she should worry about more was what would happen after she harmed the god.

The gods were ruthless to those who dared challenge them.

Livia would likely be imprisoned in Tartarus, the hell within hells. It wasn’t that she wasn’t afraid of all these things, but she had to do it nonetheless.

The shepherd who violated the sheep and the mother who loved him and slaughtered her neighbors, and all the humans who sided with her and drove her innocent family to death.

They burned everything she had, so she would burn everything they had in return.

She had learned that revenge was foolish, but it didn’t matter at all.

Her family and Mumu, who might be crossing the river of death, could scold her if they knew.

However, that was something they could only do if she met them. If she could meet them, who would come to scold her, she would do even worse things.

‘Father, Iason… Lete…’

Livia’s eyes burned with longing.

My enemies, even if I’m dragged into Tartarus, I won’t go alone.

Clenching her teeth, Livia looked beyond the shell grave at the sharp, gleaming pinnacle of the golden castle.

The shadow of the red coral touched the center of the ceiling. It was finally the time the witch had spoken of.

Rising from the shell grave, Livia went to the secluded back of the coral palace, waiting in the shade of a giant tree for any sign of life.

Fortunately, it wasn’t long before a nymph carrying a jar on her head entered the garden.

In a hurry, she quickly passed by Livia.

‘…Did it work?’

Just as Livia felt relieved that she seemed to have hidden her human scent well, the nymph suddenly stopped and turned around sharply.

“Hey, you.”



Startled, Livia’s neck stiffened as she turned. Her heart pounded wildly, seeming to drop to the floor.

Slowly turning her head, Livia found herself being glared at by a nymph with blue hair and gill-like ears.

“You…”



“Are you slacking off here? Did you think you wouldn’t be seen hiding there?”

“…Huh?”

“Judging by your hair color, you must be from the land. Even if you don’t know much, don’t you realize you’ll get kicked out if you’re lazy? It’s the busiest time with the banquet happening, and you can’t just hide away like that.”

Every time the nymph grumbled, her ear-like gills quivered slightly.

Luckily, it seemed she hadn’t been caught. Livia swallowed a sigh of relief and quickly chimed in with the nymph’s words.

“Oh, uh! Sorry! I just sat down for a moment because I felt dizzy, and I accidentally dozed off.”

“What? Dizzy? Did you eat some spoiled shellfish or something? Anyway, you can’t just eat anything because you’re hungry. Those from the land often get sick easily, you know? Well, anyway, come along quickly. We were short on hands to move the jars, so this is perfect. By the way, where are you from?”

Choosing her words carefully, Livia responded calmly to the nymph’s inquisitive question. Fortunately, the bits and pieces she overheard while crouching by the shell grave came in handy.

“Oh, I was at the Black Trumpet Palace, but I came to help with the banquet for a bit.”

“Ah, the Black Trumpet. That’s quite a distance. You came from far away.”

The Black Trumpet was quite a way from the main palace, mainly handling external materials needed for the main castle and other palaces, making it the place with the most outside nymphs.

Nodding in understanding, the nymph led Livia into the palace.

The nymph’s name was Audike.

It seemed Audike wasn’t exaggerating when she said she was busy, as hundreds of nymphs were bustling around. Seeing this, Livia felt lucky to have met this nymph. She needed to get inside the palace anyway, and following Audike allowed her to blend in naturally.

“Hey, you! Do you have nothing to do? Want to carry a jar?”

Every time Audike encountered another nymph who seemed idle, she suggested they carry a “jar,” but they all shook their heads and ran away.

By then, Livia started to worry a bit, wondering if she was being roped into something strange.

“Hey, why does everyone hate carrying jars?”

“What? …Oh, you wouldn’t know since you’re from the land.”

Rubbing her chin thoughtfully, Audike gave Livia a meaningful look and suddenly extended her finger.

“First, promise.”

“Promise? What?”

“Promise you won’t run away from carrying jars after I tell you. Then I’ll tell you.”


Hearing the reason made her want to run away. She didn’t even want to hear it before it was spoken.

However, Audike’s fierce gaze was so intense that I couldn’t admit I didn’t want to hear it now.

Hesitating, Livia extended her finger with a reluctant expression.

“Alright. What is it, anyway?”

“Wow. You’re really warm.”

Suddenly, Audike grabbed Livia’s hand, which was hooked around her finger, and looked at her with surprise.

“What?”

“I mean your body temperature. Are all people from the land this warm?”

Livia had always had a higher body temperature since she was young, but it wasn’t to the extent of being called hot.

However, the sea nymph’s hand felt cool enough to be chilly, making Livia’s hand seem unusually warm in comparison.

Audike, seemingly fascinated, squeezed Livia’s hand a few more times before finally sharing the promised information.

“To gather moonlight, you have to go up to the sea where the banquet is held. There will be many gods there, right? As you know, gods are inherently violent and capricious. Some are quite obsessed with beautiful things… That’s why everyone is reluctant to approach the gods. Being close to them never ends well.”

Audike’s words sparked a faint glimmer in Livia’s eyes.

The sea above, the banquet of the gods.

The place where the sea god she needed to strike with her dagger resided.

Fate seemed to guide her to the place she needed to go.

The opportunity had come so quickly. Tension tingled at her fingertips. Livia forced herself not to show her excitement and nodded stiffly.

“…I see.”

Whatever Audike interpreted from Livia’s expression, she laughed and patted Livia’s shoulder.

“Are you already scared? No need to be. You’re just following me now, so you only need to gather moonlight from a distance. Come on, let’s go. The night is short.”

The blue-haired sea nymph took her hand warmly and led the way.

“This way.”

They arrived at the center of the spire Livia had seen earlier when gauging time, where many sea fairies with jars like hers were swarming.

“Don’t space out; stay close to me, okay?”

Audike firmly gripped Livia’s hand and warned her. Livia nodded obediently, aware of the cool, smooth touch holding her hand.

It felt like the skin of a snake or the scales of a fish, but strangely, it didn’t feel repulsive. Instead, the smooth, cold sensation was pleasant.

“Oh, by the way, what’s your name?”

Audike, seemingly fond of Livia, kindly asked for her name.

“…Livia.”

Livia felt uncomfortable under the nymph’s gentle gaze. She had come to harm their god, and receiving such kindness felt deceitful.

Her conscience pricked her, but she gritted her teeth and brushed off unnecessary emotions.

No. Stay focused. They’re not even human anyway. Just think about my father and brothers who burned to death.

With clenched teeth, Livia stood by Audike’s side.

Soon, the top of the spire parted, and moonlight touched the heads of the waiting sea fairies.

At that moment.



Before she could prepare for anything, her body shook as thousands of water droplets clung around them.

It was a fleeting moment, barely enough to blink, but Livia’s world flipped in an instant.

Before she could even think, “What is this?” the pressure surrounding her body changed.

The dull pressure she hadn’t realized was there vanished, and clear air rushed in like a tidal wave, filling her lungs completely.

“…Phew!”

Livia lifted her head above the water, her chest heaving as she gasped for air.

The air she gulped down was so sweet that it made saliva pool in her mouth. Perhaps because she was breathing so frantically, her head spun for a moment, yet she felt at ease, like she had returned home.

‘Outside… I’m really outside.’

She hadn’t realized it while wandering underwater, but now that she was out, the air above was shockingly delightful.

Her entire body, freed from the pressure, seemed to scream with joy at the absence of water. Livia hugged her wet shoulders and shivered.

At that moment, a cold hand suddenly gripped her shoulder. Startled, Livia turned around to see Audike laughing heartily, urging her on.

“They say those from the land can’t get their bearings once they’re out. I guess you’re the same. Sorry, but there’s no time to dawdle. This way, follow me.”

The nymph’s words snapped her back to reality.

Right, there was no time to be distracted by something like this.

Livia composed herself and turned her head to follow Audike.

Her ears suddenly opened, and she slowly began to hear the surrounding noise.

The sound of music blending horns and harps, waves playfully rolling over the sea, and sea fairies dancing busily to avoid the drunken teasing of the gods.

It was a scene that felt like being pulled into a myth painted by an artist, yet this was Livia’s reality.

She gritted her teeth until they bled, constantly reminding herself of her situation.

I am an uninvited guest.

Just a mere unbeliever who had sneaked into this place.

Suddenly, tiny droplets shattered over the rolling waves, and a faint rainbow formed above them.

Though it wasn’t daytime, everything was clear enough to see, indicating that the moon was close. Her head turned, almost entranced, searching for the moon.

Then she saw it, not far away, half-submerged, seemingly merging with the sea—a round moon.



In Livia’s gaze, which had come to a halt, she saw a man lying leisurely in the embrace of the rising moon.

His hair shimmered silver-blue under the moonlight, and a loosely draped pallium barely covered him.

The man surveyed the sea’s banquet with an arrogant smile, believing ruling was his birthright.

The moon goddess, who had lent him her knees, lovingly stroked the hair on his smooth forehead.

Thump, thump, thump.

Livia’s heart reacted wildly.

“He’s the most beautiful man in this sea,” the witch had said.

“You won’t be able to mistake him.”

The sight of the man under the moonlight pierced Livia’s eyes. Suddenly, the black scar on her wrist burned hotly.

It’s him.

The legitimate son of Poseidon, one of the three great Olympian gods, and the master of the deep sea.

‘…Triton.’

The owner of the heart she needed to pierce.



It was the scent of a human.

The smell of human flesh that the sea god, Triton, most despised, loathed, and abhorred.

A pitiful scent—soft, fragile, and warm.

Triton, who lay indulgently on Selene’s knee, suddenly opened his eyes and glanced around the banquet.

The gods and spirits were deeply intoxicated by the nectar Ganymede poured, while nymphs served them in between.

…Who is it? Where are they?

A human, daring to enter my domain without fear.

His indifferent teal eyes, filled with moonlight, narrowed as he searched for the presence he detested.

It wasn’t that, nor was it this.

He even overlooked forms that couldn’t possibly be human.

It was when his gaze, filled with murderous intent, slowly swept over the banquet that he noticed.

“What’s wrong, Triton?”

A cool fingertip touched Triton’s tense cheek. The goddess Selene gently whispered as she drew his face toward hers.

“Why do you look like you’re about to get angry? Did you see something that displeases you?”

In contrast to Triton’s indifferent blue eyes, the goddess’s eyes shone with excessive compassion, like moonlight.

The tale of the moon goddess’s favoritism toward the sea was well-known throughout the world.

Sometimes she acted like a mother, sometimes like a lover, or even like a sister, showering the sea with her one-sided affection.

And how did the sea respond?

When the moon approached, it pretended to welcome her by raising its level, but its heavy foundation always remained in place.

Though aware of the goddess’s favoritism, the sea feigned ignorance. It seemed to accept her heart by rippling waves to shatter the moonlight, but that was all.

The sea does not tilt.

Not even for an ancient god that had existed since the beginning.

Triton, who had been surveying the gathering, caught Selene’s hand as she stroked his cheek and pulled it down.

His face, smiling serenely, was alluring, but in the teal eyes that turned back to the goddess, she was already absent.

“It would be best for you to return, Selene.”

“What is it? Hmm?”

“An uninvited guest has entered.”

Triton’s words caused Selene to tilt her head.

She intensified the brightness of the moonlight illuminating the sea.

With Selene’s moonlight shining brightly over the water, it became much easier to discern the faces at the banquet.

As she attempted to enhance her vision to locate the unwanted guest Triton was seeking, he gently grasped her waist and whispered, “Go back, Selene.”

Selene turned her head to meet the eyes of the sea god.

Within his gaze, waves crashed and a stormy scene unfolded before fading away.

Ah, this banquet is about to become a mess.

Having glimpsed the near future, she nodded with a smile.

“I’ll visit your palace soon.”

The goddess whispered secretly into the sea god’s ear, then vanished into the fractured moonlight. The moon soon ascended into the sky, and the goddess disappeared without a trace.

However, the bright moonlight remained, keeping watch over the place for him.

Triton sat down heavily on a chair made of rolling waves, with the moonlight behind him.

Then, from a short distance away, Dugong and Actius, the generals of the seven seas who had been observing him, quickly ran to their master’s side and asked, “What happened, Lord Triton?”

Triton replied in his usual calm voice, “There is a human among us.”

Dugong and Actius’s eyes widened as if they were about to pop out.

A human!

Oh, heavens! It was an utterly impossible occurrence.

Not just any god’s gathering, but a human at Triton’s banquet?

Everyone knew of Triton’s disdain for humans—gods, spirits, nymphs, and humans alike.

Even the barnacles on the rocks were aware of how much he despised humans, so it wasn’t wrong to say the whole world knew.

The generals standing beside him each reacted with dumbfounded expressions.

“That’s impossible. How could a human come to a banquet on the sea?”

“Sniff, sniff…! That’s odd. No matter how much I smell, there’s no human scent at all… Are you certain, Lord Triton?”

At Dugong’s doubtful words, Triton glanced at him.

It was just a fleeting look, but it felt like being struck by lightning, sending tingles throughout his body.

Dugong quickly buried his nose in the seawater—not that it did any harm—and confessed his mistake.

“How dare I doubt my master! I’ve committed a grave sin and should be confined to the cave of the abyss, eating only seaweed for three days!”

“If it’s a grave sin, why only three days of seaweed punishment?”

“Th-then a week…?”

Triton shook his head in disapproval as he looked at Dugong, who was pleading for a week.

The sea god’s disdain for humans had a long-standing history.

Descendants of the thunder god and humans often tested their fate or flaunted their power by slaughtering ‘monsters.’

Unfortunately, many of the sea’s creatures fell into that ‘monster’ category, and countless beings with seawater in their veins were sacrificed to their heroism.

Every time that happened, Poseidon would rage fiercely.

Though they were ugly and grotesque, they were still his children. Despite being as indulgent as the god of kings, one thing set him apart: his strange paternal love.

These so-called heroes concealed an ugly side.

To make themselves shine, they casually scorned and slaughtered other beings, labeling them as monsters. Humans went even further, treating the sea as if it were a warehouse they could plunder at will.

They viewed the sea merely as a tool for exploitation.

Selfish creatures, always scheming to take more without giving anything back. It was revolting how they treated the sea’s creatures as monsters simply because they were different, despite being crafted from the very essence of gods.

Humans had nothing appealing about them. And yet, one dared to sneak into his banquet…

Pathetic, but he had to admire their nerve.

Triton twisted his lips into a smirk as he sipped his nectar.

Upon reflection, having a human sneak in wasn’t entirely bad. A banquet ought to have some entertainment, after all. The thought of capturing this rude, nasty human and punishing her in every possible way was actually quite delightful.

…Yeah. It wasn’t all bad.

Triton shifted his mood, smiling lazily as he emptied his glass.

He reached out to refill it, but Ganymede was too busy being teased by the mischievous goddesses to notice.

Annoyed, Triton clicked his tongue and turned to find Dionysus’s wine instead.

As he did, a certain color caught his eye.

A pure red, untouched by Nyx’s darkness or Selene’s white light. Perhaps it was closer to Blood-red.



Triton squinted, staring at the woman gathering moonlight.

From neither too far nor too close, the sight of a nymph engaged in such a trivial task as gathering moonlight scratched at his vision like a burr.

Why, why was that?

Just then, the red-haired nymph lifted her head.

Catching her breath, she pretended it was by chance as she turned to look at him.



Her pale green eyes wavered, seemingly unprepared to meet his gaze.

But with a face that clearly showed surprise, she did not turn away. Instead, she met his gaze with an intensity that seemed almost fierce.

Well, well.

Triton’s eyes narrowed as he quietly met her gaze. In that moment, her once-bold stare seemed to come to its senses and slowly turned aside.

But it was already too late to avoid him.

As Triton lifted his hand and beckoned with his fingers, the red-haired nymph suddenly found herself standing before him.

Triton looked intently into her trembling green eyes and raised his empty glass.

“Fill it.”

Before she knew it, Livia had been drawn near to the sea god.

Somehow, a bottle of wine, which no one had given or handed to her, was now in Livia’s hand.

‘How did this happen…?’

She looked at him, bewildered, and he nodded toward the glass, seemingly questioning what she was doing. Startled and hesitant, Livia quickly composed herself.

She needed to get close to this man somehow, so this was actually a perfect opportunity. Gathering her thoughts quickly, Livia, with trembling hands, poured wine into his empty glass.

As the wine trickled into the glass, Triton suddenly spoke.

“Actius, do you know that Dionysus’s wine is said to reveal the truth?”

Actius, who had been frantically searching for the human alongside Dugong, quickly responded.

“What? Oh, yes! Of course. They say the first glass reveals the truth, and the second brings death. It’s considered a deadly poison for deceitful humans.”

Livia struggled to hide her shock and lowered her gaze. To think that the wine she was holding was such a drink…

She wanted to throw it away and run far, but that wasn’t an option.

Calm down. Forget the goal. Act like an innocent nymph who knew nothing…

Her heart thudded annoyingly, but she gritted her teeth and steadied herself.

“It’s a cruel thing, isn’t it? To die right after tasting the finest wine made by the god of wine?”

“But isn’t that only for the deceitful ones? I heard that those who are truthful can drink this wine without any harm…”

At Actius’s words, Triton burst into laughter.

His deep, powerful laughter echoed, causing the sea to ripple. Sweeping his silver-blue hair back with a bored gesture, he shook his head.

“That’s a foolish answer, Actius. All humans lie. Lying is their way of life. Deceiving, Killing, trampling—it’s in their nature.”

Muttering with a tone full of scorn, he extended his empty glass toward Livia once more.

When Livia, maintaining a calm expression as if she hadn’t heard anything, filled his glass with wine, he spoke again.

“What do you think?”


A voice, unexpectedly gentle and almost affectionate, suddenly spoke to her.

She paused, momentarily wondering if she had misheard, as the half-filled golden goblet tapped against the mouth of the wine bottle.

“Why do you act so foolishly when you seem so smart? I’m talking to you.”

Livia lifted her stiff neck to look at the sea god.

As their eyes met, he smiled indifferently. His upturned lips appeared friendly, but his gaze was as cold as ice. Instinctively, she sensed something was wrong.

‘Could it be… has he figured it out?’

It had been unsettling from the moment he had pulled her close from a distance.

However, if he had realized the truth, he could have killed her right away, so it was puzzling that he had summoned her instead.

Had he noticed? Was he suspicious? Or was it just a coincidence…?

Though she tried to maintain a calm facade, her breath came in ragged gasps, causing her chest to rise and fall without pause.

The sea god’s gaze briefly lingered on her heaving chest, but that was all.

Despite being the master of the waters, the man with the driest eyes pressed Livia for an answer.

“Tell me. What do you think? Is lying an instinct for humans or not?”

Not knowing his intentions, she had to answer carefully. What was he trying to find out from her? Or what did he already know?

As she looked into his turquoise eyes, trying to read them, his gaze seemed to turn her inside out. She quickly lowered her eyes.

“The only instinct I know of in humans is just one.”

“And what is that?”

“…Survival. Simply the will to live.”

Though it was useless to her, something she had discarded.

She was only rushing toward death, defying her instincts, solely for revenge, for her family’s revenge.

“Is that so? Well…”

The man’s furrowed brow seemed to relax, losing its tension.

A look of boredom settled on his expressionless face.

What was it that those who lived eternally despised the most? An answer so trite it made one yawn—the mundane wretchedness of it all.

“How dull.”

Muttering coldly, he brought the goblet to his lips but suddenly stopped.

His blue eyes, now filled with a cruel starlight, turned back to Livia.

“Your answer may be insignificant, but I should reward you for livening up the banquet.”

Triton drained the goblet he held, then snatched the wine bottle from Livia and filled his empty glass to the brim.

The sight of red wine overflowing down his wrist was chilling. The wine, sloshing and spilling over, was thrust toward Livia.

“Drink.”

Startled, Livia stared at the wine staining the man’s hand a purple hue.

“It’s the finest wine brewed by the god of wine.”

His playful eyes sparkled as he offered the potent drink in a soft and gentle voice.

Livia felt her heart drop in shock, but she gritted her teeth and maintained a calm demeanor. Many eyes were watching. She couldn’t show any sign of wavering.

“…I will drink it gratefully.”

Without a moment’s hesitation, Livia raised the glass and poured it down her throat.

Her slender neck moved smoothly as she gulped down the deadly wine, which scratched and seeped into her throat.

Indeed, it was a wine crafted by the god of wine.

The rich aroma of grapes, the pleasant savory taste lingering on her tongue, and the aftertaste that persisted long after drinking were sweet enough to shake her soul.

Even after finishing a full glass, her throat felt parched, and the slowly fading aftertaste left her yearning for more.

Despite knowing that another glass could mean death, she found herself dizzy with the desire for just one more.

Livia bit down hard on the inside of her cheek, enough to taste the metallic tang of Blood. A trickle of Blood slid down her throat.

Triton, who had been quietly observing her furrowed brow, smiled with interest.

“Judging by your expression, it seems to suit your taste.”

With an excited look, he picked up the bottle again and began to fill her glass to the brim.

The wine poured over without concern, trickling down Livia’s wrist.

“Here, have another.”

Faced with another round, Livia looked at Triton with a momentarily puzzled expression. The sea god, smiling softly and beautifully like a wave bathed in moonlight, simply gazed at her.

The second glass was the cup of death. But… was that really true?

They claimed Dionysus’s wine revealed the truth, yet it was the gods who deceived and misled humans without a second thought.

Who had given Pandora’s box to the world? Who had changed forms to violate a maiden and make her bear a child? The tale of Hades taking Persephone to the underworld and tricking her into eating pomegranate seeds was all too famous.

Lies and deceit weren’t exclusive to humans. The gods also deceived and tricked humans at will.

Indeed, it required resolve to recklessly drink the wine.

‘Even if this truly becomes a deadly poison, can the witch really save me?’

The witch who had made a pact with Livia had said she could save her at least twice, maybe three times.

So she had whispered sweetly yet chillingly, hoping fervently that Livia wouldn’t face death more than three times before piercing ‘Triton’s’ heart.

‘At least twice, maybe three times…’

She tried not to show hesitation, but her hand holding the glass trembled slightly.

Why was he offering her this drink, one meant for gods? Suspicion was the only answer.

So, what should she do now? Drinking it was too risky, but refusing would only confirm his suspicions.

Livia nibbled on the inside of her cheek where she had bitten before, then suddenly broke into a wide smile.

“…Oh, mighty god, truth be told, I’m quite weak and not good with alcohol.”

A glint of interest flickered in his eyes, as if he had expected this. Just before his lips could twist into a smirk, Livia carefully lifted the full glass and took a step closer to him.

“So if you’re not planning to take back this second glass….”

His turquoise eyes bore into her as she approached, seemingly trying to see through her.

Livia looked up at Triton with an innocent gaze, pretending to be shy. The trembling of her fingertips from tension only added to her appearance of naivety, which was fortunate.

As she handed her glass to his cold hand, she whispered, “Would you feed me directly?”

She desperately hoped it would come across as the bold temptation of a naive nymph.

And if she dared to wish for more, she hoped this clumsy and inadequate seduction might work, even just a little.

The surroundings were noisy, yet she could feel eyes on them. His attendants watched, their jaws practically dropping in shock.



His expression was unreadable, making it impossible to discern his thoughts as he stared at her. Her heart pounded wildly, but there was no turning back now.

“This is amusing.”

He laughed, a low chuckle that was nothing like the angry roar of laughter from before.

His cold, firm hand gripped Livia’s chin painfully.

With merciless fingers, he pried open her trembling lips, roughly forcing her mouth open by pressing down on her delicate tongue.

“You need to open up. Only then can I feed you myself, right?”

He spoke in a gentle tone, as if he were soothing a child, but his touch was harsh and cold.

Livia parted her trembling lips and leaned closer to him.

The glass of wine was lifted above her lips and tilted. Just as the purple droplets were about to fall into her open mouth, she thought, ‘Now…!’

In a flash, Livia drew the witch’s knife from her wrist.

The golden blade, sharp and gleaming, emerged from her soft flesh and flew toward the sea god’s heart.

A furious whirlwind swept over the sea banquet. The waves were rough, towering like mountains as they surged and created a massive tumult.

The quick-witted gods cursed the sudden storm and flew up to the sky, while the sea creatures fled far away to escape their master’s wrath.

The generals of the seven oceans gathered urgently, staring in awe at the giant whirlpool their master had created.

“That crazy nymph, no, that human…!”

Dugong trembled, its large protruding molars chattering in shock.

Not only had a human dared to intrude on the banquet, but they had also attacked the master of the sea!

When the golden knife flashed, it was dizzying to behold! But it was a futile attempt.

Only someone like Heracles could dare such a thing, but an ordinary human woman couldn’t possibly harm the ruler of the sea.

“What on earth is going on…?”

“Well, I thought this banquet would pass smoothly this time…”

“Is that really the issue right now?! Damn it! How did that human manage to sneak into the banquet?”

“How would I know! Ugh, my head!”

“Come on, you were nearby, how could you not notice, Actius?”

“What?! Who are you blaming now?”

While Terror and Actius, who managed the coastline, bickered and shifted blame, Dugong anxiously looked below the sea.

‘Why do I have such a bad feeling about this?’

The swirling black waters, churned by Triton’s power, were now inaccessible to anyone.

Only he and those he permitted could enter the barrier’s domain.

Dugong’s face darkened as it watched the black waters.

Phorkys, the manifestation of the orca and the gatekeeper of the Aegean Sea, approached with a worried look and asked, “Did you see it, Dugong? That thing the human was holding earlier.”

The golden blade aimed at the master’s heart… It was undoubtedly Chrysaor’s knife.

“Could it be that ‘the woman’ is still alive?”

The silent Dugong held its forehead. The return of the golden knife surely meant that the woman had returned.

“Probably.”

“Oh no…! That crazy woman is still alive! What a tenacious life she has.”

She was the woman who, not knowing her place, had been buried by Triton’s hand. They never thought they would see her again….

The faces of the Dugong and Phorkys darkened like the deep, swirling sea.

The influence of the angry sea god made the winds grow rough. Dark clouds gathered ominously in the sky above.

It seemed a storm was brewing.



The water pressure pressed down fiercely on Livia. Invisible streams of water bound her neck and limbs, stealing her freedom.

She gasped for air and struggled, but it was a futile effort, like a butterfly pinned in place.

“Look at this. Humans never fail to disappoint me.”

A voice that resonated not in her ears but in her soul shook Livia.

She opened her eyes wide.

And she froze, overwhelmed by the scene before her….

Was the largest creature in the sea an orca? No, she was certain there was nothing this enormous among living things.

A ‘god’ of such colossal size that her narrow field of vision couldn’t encompass it all faced her. It wasn’t just the size. The overwhelming presence crushed her.

‘Is this… the true form of a god?’

His silvery-blue hair shimmered with a soft glow. The small whirlpools surrounding the massive entity sparkled with bubbles of mysterious light.

The sea god revealing his divinity.

Triton.

“Speak, insolent human.”

A dauntingly terrifying presence casually addressed her.

“How should I kill you so that you suffer the most?”

A beauty that shook the soul.

A rapture that felt like time had stopped.

Fear that seeped to the bone….

Livia gritted her teeth to stop herself from trembling, but it was futile.

No matter how skilled she was, she was merely a human, a mortal.

A being beyond Livia’s comprehension pressed down on her.

The eyes that held all the colors of the sea simply gazed at her, yet she felt a fear that seemed to delve deep into her soul.

‘…Truly a terrifying existence.’

Even though it wasn’t cold, her body trembled. Like a mouse before a cat, she had an overwhelming urge to run away.

It was a natural and overpowering fear, like prey before a predator.

“If a mere human has ruined my banquet… shouldn’t you take responsibility?”

The once gentle voice suddenly twisted into something fierce. As a hint of violence crept into the god’s smile, the currents surrounding Livia intensified.



Before she could even react, she found herself placed on Triton’s enormous palm. Just a palm.

Was she small, or was the god simply too gigantic? Feeling utterly insignificant, Livia forgot the very reason she was there.

As despair paled Livia’s face, the god leaned in closer. In the god’s eyes, so near, a pitiful woman was reflected.

“If you answer my questions well, I’ll grant you a painless death. If not…”

The giant hand suddenly gripped her. The crushing pressure made Livia cry out in pain.

“…Well, you probably know what happens.”

The grip felt like it was breaking her entire body. It wasn’t just suffocating; it was a pain that squeezed her lungs and burst her insides. Livia glared at Triton with eyes burning red.

The god was laughing.

As if her pain was nothing more than a trivial amusement.

‘Damn!’

Livia cursed Triton with every foul word she knew. She was too angry and wronged to hold back her tears.

Had she made a pact with a witch just to die like this? It was absurd and disheartening.

Damn witch. If she was to face such a threatening god, she should have been given better information!

“I’ll ask again. Where did you get the golden knife?”

Livia gritted her teeth, glaring at Triton as if to kill him.

Her instinctive fear remained, but her half-mad mind managed to quell it somewhat.

“…Your response is slow.”

The impatient god clenched his fist. Her small, soft body began to crush under his touch.

“Ugh, ah!”

A broken rib stabbed somewhere in her insides. Her heart pounded as if it would burst, and her head spun from the Blood that couldn’t flow properly.

Just when she thought she would die like that, Triton released his grip.

A short command fell into Livia’s dizzy ears.

“Answer.”

His urging voice grated in her mind, but it only provoked Livia further. Her heart, which had been trembling with fear, now pounded with malice.

Stupid Livia Horn.

When she had drawn the knife earlier, she should have aimed directly for his heart.

Her hesitation and foolishness filled her with regret.

Her face, a mix of anger, resentment, and frustration, was already tear-streaked. Livia, glaring at the god with eyes blazing with fury, began to struggle fiercely.

“Let go… Let go! I said let go! Let go!”



The sea god looked down at Livia with an incredulous expression. Her hands, flailing wildly, finally slipped free.

Panting heavily, she scratched and pinched his hand until her small nails all broke. But the sea god’s skin was as hard and cold as steel, and her nails couldn’t make the slightest mark.

Instead, the more she attacked him, the more her nails broke and her fingers bent backward.

“Let go, let go! I said let go! Damn sea god! Damn! Hnng, ugh!”

“…You seem more focused on cursing me than confessing.”

What kind of situation was this? Livia didn’t know.

She was desperate to inflict even a small wound on the being who caused her such excruciating pain, as if her insides were about to burst.

“Let… go… Let, let me go!”

More than the pain, it was fear, and more than despair, it was malice that filled her as she began to sob and bite the giant hand holding her.

“If you kill me… I’ll come back from the afterlife, huff! Huff! And seek revenge on you!”

At Livia’s spiteful words, Triton burst into laughter. His silver hair, lightly swaying with the waves, seemed mockingly beautiful in the dreadful situation.

“Everyone talks about the afterlife. You seem to think the afterlife is a joke.”

His voice, murmuring with ridicule, was chilling. At the same time, the excruciating pain of her ribs being crushed resumed.

“Ahhh!”

“Where did you get the golden knife? Who sent you here?”

In the grip that squeezed her, Livia truly felt like nothing more than a toy.

The pain of her broken ribs stabbing into her lungs made her think it might be better to just die.

‘…No, I can’t.’

The smell of smoke brushed her nose. That terrible gray smoke that had burned her family and home. She couldn’t afford to be weak.

Livia forced her eyes to focus as they threatened to roll back. With a struggling hand, she scratched the wound on her wrist to draw out the golden knife.

The golden blade shone brilliantly even in the dark sea.

“Chrysaor’s golden knife….”

Triton’s eyes widened with surprise. He hadn’t been mistaken. It was indeed the golden knife.

As Chrysaor’s knife sliced through the back of his hand, red Blood flowed.

To him, it might have been just a scratch, but for Livia, it was different. Filled with exhilaration, she stabbed the knife into the giant hand again.

The more she stabbed, the darker the Blood became. Along with it, the color of the sea god’s turquoise eyes deepened.

“A mere human dares….”

A fierce wind blew. Seemingly indifferent to the knife stabbing his hand, the grip holding Livia tightened even more.

“Where did you get this knife? Is that woman alive? Or, are you perhaps related to her?”

The barrage of questions was harsh. But Livia shook her head, gritting her teeth.

If she was going to die anyway, she would never reveal anything. Displeased with her defiant gaze, Triton’s grip grew even stronger.

Then, an unbearable pain far worse than before engulfed her.

“Huff, ugh!”

Crunch. Crack, snap!

Her ribs screamed in agony as they completely shattered. Without the protection of the sturdy bones, her organs were pierced by bone fragments and burst messily. Her fiercely beating heart was no exception.



As Livia, who had been glaring at Triton with wide eyes, slowly closed her eyelids, her small head suddenly snapped back.

It was Livia’s first death.



The small body went limp.

Triton’s brow furrowed as he looked down at the fragile, broken body.

‘…To think she’d die from just this.’

There was no sign of life from the human. The tattered little body fluttered strangely like a torn piece of cloth.

Humans were always like this.

They died so easily that it was almost embarrassing to be truly angry. They died too quickly, leaving him feeling deflated.

He had intended to torment her more thoroughly over time.



Triton quietly looked down at the lifeless human woman’s body. In her right hand, she still held the golden knife that shone with a dazzling light.

What exactly was its origin? How did she have Chrysaor’s golden knife?

Chrysaor.

He was the illegitimate child of the god Poseidon and a woman with serpent hair.

Born clutching a golden knife, he often claimed that he, too, had a right to rule over the sea. His greed ultimately led to his banishment from the ocean, and how he met his end while wandering the land remained a mystery.

However, his lineage proved to be resilient.

The children he fathered with a sea nymph, the daughter of Oceanus, returned to the golden palace.

“We share the same sea Blood, so why are we denied the noble and sacred duty?”

Their voices angered Triton’s mother, the queen of the sea.

She bound her noisy sons into one, creating a monster with three bodies and one leg, and cast them to the earth.

Yet, Chrysaor’s cunning daughter had already bowed low and observed the queen’s reactions when she entered the golden palace.

She pleaded that she desired nothing and only asked to live there.

She was Echidna, a woman with a beautiful upper body and a serpent’s tail.

However, her gaze changed after she encountered Triton, who had returned from surveying the distant seas for the ruler’s tasks.

Echidna circled around him, persistently trying to catch his attention.

“I try to deny it, but you and I share the same Blood. So our ‘specialness’ is the same, right?”

Her whisper was absurd, her eyes desperate to the point of being unsettling.

“…I love you! Accept me. The child we bear will become the most powerful ruler of the sea!”

Her cries were annoying at that moment.

“You will eventually want me too!”

Echidna dared to bind and disgrace him with a bizarre spell she had learned from somewhere.

“How much of a fool did you take me for?”

Triton was never a gentle or patient man. Like other gods, he was capricious and violent, perhaps even more ferocious than them.

No one could defy the waves.

The raging sea was more terrifying than any natural disaster.

Triton never forgave Echidna.

He took from her what was most precious and cast it into the deep, cold darkness.

Due to the taboo set by his father, he could not tear her apart with his own hands, but he ensured a fate worse than death.

But then….

How did this woman come to possess Chrysaor’s golden knife?

The woman died, and the storm subsided. Then the waiting knights of the sea rushed to him.

“T-Triton, sir! Are you alright? What on earth happened? How could a human…!”

“Gasp! Did you kill her? Already?!”

Irritated by his subordinates’ fuss, Triton furrowed his brow and slowly withdrew his divine presence. Revealing himself for too long might unnecessarily attract the attention of Olympus.

Gods who resided outside the heavens generally disliked disturbances. The underworld was like that, and the sea was no different.

Though his father, one of the three great gods of Olympus, could traverse the heavens and the sea, Triton, a being solely of the sea, was not fond of the beings above.

Especially since the ancient gods were warlike and vulgar, having caused various incidents and wars multiple times.

“But this… this can’t be, is it the ‘golden knife’?”

Dugong looked in shock at the golden knife tightly held by the dead woman.

Chrysaor’s sword was a weapon passed down through Blood. It could only be used by him or his descendants, so how did this woman come to possess it?

When the puzzled Phorkys touched the golden knife held by the woman, the knife flashed and then merged into her wrist.

Dugong and Phorkys widened their eyes in surprise.

“Wow…. This is truly strange. If she were alive, there would have been much to learn from her….”

Phorkys murmured with a sense of pity as he watched the soul begin to leave the woman’s body.

At that moment, Triton, who was glaring at the woman with irritation, waved his hand and enclosed her body in a large water bubble.

The escaping soul was trapped within the bubble and remained there.

“Tr-Triton, sir?”

What was he doing?

Dugong and Phorkys looked at Triton in surprise, only to see their master frown slightly and issue a dizzying command.

“Dugong, fully restore this woman’s body. Phorkys, retrieve the woman’s soul that has drifted to the underworld.”

“W-What? You want me to go to the underworld?”

Phorkys shouted in alarm, but his voice naturally softened under Triton’s stern gaze.

“But the underworld is….”

A very frightening place….

“It’s just a part of the soul that ‘accidentally’ ended up there, so the gods on that side will turn a blind eye. Just in case, I’ll provide you with plenty of gold coins.”

Why must he suffer for the mistake his lord made?

Phorkys cast a somewhat resentful glance, feeling wronged, while their god smiled quietly as he watched him.

“Phorkys.”

“Yes, my lord.”

“Do you want to enter the underworld alive, or be dragged there dead? Choose.”

…Oh, how could he say something so terrifying?

Phorkys trembled, quickly lowered his eyes and shouted, “I’ll depart immediately!”

“So, you’ll go alive. Wise choice.”

Triton murmured lazily, satisfied, then turned away and disappeared.

Only the dead human woman, the sea lion, and the old man of the sea remained, quietly swallowing their tears.



“…Look. Wake… up!”

A voice called out, and a rough hand grabbed her arm.

“Wake up!”

Gasp. She opened her eyes wide in surprise, seeing an unfamiliar scene.

A twilight sky where day and night were indistinguishable, a narrow yellow path crowded with endless lines of people walking in groups.

And in the distance, a ferryman with unusually long limbs awaited them.

“Wh-Where is this…?”

“This is the afterlife. Now that you’re awake, listen carefully, girl.”

The person who awakened Livia whispered in a gruff voice. When she looked at him, she saw an old man with his head covered in black cloth and chains on his feet standing close by.

“You need to slip away into the forest from the middle of the line. The chains on your feet are noisy, so cut your skirt and tie them.”

“Who are you…?”

“I am….”

The old man looked at her wrist silently before turning his head.

“…There’s no need to know. You’ve entered the afterlife much sooner than I expected. This is why I say weak humans are useless….”

He grumbled, dissatisfied.

The afterlife, the underworld… death!

‘Triton!’

As her last memories of life resurfaced, the pain of her body shattering returned as well.

“Ah, ugh…!”

Staggering, Livia gritted her teeth, swallowing her groans. The old man walking beside her clicked his tongue as if he understood, then turned his head.

“It seems the memory of your death has returned. Well, it should pass in a few seconds.”

Just as the old man said, Livia felt the pain subsiding.

But then nausea rose. The twisting, gut-wrenching pain was almost welcome. It felt like everything was in its rightful place.

Damn it….

The agony of a human body being kneaded like dough was truly horrific, both physically and mentally. Livia wiped the sweat from her brow and forced her trembling legs to stand.

The old man, glancing ahead and behind, pulled Livia out of the line and pushed her into the forest as they reached the middle, whispering quickly.

“From here, you must go alone. I cannot leave the line.”

“Where am I supposed to go?”

“Just keep walking north. If you lose your direction, take the knife from your wrist and throw it on the ground. The blade will point north.”

The old man knew about the knife.

Livia grabbed the old man, asking again for confirmation.

“Did Echidna send you?”

“Half right and half wrong. Go. There’s no time. Once you leave the forest, you’ll see a spire. Go there and find the one who guards the bell. That person will help you. Remember, the underworld is a place where you must not look back. Focus only on the spire and move forward! No matter what, do not look back.”

The old man whispered quickly, pushing her firmly into the forest before discreetly blending back into the procession.

Livia hesitated for a moment but then hurriedly walked in the direction the old man had indicated.

The black forest was like the middle of the night, where even moonlight couldn’t penetrate. The forest, devoid of bird songs or even the sound of insects, was eerily silent and almost grotesque. She understood why the old man worried about her losing her way.

Without wind, sound, or light, it was impossible to distinguish one place from another. Feeling dizzy, Livia paused for a moment before following the old man’s advice and taking out her golden knife.

Seeing that she could still draw the knife even in the underworld, it seemed the knife was connected to her soul rather than her body.

Livia threw the knife and walked for a long time in the direction the blade pointed. It was then that she noticed a point of light in the distance.

“Livia… It’s you, Livia, isn’t it?”

A familiar voice reached her ears. Startled, she nearly turned around.

“Livi! Livi, I’m here! Livi, save me!”

It was the voice of Lete, her youngest sibling, whom Livia adored most in the world.

Clenching her eyes shut, she gritted her teeth and moved forward.

“Livia, Livia! Where are you going? Don’t go. Please… please…!”

“Livi… I’m hungry. Sob. Livi….”

“Livia! That way is dangerous. Come here. Stay with us, Livia!”

As she moved toward the light, her family’s voices grew more vivid, as if they were whispering right behind her.

“Don’t leave us…. Don’t leave us alone. Please. Sob… sob….”

The voices of her beloved family were so vivid that it was horrifying not to be able to look back.

But knowing that something even more terrible would happen if she did, Livia endured, gritting her teeth.

Those were fake.

If they were truly her family, they wouldn’t say such things. They would never do that.

“Livi, Livi! Sob, Livi! I’m hurt! It hurts. It’s so hot, Livi!”

Lete’s scream clawed at Livia’s ears. She covered her ears with her hands and ran solely toward the light.

“Livi, Livi…!”

Finally, when she emerged from the forest, the desperate voices abruptly ceased.

Panting heavily, she collapsed to the ground.

She looked at the vast reddish-brown river before her with a bewildered expression, tears welling in her eyes.

‘Father, Iason… Lete!’

As she sobbed, a mournful dirge began to flow into her ears. Turning her head, she saw people on Charon’s boat wailing loudly.

The cries and the endless song of sorrow flowed along the river with the rippling water.

Wasn’t the ruler of the river of sorrow named Lete?

It was the same name as her sibling. To her, Lete was only ever cute and lovable, but now only sorrow and tears remained.

Livia buried her sobs in the distant funeral song. She pounded the ground with her fists and clutched at her chest as she cried for a long time, but the lump in her chest only grew larger and refused to dissolve.

Mumu… Could Mumu still be alive?

No, that couldn’t be. The cruel villagers would never have let Mumu live.

Thinking of Mumu, who had charged at the torches to protect her, Livia felt her heart being torn to shreds.

She had taken in the little puppy, abandoned as a suckling, and raised it like family.

Even though it had grown into a full-grown dog, it always seemed like Livia’s little puppy, her clever and loyal companion…

‘Could Father and Iason have passed through here as well? If I follow them now…’

Livia Horn, who had been shifting restlessly, finally sat back down, clenching her teeth.

No.

Perhaps the river they were crossing was the River of Sorrow.

Beyond that lay the River of Lamentation, Cocytus, and the River of Fire, Phlegethon. Then came the River of Forgetfulness, Lete, where it was said all memories of one’s life were erased.

So, even if she hurriedly followed the boat and met them, it would be difficult to expect them to appear as they had in life.

Livia, who had been dazed, slowly regained her composure. Staying like this would change nothing.

“Keep walking straight north. If you lose your way, take the knife from your wrist and throw it on the ground. The direction the blade points is north.”

Recalling the old man’s words, she took out the knife and threw it on the ground. The blade spun and then stopped, pointing in one direction. Just to be sure, Livia threw the knife again. The blade spun in place and stopped in the same direction once more.

‘This is the way.’

With unsteady legs, Livia walked in the direction the blade indicated. Behind her, three pairs of golden eyes secretly followed.



How long had she walked?

An indeterminate amount of time had passed. Fortunately, despite all the walking, she didn’t feel particularly thirsty, hungry, or sleepy.

Though she felt nothing, she sensed that her soul was gradually wearing away. To keep from going mad, Livia began talking to herself. Or perhaps she had already started going mad the moment she began talking to herself.

“That cursed sea god… How could he kill a person by exploding them? Does he take suffering lightly just because he can’t die? All I did was scratch his hand a little…!”

Her main topics were curses directed at Triton, who had exploded her, and the villagers.

Other memories were filled with happiness, so recalling them threatened to make her burst into tears, and she had to cherish them carefully.

“Those bad people! Damn Maya. That Damn Phedum! How could a madman do such things to an animal…? What’s the shepherd god doing, not punishing that Damn?”

Livia, who had been walking endlessly, stopped in front of a narrow, yellow river. Though it was called a river, it was so narrow it didn’t seem very deep.

‘Can I just cross it?’

It was hard to gauge because she couldn’t see the bottom clearly. As she approached the river to check the depth, Livia suddenly stopped.

“…I think I heard an animal sound just now.”

Unable to turn around, she listened again with an uneasy heart but heard nothing.

In that moment of hesitation, something suddenly leaped out of the river a few steps ahead.



It was a fish. But it was no ordinary fish; it was a grotesque creature with a human face and beastly teeth.

Click! Click! Click! Click!

The fish lunged with its sharp teeth bared, fixing its hungry, gleaming eyes on Livia. Its gaze was full of an intense craving to consume her at once.

“Ugh…!”

Covering her mouth to suppress the rising nausea, Livia, pale-faced, dashed upstream. She couldn’t turn back, so she had to find a detour. The hideous fish leaped from the water several times to follow her. Unfortunately, the cloth that had been tied was loose, and the chain tangled around her ankle felt heavy.

Was her limping due to fear or exhaustion?

But there was no time to be struggling. She had to find another path quickly.

How long had she walked again? When she reached a point where the river was narrower and clearer, the fish were no longer in sight. Livia lifted her skirt and carefully crossed the river.

On the other side, the landscape changed completely. Previously, she had been walking through a dusty wasteland, but beyond the river were many low stone mountains.

The water flowing through the narrow path was now closer to a stream than a river.

‘If I just get over that mountain…’

A sharp spire was visible beyond the sheer stone mountains. As she gathered her strength to take a step forward.

A distant sound of a ‘bird’ reached her ears. It was the first sound of life she had heard since entering the underworld.

Where is it? Up ahead…?

Startled, Livia looked around for the source of the sound. It wasn’t hard to find. There was a forest right ahead on the narrow path.

It was then.

“Aaah…!”

A scream.

A scream echoed.

The forest, tinged with dark green, shook uneasily, and several black birds urgently flew up from the trees.

‘There’s something there.’

Something very dangerous…

But even so, it wasn’t as if she could turn back and find another path now.

“The underworld is a place where you must not look back. Focus only on the spire and move forward! Even if you turn back, do not look back. Remember!”

A place where one must not look back.

The underworld was a realm where returning was impossible, even if you strayed onto the wrong path.

Livia took a deep breath and hid behind a large rock.

She feared she might hear that scream again or that something might leap out, causing another fright.

Sure enough, it wasn’t long before something rushed out of the forest.

A figure with long hair, indistinguishable as male or female…

…A person? No, they weren’t human.

They had black skin, hair darker than the night sky, and eyes sewn shut with red thread.

These were nymphs, death nymphs who lived solely in this underworld, fleeing with terrified expressions.

“They haven’t been seen for so long… Why now…!”

“Quick, run…”

“Hagens got caught… stalling for time…!”

“Save me!”

Livia swallowed dryly as she watched the direction in which the nymphs vanished.

What on earth could be in there to frighten the death nymphs so much?

Her heart felt heavy with anxiety. She couldn’t turn back, and the only path to the spire lay ahead.

What should she do? How should she proceed? Her worry was so intense that she imagined her head aching.

Livia sighed heavily, pressing her cold hand against her forehead.

That wretched witch. She had promised not to let her die, yet hadn’t fulfilled a single promise completely. If she had warned her that she’d have to walk back from the underworld on her own, she would have been more cautious.

Anger flared up suddenly, but regret always came too late. Livia pressed her forehead with her fist and sighed, leaning against the rock.

Well, there was no other choice. She’d have to wait until the ‘dangerous thing’ lurking in there disappeared.

Livia leaned her throbbing head against the rock and closed her eyes.

Count sheep.

For Livia, thinking of sheep was effortless. Since birth, she had seen sheep every day. Among them were old sheep and young lambs.

‘…Bellani.’

A young lamb born with brown wool, unlike the others with white. The lamb she had delivered with her own hands, the one she felt so fondly about, was especially missed today.

That little one used to fearlessly follow Mumu around…

With a faint smile, Livia unknowingly drifted into a light sleep.



…Bark!

Startled by the sudden sound of a beast, Livia, who hadn’t even realized she had fallen asleep, opened her eyes wide.

‘I must be crazy, falling asleep in the underworld!’

She jumped up and looked around, relieved to see nothing had changed.

She thought she wasn’t tired, but perhaps she was. Livia calmed her racing heart and slapped her cheeks to shake off the sleepiness.

“How much time has passed?”

In a place devoid of the sounds of the living or sunlight, predicting time was not easy.

The world of the dead was incredibly still.

Was time only valuable to the living?

Or was it the least consideration for the dead, who had to endure ‘eternity’ without reincarnation?

Livia shook her head to clear away unnecessary thoughts. She wasn’t in a position to ponder the workings of the world.



Livia looked up at the cloudy sky with dark eyes.

If she were to defeat Triton… perhaps the sky of the place where she might have to endure ‘eternity’ would be there.

Livia took a deep breath and lowered her heavy eyelids. When she raised them again, the gloom from before had vanished without a trace.

Once you stepped onto the path of death, you don’t look back.

“…Let’s go.”

Yes, just like the rules of this underworld.

She couldn’t afford to spend endless time here.

Though the old man hadn’t specified when she should reach the distant spire, lingering wouldn’t be wise.

Most importantly, the wound on her wrist was growing increasingly painful. It felt like a burning sensation, as if it were begging to be taken away from here immediately.

The golden knife given by the witch was something extraordinary. This pain surely wasn’t without reason.

After pressing and rubbing the wound on her wrist for a while, Livia stood up abruptly.

It was time to move.



The inside of the forest was a world completely different from what Livia had expected.

A shallow stream trickled by, looking clear and clean, and it was so bright and cheerful that it was hard to believe there was no sunlight. It was as if she could believe she was above ground.

“…Where on earth is this?”

Livia cautiously moved deeper, following the upstream of the river.

It seemed like she could quickly pass through the forest if she kept going like this. Fortunately, she no longer heard the unsettling scream from earlier.

Hurrying along, Livia stopped at the source of the trickling stream. There stood a statue of a goddess, incongruous with the dense forest.

‘A statue of a goddess here…?’

Approaching cautiously, she saw letters at the base of the beautiful statue.

To the truthful one,

Can you swear by my name?

Livia’s eyes widened. The river of hatred and the symbol of oaths.

Styx.

‘…Is this river the River Styx?’

Gazing up at the goddess, Livia knelt and kissed the top of the goddess’s foot. With a trembling voice, she earnestly whispered a plea.

“Goddess, please allow this humble one to immerse herself briefly in your waters. I will never forget this grace.”

Whispering devoutly, Livia took out the golden knife from her wrist, which felt as if it were burning. The sharp blade instantly cut through Livia’s hair.

She carefully placed her cut hair down and waited for a moment.

Then, from somewhere, a bright red bird flew in a circle over Livia’s head and perched on the goddess’s shoulder.

What is that? Livia looked at the bird with curious eyes and gasped in surprise.

A bird with empty eyes, a white beak inscribed with black letters, and only one leg instead of two was certainly no ordinary bird.

Its eyeless gaze fixed on Livia, then it tilted its head.

The incarnation of the goddess Styx!

As Livia stared blankly, the bird circled over her head once more and then flew off somewhere.

The owner of the river had given permission. There was no time to waste. Without hesitation, Livia removed her clothes and stepped into the river.

Splash—

Even though she only dipped her feet, the coldness was enough to make her whole body freeze.

Her teeth chattered from the cold, but she clenched her jaw and waded further into the water.

“Livia, have you ever heard that to reach the underworld, you must cross nine bends and five rivers?”

“Yes! The River of Sorrow, Acheron, the River of Lamentation, Cocytus, the River of Fire, Phlegethon, the River of Forgetfulness, Lete, and the River of Hatred, Styx!”

“Oh, my clever daughter. You remember. Do you also recall the story of the hero who gained a body as strong as steel by bathing in the River Styx?”

“Of course, ah, Achilles… Achilles!”

Her father laughed as he patted Livia’s head, which was chirping like a bird.

The ill-fated hero who died with an arrow in his heel, the only part not dipped in the Styx…

Myths often contained exaggerations, and they might be tales spun by gossipmongers, but there was no harm in taking heed.

Her story, too, swept into the underworld by the god of the sea, might seem like an unbelievable myth or a fabrication to someone.

“Livia, that doesn’t mean the River Styx isn’t dangerous. It’s still a river of the underworld. If the living drink from it, they will die instantly, so if you ever find yourself in the underworld, never let it touch your lips.”

“Oh, come on, father! What’s going to take me to the underworld? Even if I go, Lete and I will go together, so don’t worry.”

“Ha ha. True. I’ll probably go to the underworld before you do, so I’ll be waiting.”

“No, father! Don’t die! You can’t leave us behind!”

“I’m not dying, I’m not dying! If I go, it’ll be after I see my Livia meet a good person, get married, and give me cute grandchildren.”

“What? No, dad! I don’t want to get married. I hate marriage. Don’t make me get married. Waaah!”

Her father, looking at Livia, who burst into tears, picked her up and comforted her.

Even though you said we’d live together forever…

Recalling her childhood, Livia’s teeth chattered with cold. She fought back tears, steeling her eyes, and moved deeper into the water.

However, no matter how far she went, it only reached her waist. The water level was too shallow to immerse her entire body. Livia scooped up water with her trembling hands and poured it over her heart.

Careful not to let the droplets enter her mouth, she poured the river water over her left shoulder as well.

Keeeeng!

A chilling scream brushed against the back of Livia’s neck. She quickly turned her head to survey her surroundings but saw nothing.

It felt ominous.

Instinctively sensing danger, Livia sliced through the water and leaped toward the rock where she had left her clothes.

Bang!

A massive black arrow grazed Livia’s forearm.



Suppressing a groan, Livia clutched her right forearm, where a burning pain coursed through her.

But there was no time to be startled or confused. Someone was targeting her.

Gritting her teeth, Livia sprang out of the water. She snatched her clothes from the rock and ran without looking back.

However, no matter how fast she ran, she couldn’t outrun the arrows flying toward her. This time, an arrow with a sharp trajectory pierced straight through Livia’s shoulder.

“…Ha, ugh!”

She bit down hard to stifle a scream, but her legs gave way beneath her. Stumbling briefly, Livia desperately searched for a place to hide.

Behind a twisted tree, she spotted a small crevice in the rocks, just big enough for her to crouch and conceal herself.

Livia crawled over and barely managed to hide, lowering her breathing.

‘Could it be the guardians of the underworld? Who are they?’

The worst-case scenario crossed her mind, but she quickly dismissed it. If they were sent by Hades, the death fairies wouldn’t have fled in such fear. Weren’t they also startled when ‘that thing’ suddenly appeared?

So what on earth was attacking her? What kind of entity exuded such a chilling and eerie aura?

‘Of all places, an arrow struck the shoulder that wasn’t immersed in the river…’

Clenching her mouth shut to endure the pain, Livia reached with trembling hands to feel the wound on her shoulder. But then.

‘…It’s gone?’

The arrow was missing. She had no memory of pulling it out, yet the shoulder where it should have been embedded was empty.

‘It definitely hit, so why isn’t it there?’

As she probed the wound, the spot where the arrow had lodged bubbled and gushed Blood, like it was infused with poison.

While it was fortunate that the cumbersome arrow was gone, it was a strange occurrence. Moreover, the state of the wound was alarming.

Livia leaned against the rock to catch her breath and scanned her surroundings.

There was no sound. No further signs of movement could be detected. Though she couldn’t let her guard down, the bubbling wound on her shoulder was deteriorating, making her anxious.

Livia grasped her shoulder with trembling hands. If the decaying area spreads, she might die once more in the afterlife. Death in the afterlife meant complete annihilation…

Biting her lip hard, Livia drew out the golden knife.

If she was going to die…

‘I’ll cut it off.’

Livia, drenched in cold sweat, took a deep breath and raised the knife high above her shoulder.

“Cut it off?”



She had thought she was alone, but suddenly a voice interrupted.

Clamping her lips shut to stifle a scream, she quickly looked up at the shadow looming over her head.

And there it was.

“It’ll hurt.”

…Darkness.

‘What is that?’

Livia doubted her eyes as she stared at the man.

If death had a form, wouldn’t it look like this?

Long black hair cascaded down his shoulders, and his eyes shimmered strangely like it was dusted with gold. A pitch-black chiton exposed one shoulder…

The man was stunningly beautiful, seemingly out of this world, yet there was something chilling and bizarre about him.

It wasn’t just the dark red stains spread messily beneath his leisurely and indifferent expression that made him unsettling.

Though his face appeared somewhat bored as he gazed down at Livia, his eyes keenly calculated the moment to tear her apart. He even smiled, seemingly hoping she’d let her guard down, but he was undoubtedly intent on Killing her. The sharp intent to kill sent shivers down Livia’s spine.

“You’re a type I haven’t seen before… What are you?”

The man asked the question Livia herself wanted to ask him.

His dark gaze traveled from the crown of her head, down her pale face, the slender body barely covered by her clothes, and her white legs.

Finally, it stopped at her ankle wrapped in chains. The cloth she had used to hide the chains had vanished without her noticing.

“You…”

In an instant, his previously bored eyes changed. He swiftly approached and grabbed Livia’s ankle.

“What are you doing!”

Her slender leg was pulled apart by his rough grip. Livia struggled, pale with fear, but his grip on her ankle was absurdly strong.

The more she struggled, the tighter his grip became.

“A rebel… You’re a rebel.”

“…What?”

“This chain is a mark of someone who has harmed a god. Since it’s only on one leg, it seems it wasn’t a fatal blow… Interesting. Which god did you offend?”

A mark of someone who harmed a god? She had never imagined the chain on her ankle had such a meaning.

Regardless, the man’s expression changed as he observed her ankle with interest.

He furrowed his brows and stared at Livia intently, as if he had discovered something strange.

That tense moment.

“I think I’ve found something very interesting…”

His murmured words sent a chill through her.

Livia glanced at the golden knife in her hand as she braced herself against the ground.

Whoever he was, this knife was supposed to be able to harm gods, and she intended to use it if necessary.

Then it happened.

The world spun, and suddenly her back slammed into the ground.

“Ahhh!”

Her shoulder, where the arrow had struck, was crushed against the dirt, and excruciating pain pierced through the wound.

As she gasped in agony and curled up, the man climbed on top of her and, while she was panting, wrapped his hands around her neck.

“You’re still warm.”

“What are you…!”

“So, you’re still alive.”

His words confused Livia. Alive? Then why was she here in the underworld?

As he gazed steadily into her trembling eyes, he cupped her cheek with one hand, seeming pleased.

“Alive… truly alive.”

“What nonsense… Ugh!”

When Livia began to struggle to escape his eerie touch, he pinned her shoulders down with both hands, restraining her.

“Wait. Stay still. You might want to put that strange knife away too. Without me, you could vanish at any moment.”

He glanced at the golden knife clutched tightly in Livia’s hand. She defiantly gripped it even tighter.

His lips twisted into a smirk, as if amused by her defiance.

“Listen carefully. My arrow has seeped into your body. It’s a poisoned arrow, and if you don’t remove it before the poison spreads throughout your body, you’ll die. In just a few seconds.”

Startled, Livia stopped resisting and glared at him.

If the vanished arrow had indeed ‘seeped’ in as he claimed, it was likely not a lie. The wound bubbling like it was filled with poison supported his words…

Reluctantly, Livia lowered the golden knife. Following her will, the knife disappeared back into the wound, and the man grinned innocently, seemingly satisfied.

“At least you’re not completely stupid.”

Just as Livia was about to snap, the man flipped her over with a powerful force. Before she could scream, fingers as cold as the waters of the Styx traced the wound where the arrow had struck.

The spot where the arrow had seeped in felt like it was freezing, and suddenly, she sensed something being drawn out.

“Hmph!”

“It’s done.”

She gritted her teeth to suppress a scream, but enduring the wave of pain proved difficult. Tears streamed down her cheeks uncontrollably.

“You held on well; impressive.”

A damnable laugh echoed.

Breathing heavily, Livia ground her teeth as she lay on her stomach.

In that moment, the man’s hand, which had been touching her wound, began to glide down her smooth back.



What was he trying to do?

His hand moved incessantly over her tense back, and then he abruptly flipped Livia onto her back.

Livia hastily covered herself with the fabric she held, but it was impossible to conceal everything.

His bare gaze swept over her white, sand-smeared body. As Livia glared fiercely with tear-filled eyes, she felt a jolt of shock.

‘Those eyes…?’

In the pitch-black pupils, like a starless night sky, golden lightning crackled.

It wasn’t a metaphor; it truly looked that way.

She recognized those eyes.

They belonged to Triton, the sea god who had killed her.

The difference was that instead of darkness and lightning, they held waves and storms.

‘Could it be that he’s a god too?’

Livia examined the man more closely.

He was at least two heads taller than her, with a build as solid as a bear, yet his face was delicate.

His expression was as innocent as a boy’s, yet his eyes were sharp like a fierce hunter’s, his hands cold and stained with Blood…

Everything about him felt somehow twisted and misaligned. A contradiction or disparity. He was a man who fit perfectly with such concepts.

While Livia thoroughly examined him, the man was also observing her. The difference was that while she glared at him with her eyes, he was touching her with his hands.

“Warm.”

The cold hand that had been caressing Livia’s cheek moved down to her neck.

As he stroked her neck, which rose and fell with her heavy breathing, he buried his nose in her nape and inhaled deeply.

“…It even has a scent.”

A scent? What scent?

Livia was bewildered by his words. She had no idea how many days had passed since she arrived in the underworld. She hadn’t washed once and had been rolling in the dirt, so where could this scent possibly be coming from?

‘Is he crazy?’

Livia frowned deeply, but the man with his head buried in her neck didn’t notice. The cold tip of his nose brushing against her collarbone sent a shiver through her.

Livia slowly steadied her breathing and acted cautiously.

She sensed that if she moved recklessly and provoked him, she might vanish right there.

‘How do I escape?’

She worried about dying at his hands, but she was equally concerned about being captured by the king of the underworld. It felt suffocating not to have a clear plan, as if a net was closing in from all sides.

She needed to find a way. A way…

While she racked her brain, the hand that had been exploring her bare skin slipped to her side and wrapped around her waist like a snake.

Just as she thought she was having trouble breathing, the arm encircling her tightened.

“Hmph!”

“Ah, warm. Warm. So warm…”

The hands that held her grew rougher, like it was fueled by excitement.

His head, which had been inhaling the scent of her neck, slid down to hover around her collarbone, and then, suddenly, he opened his mouth wide and bit into her white neck.

“Ah, it hurts!”

Livia cried out urgently, feeling as if her flesh was truly being bitten into. The man, who had been mindlessly biting her, immediately stopped. He looked up at her blankly, then slowly rubbed the Blood rising from the bite marks on her neck with his lips and apologized.

“Sorry, I just meant to have a taste…”

Livia was bewildered by his sudden apology, especially since he had just tried to kill her without a second thought.

What on earth was this madman? Livia asked, clutching her throbbing neck.

“Do you bite people to eat them raw?”

“Not usually, but with you…”

He paused for a moment, gazing down at Livia. His eyes deepened as they traveled from her flushed cheeks and parted lips to her small chin and slender neck. He licked his dry lips like he was savoring the taste and uttered chilling words.

“You just looked delicious…”

The way he spoke, with eyes that seemed ready to devour her, sent a shiver down her spine. Livia glared at him with tense eyes, feeling the pulse in her bitten neck quicken beneath her sweat-dampened palms.

“Don’t be so tense. I won’t kill you if you stay still.”

“…So, if I don’t stay still, you’ll kill me?”

The man, still looking down at her, nodded with a childlike smile.

“Probably. So just stay still. Don’t provoke me.”

He was definitely crazy. Watching him smile while his eyes remained unchanged only confirmed it. The only solace was that he seemed a bit more polite than before.

Livia, biting her lip, asked again in a trembling voice, “What are you going to do to me?”

“I want to keep smelling that nice scent from you.”

“That’s all…?”

“And I want to touch you, maybe…”

The man, speaking with the eyes of a predator, smiled excitedly and whispered.

“Even taste you.”

His face, openly expressing his emotions, seemed innocent at first glance but was terrifying upon closer inspection.

A red alert flashed in Livia’s mind as she sensed the danger.

‘What should I do? I just need to hold on a little longer…’

Once she got out of this forest, she would find the tower the old man had mentioned. The old man had been sent by Echidna, the witch who promised to save her from the underworld.

So, if she reached that spire, she might survive. No, she was sure she would.

If only she could get through this moment.

A cold hand climbed up her tense thigh. The hand that touched her flat stomach moved to just below her chest, which rose and fell heavily with her breathing.

‘…Do I really have to stay still like this?’

She trembled with humiliation and shame, but it wasn’t enough to risk death. Besides, this body wasn’t even her real living body, was it?

She felt confused about whether she should treat matters in the underworld with the same seriousness as in the living world, despite having the same sensations.

“Amazing. It’s especially soft here.”

The man, speaking in awe, gripped her soft chest firmly with his large hand. She flinched and glared at him, but he was too absorbed in her feeling her body to notice.

His gentle and detailed touch continuously rubbed and kneaded her chest. She clenched her teeth to avoid feeling any stimulation, but without realizing it, her chest reacted to the surprisingly gentle touch. A smile appeared on the man’s lips.

“This is cute.”

Then, without hesitation, he pinched Livia’s nipple.



Livia, her face flushed red, couldn’t hold back and resisted. The fact that she felt something from this stirred a feeling beyond shame.

“I said stop it. I don’t like it!”

“I told you, if you resist, I’ll kill you.”

And as if to prove he could do it, he began to subdue her with an unseen force.

A dark, damp power pressed heavily on her like a rock. Though invisible, it was undeniably present. It was an instinctual fear, the most terrifying thing for the living.

It was the fear of death.

Livia glared at him, pale with fear. As the fear took hold, a sense of humiliation surged within her. Tears welled up in her reddened eyes and rolled down her white cheeks.

The man, looking down at her, tilted his head in confusion and asked, “Why are you crying? I haven’t even killed you yet.”

“…I am so frustrated. I feel so pathetic for being powerless. I hate myself for cowering under threats. And I hate ‘you’ for making me this way.”

“‘You’?”

Beings that were not human.

Those who looked down on humans and regarded them as insects.

Supreme beings with overwhelming power.

Those who trampled on human frailty without a care, laughing at them….

You, the gods.

“It was terrible to think I had to be manipulated even in death.”

Tears finally burst forth, streaming down her face. The man watched Livia silently as she cried without making a sound. Gently, he reached out and wiped away the tears that had gathered at the corners of her eyes.

But soon, another droplet formed in her eyes. As if he were mesmerized, the man wiped away the tear again. The sight of the warm, transparent liquid continuously welling up from her eyes captivated him.

Beautiful. Truly beautiful….

Even the glare she directed at him in annoyance was so lovely that it made his head feel hot. That piercing gaze seemed to cut through his heart. His whole body tingled, and a dull ache settled in his lower abdomen. He felt his arousal rising.

The man thought he wanted to keep seeing those hot, transparent tears. He felt he could watch them for days on end.

Should he? Upon reflection, there was no reason he couldn’t. He just needed to capture her, not kill her. Although he had never done it before, it wasn’t impossible. It was a difficult task, but if it meant he could keep seeing this, he thought it was worth trying.

However, there was one problem.

The man’s gaze shifted to the top of Livia’s head. He reached out and wrapped his hand around something, whispering softly.

“You’re not dead yet.”

The fact that her life thread hadn’t been severed troubled him. He pondered what he should do. If he cut it now, her warmth would disappear. But if he didn’t sever it and kept her, he would inevitably be discovered by the king or queen. The living couldn’t remain in the underworld, so she would have to be sent back….

So, did that mean he had to kill her after all? But it seemed such a waste….

Livia, not fully understanding his words, blinked in disbelief and suddenly exclaimed.

“What are you talking about? I’m dead. All my bones shattered, and my insides exploded.”

“Really? But you’re still alive.”

He brought what was wrapped around his finger in front of Livia’s eyes to show her. It was hard to see at first, but as a black smoke rose from the man’s fingertips along a long, thin line, a shining white thread became visible.

“See? This is your life thread. It’s still connected up there. The dead don’t have this.”

Life thread, a thread connected above…. Could it be?

Livia looked back and forth between the man and the white thread in his hand, disbelief etched on her face.

“Those old folks don’t make mistakes like this. If you were dead, they would’ve definitely cut it.”

The man mumbled and then let go of the thread with a flick of his hand. He then looked at her intently and said, “Do you believe me now? So come on, cry again.”

“…What?”

“Cry. Let’s see more tears.”

Perhaps due to her surprise, her tears had stopped. The man frowned as he looked at Livia’s drying eyes.

“Why aren’t you crying?”

What the hell was this Damn…?

She glared at him incredulously, and he tilted his head before he squeezed her exposed chest like he was trying to wring it.

“Ah! What are you doing!”

“I told you to cry.”

“What am I supposed to do if they won’t come out?”

“Really? Then I’ll make you cry.”

With a chilling tone, the man lowered his head and bit down hard on Livia’s shoulder.

“Ugh!”

A scream of pain erupted from her. As if he were unsatisfied, the man slid his lips down and bit harshly into Livia’s chest, which he had been kneading as if it would burst. Livia shuddered from the pain that felt like her chest was being torn apart, pinching and pushing his shoulder away.

“It hurts! Stop it! I said stop…! It hurts!”

Her desperate cries of agony echoed through the silent forest.

It was then that the sound of footsteps came rushing toward them with fierce urgency. The man paused and looked up, just as a gray beast leapt and sank its teeth into his side.



The metallic scent of Blood filled the air.

Grrr!

A fierce growl that sounded like it was tearing through vocal cords echoed chillingly.

“It’s you again.”

The man, recognizing the beast, muttered in an annoyed tone.

A fearsome dog with three heads, though still small as if it were young—it was Cerberus.

The young Cerberus was covered in Blood. One of its three heads was already crushed and limp, while the remaining two were in such a condition that it was hard to say they were intact.

However, what shocked her more than its horrific appearance was the familiarity of the little beast’s face, fiercely biting Zagreus’s thigh and forearm with its underdeveloped teeth.

That creature, that little monster, was….

“…Mumu?”

Because it was her family.

Yelp! Yap! Yapyap!

The man pried the young Cerberus off his thigh with one hand and threw it to the ground. He tossed it so roughly that young Mumu writhed in pain, letting out a whimper.

At that moment, sparks flew from Livia’s eyes. She couldn’t bear the thought of losing Mumu again right before her eyes.

With a strength she didn’t know she possessed, she pushed the man away and wrapped Mumu in her arms. Then she shouted sharply at the approaching man.

“Don’t kill it! If you kill it, I’ll kill you too!”

“…Kill me? You? How? Do you have a way?”

The man asked back, like he was genuinely curious. His head tilted slightly, and his eyes sparkled with interest, but he didn’t seem to be mocking or ridiculing her.

A way? If she had known such a way, she would have killed the god of the sea first. She didn’t really know how, but she had to make some kind of threat to protect Mumu.

Even though she was blinded by revenge enough to come to the underworld, she was aware of how insignificant and worthless she was compared to these divine beings.

However… there were moments when one couldn’t back down.

Even if, as the man said, her soul were to vanish, Livia felt she had to be defiant at that moment.

Yelp… Whimper.

Because she had to protect her family, the dog that had died for her.

She felt the rough tongue licking her wrist. Everything in the underworld was cold, yet Mumu’s tongue remained warm.

With tear-soaked eyes, Livia looked at Mumu. Its teeth had grown, and its once-soft fur had become stiff, but this monster was undoubtedly Mumu.

The small creature that always looked at her so warmly.

The loyal dog that had protected her until its death, her eternal puppy.

“…So it was you, barking all along, right?”

Livia looked at the puppy with a sad smile. Whispering tenderly in her quavering voice, she hugged the wounded dog tightly, stroking it gently.

More important than how it had ended up like this or how it had gotten hurt was the fact that she was willing to sacrifice herself for Mumu, who had died protecting her.

That one thing.

With determination, Livia hugged Mumu tightly and glared fiercely at the man.

But for some reason, the man, who had seemed ready to tear her and Mumu apart at any moment, was now just staring at them. Tilting his head in curiosity, he watched her holding Mumu tightly, as if he found it fascinating….

After observing them for a while, the man suddenly spoke, “I don’t die.”

“What?”

“Death can’t threaten me. It’s been that way since I was born.”

Mumbling, he approached Livia and Mumu, kneeling to meet their gaze.

Then, like he was expecting something, he said something strange.

“So, try a different threat.”

What could it be? She felt like this man wanted something.

Feeling both flustered and desperate to find an answer, Livia racked her brain.

“Warm.”

“I want to keep touching.”

“There’s a scent.”

“If you stay still, I won’t kill you.”

The words the man had spoken flashed through her mind. And now, what he was looking at was also Mumu, nestled in her arms.

‘Could it be…?’

It might be wrong, but it didn’t matter. It was better to try something than to sit idly and die in vain.

Licking her dry lips, she cautiously spoke in the softest voice she could muster, “Do you want a hug?”

The man’s previously expressionless eyes twitched slightly. He seemed to bite his lips tightly, like he was suppressing some emotion.

Livia observed him carefully and spoke again in a gentle voice, “Would you like me to hold you tightly, warmly, like the puppy nestled in my arms?”

The man’s chest, which had been calm, swelled as he took a deep breath. Watching him inhale deeply, Livia offered her final bait.

“You said you liked my warmth. If you don’t harm Mumu, I’ll give you a hug. As much as you want.”

Was this really what he wanted? Could she persuade him with something so simple? The odds were fifty-fifty, but Livia decided to trust her instincts. After all, it had worked with Triton.

She held her breath, watching for his reaction. Finally, he slowly nodded and spoke.

“Alright, fine.”

Relief washed over her, and Livia bit her lower lip to keep from sighing with relief.

“…You promise not to harm him, right?”

She asked again for confirmation, and the man nodded once more, as if he had become a gentle ‘dog.’

Whimper—

Mumu, now a young Cerberus, rubbed its head against Livia’s thigh, looking at her with concern.

Livia reassured Mumu by stroking its head and then carefully set the puppy down beside her.

She spread her arms toward the man standing awkwardly and asked, “By the way, what’s your name?”



“…If you don’t want to tell me, that’s fine.”

Livia then approached the man, who had come near without any defenses, and hugged him tightly.

It was almost comical how he had seemed ready to pounce on her, yet now he stood stiff as a board when she pulled him close.

However, she put aside any stray thoughts. This wasn’t the time for such feelings. Livia simply embraced him, offering her warmth.

She felt his chest expand and contract roughly, and his breathing became ragged, as if he were trying to steady it.

After a while, he whispered in a small voice, “Zagreus.”

“…What?”

“…Zagreus.”

She pondered for a moment, trying to make sense of his words, and realized that was his name.

Zagreus.

…What kind of god is he? I’ve never heard of him.

No matter how much she searched her mind, she couldn’t recall ever hearing the name of this god. Well, there were so many gods in the world, it wasn’t possible to know them all.

“What’s your name?”

“I’m Livia. Livia Horn.”

“Livia Horn… Livia, Horn.”

As Zagreus murmured her name repeatedly, as if he was trying to memorize it, he suddenly jerked his head around, startled, and glared somewhere with a fierce look.

A black mist, exuding a terrifying power, surrounded Livia as if to hide her. Mumu, who had been lying down, suddenly rose and bared its teeth toward the shadowy forest.

“What, what’s happening all of a sudden?”

When Livia, who couldn’t sense anything, turned her gaze to where they were looking, she saw two daemons (lesser gods) in black hoods appear.

Zagreus stepped forward as if to shield Livia and spoke harshly.

“You’ve got some nerve entering my hunting grounds without permission. Do you want to become my prey?”

The daemons hesitated upon seeing Zagreus but soon spoke, as if they had no choice.

“Our master has ordered us to find and bring that woman.”

“This woman is my prey. I’ll report to the king myself, so you should withdraw.”

At Zagreus’s retort, the daemons fell silent for a moment. They seemed taken aback, but it was hard to read any expression on their eyeless, gray faces.

Soon, one of the daemons spoke in a slightly firmer voice, “That is not possible. The woman does not belong to the underworld. She disrupts the order.”

Someone who doesn’t belong to the underworld….

At those words, Livia recalled what Zagreus had told her earlier.

‘You’re not dead yet.’

…Was he telling the truth? Am I really alive?

What surprised Livia, who widened her eyes in disbelief, was Zagreus’s next words.

“If that’s the case, there’s no choice. I’ll have to make her part of the underworld.”

Zagreus muttered ominously and turned to look at Livia.

Sensing something unusual in his gaze, Livia watched as Zagreus bit into his own hand, drawing Blood.

Crunch!

He bit so hard that more than half of his finger was nearly severed, yet he seemed unfazed. The dark red Blood gushed from the wound, dripped down his hand and wrist, and splattered onto the ground.

But what was more shocking was that he grabbed Livia’s chin and tried to force her to drink the Blood.

“What are you doing…. Ugh!”

Horrified, Livia clamped her mouth shut and leaned back, but his grip was too strong. The daemons, who seemed as surprised as Livia, quickly rushed in to restrain Zagreus.

“No, Zagreus! The queen is looking for her!”

The man’s body, which seemed unstoppable, suddenly halted. His restrained arm trembled, and Zagreus’s Blood dripped down Livia’s chin and into the hollow of her throat. The daemons sighed in relief, but Zagreus’s face twisted in frustration.

The queen’s orders….

Even Zagreus couldn’t defy them. His hand, which had been gripping Livia’s chin so tightly that it left red marks, slowly released. His face, pale and drawn, bore the tangled expressions of a wounded child and a man angry at having something taken from him.

Sensing his diminished resolve, the daemons hurriedly grabbed Livia’s arms. They needed to act quickly, as Zagreus’s mood could change at any moment.

“Let’s go! There’s no time to waste.”

“Ugh…!”

As she was being dragged away, Livia felt a chilling gaze on the back of her head and turned to look.

Zagreus….

The mysterious god of death stood there, silently watching her. When their eyes met, he gazed at her with calm eyes before suddenly stretching his lips into a smile.

‘See you again, Livia.’

His Blood-soaked hand moved lightly in the air. The sight of him, smiling with delight and whispering about meeting again with such a bloodied appearance, was more than terrifying—it was grotesque.

He was someone she never wanted to encounter again.

 The Queen of the Underworld stood atop a massive rock, gazing at the world divided in two. To the right lay the fields of Elysion, while to the left stretched the realm leading to Tartarus. In between was a vast forest that belonged neither here nor there.

The ‘human woman’ was being escorted through that forest by daemons on her way here.

As the goddess narrowed her eyes, she spotted a black-haired man standing in the depths of the forest, glaring at her.

A lineage too noble to discard yet too base to embrace…

Zagreus, the forsaken god of the underworld, born from her womb but denied a mother’s recognition.

The goddess quietly observed him with an expressionless face before withdrawing her gaze.

The daemons had brought the woman before her. With a kind smile, she welcomed Livia.

“Welcome, *Kore (maiden or daughter, Persephone’s affectionate nickname). Perhaps it is fortunate that you came here while Hades is away… He truly dislikes such luck.”

“…This humble human greets the goddess.”

Livia, feeling tense, bowed her head deeply in greeting.

Though she had not encountered many gods, the goddess before her exuded an aura distinctly different from anyone she had ever met.

Warm yet cold, strangely familiar yet utterly foreign…

The Queen of the Underworld, Persephone.

As if she truly traversed between the living and the dead, she embodied the energies of both the world above and below.

Feeling an inexplicable awe, Livia instinctively bowed her head in respect.

“I’m in a good mood today, so I’ll personally guide you. I’ve been feeling a bit nostalgic for the outside.”

The goddess walked ahead, and the spirits of death nudged Livia to follow her.

As they walked, something wondrous happened. With each step the goddess took, the ground seemed to carry her forward effortlessly.

It was as if the path opened wherever she wished to go.

Was this the power of the goddess who rules the underworld…?

Livia, her eyes wide with surprise, glanced at the ground moving beneath her feet.

Meanwhile, the Queen of the Underworld spoke to her again.

“It’s fascinating. That young Cerberus was once your dog… How far did the goddess of fate foresee?”

At the queen’s words, Livia looked at Mumu, who had been silently following her.

Three heads, a mouth charred black like it had been burned, and fur rippling like waves—though unfamiliar, it was still her faithful shepherd dog, Mumu, gazing at her with eyes full of trust and love.

Sensing her gaze, Mumu panted happily and rubbed its head against her palm.

“I heard the dog caught Cerberus’s eye because it died in a fire. Poor thing. It must have been so hot.”

The queen’s words brought back the memory of Mumu’s death to Livia, filling her with anger and causing her eyes to sting.

As the queen had said, she couldn’t even begin to imagine how painful it must have been.

Biting her lip to hold back tears, the queen turned to her with a smile.

“Despite drinking from the River Lete, it is a loyal dog that hasn’t forgotten you, so I will give it to you.”

“…What? What do you mean… Really?”

Surprised, Livia asked again, and the queen lazily smiled and caressed her cheek.

Then, she slowly reached out and pressed a spot beneath the disheveled front of Livia’s chiton.

It was right over the mark left by Zagreus’s Blood on her chest.

“It’s an apology for his rudeness. However, just because I give it to you doesn’t mean you can completely take it away. It is already bound to the underworld. But…”

The queen reached out and lifted Livia’s wrist, the one opposite the hand marked with a golden dagger.

“I will engrave a symbol on your wrist so you can call upon this young dog whenever you wish to see it. Anytime you need it.”

The queen placed her thumb on the hollow of Livia’s wrist.

With a sudden burning sensation, something was engraved on her wrist—a symbol of a pomegranate.

“It’s a token of promise in my name.”

With a gentle smile, she nudged Livia’s waist toward the cave entrance bathed in white light.

“Farewell, Livia.”



The sea and the underworld shared many similarities.

Most notably, they both harbored endless darkness, and unlike the sky or the earth, they were exclusive to the outside world.

The underworld, where secrets were cultivated in the soil, and the sea, where secrets were hidden beneath the waves—how could they not be alike?

Thus, the two worlds met secretly and discreetly.

Triton stood before a particularly dark part of the deep sea, a trench resembling an abyss, staring into the depths of darkness.

An endless black chasm, the labyrinth of Rubedike.

It was a place shunned by all sea creatures, yet a few reckless souls dared to enter, never to return.

Anyone sucked into that darkness would lose their way, swimming aimlessly in a realm devoid of light and sound until their life came to an end.

Echidna had fallen right there. He remembered clearly because he had pushed her into it with his own hands.

The memory of that day, when Echidna’s terrible screams were gradually swallowed by the pitch-black labyrinth, remained vivid in his mind.

‘But how did she survive?’

Triton thought of Echidna.

Her flowing black hair, red eyes, and peach-colored cheeks formed a beautiful face. She possessed a serpent’s lower body, resembling but distinctly different from a mermaid’s tail.

She was also the most devoted follower of the goddess of witchcraft, Hecate.

“I love you, Triton!”

If one were to be precise, she was something like a niece to him…

“So, just become mine willingly!”

As a consequence of her misguided greed, Echidna’s tail had been torn into eight pieces, and life had vanished from her once-proud face. The ‘Trident,’ which she had recklessly tried to grasp, had taken away her eternal life. Thus, she became a mortal instead of an immortal being.

“Oh, no. No!!”

He had believed she would drift in the darkness like any other living being and face eternal oblivion.

Yet she returned, and her blade, engraved on a human woman’s wrist, aimed for his heart.

…How had she come back? And why had she sent that ‘human woman’ to him?

As Triton wandered in the darkness, he recalled the hair that resembled bloodstains, faintly dispersing in the water.

The vivid redness that bloomed and then faded before his eyes.

Eyes like the green of fields, fiercely glaring at him with all their might. Skin that appeared resilient, perfectly tanned by the sun, and a sweet scent reminiscent of lukewarm warmth.

Everything about the woman defied the sea.

She was beautiful, but such beauty was common in the realm of gods, and her intensity was irritating, especially for a mere human.

Triton returned to his original thought.

Why had Echidna sent that human woman to him?

She wasn’t a nymph born of nature, but a weak human he despised and loathed.

A pathetic human woman who, even with that golden knife, could only manage to scratch the back of his hand.

There had to be a reason. Surely, some clear reason…

Without it, bringing back the human woman he had killed with his own hands would be a complete waste.

To exert effort on something useless was what Triton hated the most, especially for a human whom he detested and abhorred like a worm.

As Triton stared into the abyss-like darkness for a long time, a spray of water erupted around him.

Around him, two sharks that had been keeping watch rapidly circled, creating a turbulent swirl of bubbles.

“Sympho, Neo.”

At Triton’s call, the sea predators, each several times the size of a human, nuzzled him like they were mere pets.

Brrr—

The gills of the sharks quivered, releasing bubbles that sounded almost like whimpers.

When Triton gently rubbed the snout of Neo, the white shark, the black shark circling nearby tapped Triton’s back with its long snout, expressing its displeasure.

“Sympho, I told you not to get grumpy.”

Though his words were stern, his hand was gentle as it stroked the shark’s snout. The two massive sharks swirled around Triton, seemingly competing, making him feel slightly dizzy. They disliked the labyrinth of Rubedike and seemed eager to leave the area.

Triton turned away, remembering he had other matters to attend to elsewhere.

As he sliced through the water, the two sharks stayed close to him.

Their fins quivered with excitement, reveling in the sensation of speed. Triton grinned at their antics, enjoying their playful challenge.

“Where do you think you’re going?”

With a powerful kick, he propelled himself forward, leaving the sharks behind. They glared at him, their eyes narrowed in frustration, as he increased his speed once more.

The resistance of the water could not stop him. In fact, it seemed to propel him toward his destination.

With just a few strokes, he reached the black castle beyond the golden palace in the blink of an eye.

It was a place that existed but had never been properly utilized. Standing before it, he frowned in annoyance, running a hand through his hair in irritation.

The black castle was a prison.

It was designed to confine those who had sinned, yet it hadn’t been used in the past hundred years.

In this sea, if someone committed a crime, no matter what it was, the solution was simple: death.

Imprisonment as a form of punishment was not Triton’s way. If he hadn’t killed them, that would be one thing, but resurrecting the dead for questioning? He had killed many impulsively; why question it now?

Triton pondered deeply. If there was an exception, there had to be a reason.

There was only one plausible explanation.

‘The Golden Knife.’

As long as Chrysaor’s bloodline lived, the Golden Knife would continue to flow through their veins. He needed to retrieve that knife, said to be capable of harming gods, by completely eradicating that bloodline.

If he could use this woman as bait to lure out Echidna and retrieve the Golden Knife…

Yes, the effort he had made to resurrect a dead human from the underworld felt quite justified.



Triton gazed at the woman lying motionless in the pitch-black darkness.

Her eyes, hidden beneath closed lids, her small nose still faintly marked by sunlight, her lips beginning to regain color, and her fragile neck.

Like luminescent objects glowing brighter in the dark, her features faintly glowed, etching themselves into his vision.

Her shallow breaths, returning life to her, escaped through parted lips, whispering softly. In this place, under the water yet not truly submerged, her breaths reached him clearly.

As her life returned, her scent grew stronger. The soft, warm fragrance typical of land dwellers, somehow appetizing, teased his senses.

It was unsettling that he did not find this subtle fragrance unpleasant.

She was a fragile human who could die with just a slight display of his divine power, yet why did she bother him so much?

‘This might be your last chance.’

Someone whispered. It was clear who roamed freely in his mind, planting these whispers.

Fate, or perhaps temptation. Whatever it was, Triton was not inclined to feel such things for this insignificant human.

Impulsively, Triton reached out. Her slender neck, easily grasped with one hand, fit snugly in his palm.

The smooth texture of her skin tickled his cold fingertips. He felt the pulse of a beating vein and the warmth returning to her skin, proclaiming her life.

Just as he unconsciously tightened his grip,

“…Huh.”

The woman, who had been groaning, stirred and slowly lifted her eyelids. Her slightly dazed, yet not yet hostile green eyes captured his image.



Livia awoke to a pain that felt like her entire body was breaking.

However, even after opening her eyes, the world remained completely dark, making it impossible for her to distinguish between dream and reality. Only the heavy pain she felt on her skin provided a sense of reality to her hazy consciousness.

Where am I?

Livia tried to focus, opening and closing her heavy eyelids. She thought her vision was blurred because she couldn’t see anything, but no matter how hard she tried, the darkness wouldn’t lift.

These days, just waking up and getting her bearings felt like a task… Livia thought absentmindedly.

As she held her throbbing forehead and attempted to sit up, she suddenly twisted, feeling her breath constricted.

She couldn’t breathe properly; it felt as if something was choking her neck.

As her numb fingers fumbled over her constricted throat, she froze in place.

…A hand.

A smooth, cold hand like silk.

Livia slowly raised her trembling gaze. As she traced the faint silhouette obscured by darkness, she saw a pair of bright blue flames at the end.

No, no, those weren’t flames…

At that moment, with a faint sound, the darkness that filled the space vanished, and a soft light illuminated her surroundings.

The brightened view stung her eyes. She found herself staring directly into those blue eyes that had seemed like flames.

Her blurry green eyes gradually hardened in shock.

“How does it feel to come back from the dead?”

The terrifying voice that had driven her to death spoke to her again.

Startled, Livia glared at the man, who was frozen like ice. The only small comfort was that, perhaps because he wasn’t revealing his divine nature, he seemed less intimidating than the colossal figure she had encountered in the sea.

She bit her trembling lower lip hard.

I really have come back to life.

As she repeated this unbelievable fact to herself, her cheeks turned a faint pink.

Just as I have been resurrected, maybe my family can be brought back too. It seemed impossible, but she thought maybe it wasn’t entirely out of reach.

Perhaps, maybe not resurrection, but at least a reunion…

At that moment, the cold hand around her neck tightened.

“Ugh…!”

Startled, she struggled, and her body lifted as if it had lost all weight.

“I revived you because I was curious, but instead of gratitude, you’re lost in other thoughts.”

The cold voice reverberated around her like a hum. The unsettling tone seeped into Livia’s soul, sending a chill through her.

“…Makes me want to kill you again.”



Shocked by the chilling words, she glared at him, and his ocean-like blue eyes curved mysteriously.

Pale, untanned skin contrasted with a strong physique, a noble smile, and a wild temperament all blended together in his gaze.

The beautiful yet cruel god of the sea observed Livia with an unreadable expression.

Suddenly, his snake-like slit pupils reflected her in a chilling light. The grip on her slender neck tightened as if it would snap, causing Livia’s body to tremble violently.

“L-Let go… Let go…!”

Her small body, bound by his large hand, struggled fiercely.

Watching her with an indifferent gaze, he wiped any trace of a smile from his face and released his grip.

Her limp body fell to the ground.

Triton looked at the woman, who was gasping and retching, with an indifferent expression, then slumped back into a chair made of water droplets.

Damn.

He had brought her back to life, then strangled her, and tossed her aside as if she were less than an object, all while showing open contempt.

Not all gods were like this, but he was particularly vicious and violent.

Given how much he despised humans, it must have been irritating to him that she had tried to harm him.

Not that it mattered to her.

Grinding her teeth, Livia thought hard.

Though she had been resurrected, as the witch had said, it didn’t seem like her revival had come from her own power.

“I revived you because I was curious, but instead of gratitude, you’re lost in other thoughts. How arrogant…”

He had said it himself.

‘I revived you.’

So, this revival was his doing, driven by his curiosity.

‘I need to use this well…’

Livia Horn, who had been glaring at Triton, soon lowered her gaze to conceal her eyes.

Gods were such strange and extraordinary beings that she felt they could lay bare her soul simply by meeting his gaze.

Be careful. There was nothing to gain from revealing everything.

Livia took a deep breath, trying to calm her racing heart. As she felt the rhythm of her heartbeat, the pulsating vitality coursed vividly through her entire body.

Having died and come back to life, she realized how recklessly she had rushed at a god.

No matter how great a weapon she held, a human could not confront such a being head-on.

This was not even a lesser god but the ruler of the sea, one of the great pillars of the world.

She suddenly felt the absurdity of the opponent she had to face. Trying to fly to the sky without wings…

‘What should I do? How can a human’s hand harm a god? How…!’

The most important thing was to stay by his side and wait for an opportunity. Until the day she could drive a golden dagger into his heart, until she could tear apart the heart of the sea god, somehow…

She needed to create her own opportunity…

Just then, as she was lost in thought, Triton’s voice descended upon her.

“How do you know Echidna?”

Livia lifted her eyes to meet Triton’s gaze. Her bright green eyes sparkled with light.

Triton, sitting with his legs crossed and rubbing his chin with his hand, twisted his lips into a slight smile. It was so subtle that it seemed even he was unaware of it.

At that moment, Livia caught a faint thread of an answer to her long-held question.

But before she could delve deeper into her thoughts, a long, snake-like stream of water silently wrapped around her slender limbs and lifted her into the air.



Before Livia could even identify what was binding her hands and feet, she was swiftly pulled toward Triton.

“Ugh…!”

The soft chains of water bound her with powerful force. Just as she was about to writhe in humiliation, a cold hand touched her eyelid.

“Green is a beautiful color.”

She felt the hand tracing the shape of her eye through her tightly shut eyelid.

“I quite like that somber yet brilliant color.”

The hand pressed against her eye, rubbing as if to gouge it out, sent shivers down her spine. It felt as if he might take the eye beneath it at any moment.

“You seem to have rather pretty green eyes…”

His murmured words, filled with hidden intent, sent shivers across her entire body.

Mad god.

Livia bit her trembling lips hard and glared at him with eyes full of rage. Despite this, the man’s leisurely smile remained elegantly and infuriatingly composed.

“…Well, having died once, I didn’t think I’d be scared over just an eye.”

His voice, tinged with interest, spread calmly. After rubbing her eye socket a few more times with his cold fingertips, he suddenly lowered his hand to grab her wrist.

“Why is this on your body?”

His sharp fingers now touched the black scar on her. Just as he seemed about to mercilessly dig into the wound with his nails, he stopped.

“You.”

Triton pulled her slender forearm, which was thin enough to be held in one hand, and examined it.

Her flesh, so weak that it seemed to quiver, was somehow odd. Triton muttered incredulously as he inspected the woman’s skin.

“Did you soak yourself in Styx?”

At his remark, Livia also looked at her arm, which he was holding. Her seemingly soft flesh resisted Triton’s nails, which looked like they could pierce anything. His fingertips pressed into her skin, reflecting a faint light.

‘The blessing of the goddess Styx…!’

A smile of joy spread across Livia’s lips. The tales of becoming as tough as steel by bathing in the Styx River were true. For a moment, she hoped that perhaps she now had a body capable of challenging a god.

“…Ugh!”

Triton began to apply pressure with the fingers that held Livia. His fingertips, emitting a light brighter than her skin, brutally dug into her slender forearm.

“Aah!”

Her raw flesh split open, and red Blood dripped down her arm.

Even if she had become as tough as steel, it was still only the kind of body that might appear in human legends. Against the true power of a god, even skin made slightly tougher by divine power was useless.

“The effort you put into soaking in Styx in such a short time is commendable, but it’s pointless.”

He muttered mockingly, smiling as he squeezed her Blood-soaked arm. His gentle voice was soft, yet his gaze toward the woman was so emotionless it felt chilling.

“Tell me how you got the golden dagger.”

Livia Horn, groaning in pain, glared at Triton with tear-filled eyes. Gritting her teeth to endure the agony, she swallowed her cries and replied in a trembling voice.

“…I received it.”

Although she answered reluctantly, her sharp gaze was filled with irritation.

Triton, facing those fierce eyes up close, felt the corners of his own eyes twitch.

Even while trembling in fear, she remained defiant, displaying a spirit that was anything but ordinary.

‘Even though she had already died once by this hand.’

The sight of such a frail human baring her teeth in determination intrigued him. She had more guts than most great generals.

‘But in the end, she was still human. Her innate weakness was unavoidable.’

Seemingly denying his growing interest, Triton dug his nails deeper into her soft flesh.



Tears welled up in her green eyes, twisting in pain.

Unable to hold them back, the tears trickled down her slender chin and dropped below, evoking a sense of pity.

Yet, no sympathy arose within him. It was simply strangely difficult to look away.

Fixing his gaze on the green, tear-distorted half-moons of her eyes, Triton asked again in a voice that was almost hypocritically gentle.

“How?”

The hot Blood seeping from her wound trickled down the sea god’s cold fingers and dripped from her wrist.

“How did it happen, hmm…?”

The woman, who had been gritting her teeth to suppress her groans, finally let out a piercing scream and struck Triton’s wrist repeatedly.

“Let go of this, let go… ugh!”

Watching her struggle, he applied gentle pressure with an indifferent gaze.

“Answer first.”

Her stubbornly closed lips were as tight as a clam. Observing her parched lips, which had turned white from the strain, he murmured with interest.

“Oh, do you perhaps enjoy the pain?”

Her bloodshot eyes glared at him as if to say, ‘Don’t talk nonsense.’ Then, like she was making a decision, she shouted out in a fit.

“A witch…!”

The pressure from his hand ceased. Under his steady gaze, Livia spoke like she was spitting out the words.

“I made a deal with a witch.”

“A deal? What kind of deal?”

“…An exchange for revenge.”

As the intriguing word emerged, Triton’s lips curled into a smile. He softly repeated Livia’s words several times.

“I see. So… if it’s Echidna’s revenge.”

He then asked, fixing his gaze intently on her.

“…It would be me.”

His taunting gaze pressed her for answers. The meaning behind that gaze was all too clear.

…You? Against me?

Sensing the blatant mockery, the woman’s cheeks flushed red. Clenching her teeth, she turned her head sharply to avoid his gaze.

A labored breathing sound filled the air. The sound of her grinding teeth was also vividly audible.

It was amusing how she felt such indignation over something so obvious.

“Humans are consistently foolish. Did you really think you could kill me with just that golden dagger? Really?”

A witch had asked for revenge on a mortal, and this mortal had challenged a god at the witch’s request.

A genuine sneer spread across his face.

“In the end, you’re just someone who could be crushed to death with a mere gesture of my hand.”

Echidna remained foolish.

A naive mortal woman.

She set foot on a boat heading to Tartarus, fully aware that it was an impossible quest.

“You couldn’t even pierce the back of my hand, yet you think you can do this.”

Laughing as if he were truly amused, he suddenly stopped and pulled the arm he was holding closer, whispering into Livia’s ear.

“Revenge is futile. Nothing can be undone. You know that, don’t you?”

Livia shuddered as if in convulsion at the cold breath brushing her ear.

The man, with his unnatural beauty, mocked and taunted her, inflicting pain without a second thought.

After all, who among humans understood and sympathized with the plight of a bug crushed underfoot?

From his perspective, she was probably nothing more than an ant or a boar ruining crops. It must have been quite amusing to see such a thing trying to threaten his life.

However… Even so, he had no right to mock her life.

No matter how insignificant and unimpressive it might be, this life was entirely hers. It was an absolute and complete domain that no one could replace or invade.

“…It’s not about changing anything.”

So, that great and mighty immortal would never understand the desperate desire for revenge that she would give her one and only precious life to achieve.

“It’s something that must be done. It absolutely must…!”

Her defiant tone was audacious to the extreme. Her eyes, lifted in defiance, even seemed insolent at a glance.

Yet, contrary to her appearance, Livia’s hands were trembling violently.

She wasn’t unafraid of those strangely luminous blue eyes.

Hadn’t she already experienced firsthand that a mere gesture from him could cause her frail human body to burst and die on the spot?

But…

Livia swallowed hard, staring at the sea god who was suppressing her with silence.

His arrogant eyes gazed at her with an intensity that seemed to pierce through her.

Not once did he break eye contact, and every time she retorted, his lips twisted subtly.

What hung at the corner of those twisted lips was, however faint, curiosity. To put it more positively, a bizarre interest, perhaps.

He wouldn’t have been greatly disappointed if he had eliminated her right away, but her audacious actions made him impulsively want to watch a bit longer.

“Unfortunately, your revenge will never come to pass. You will never be able to kill me.”

Of course, he might have misunderstood what he felt.

“…Are you sure about that?”

But even so, there were no other options available now, so she had no choice but to cling to it.

Livia bit her tongue inside her mouth and lifted her head a bit more. Her determined eyes shone brightly in the darkness.

“Just 100 days.”

Raising her head boldly under his brilliantly gleaming blue eyes, as if she was measuring something, Livia whispered secretly.

Seemingly questioning what she meant, the man stared blankly, and Livia, like a fish leaping out of water, sprang up with her whole body.

Even a god could be caught off guard.

Seizing the fleeting moment, Livia bared her teeth. Her twisted lips parted, and her open mouth clamped onto his smooth jawline, sharpened like moonlight.



Mocking his eyes, which widened in disbelief, Livia bit down on his jaw with all her might.

With a crunching sound, his face froze in shock. As her body slid down, unable to bear the weight, she spoke with a triumphant smile.

“Just give me 100 days. Within that time, I’ll definitely crush your heart.”

Though the chains of water quickly bound her body again, it didn’t matter.

She hadn’t drawn Blood, but she had succeeded in leaving her teeth marks on his jaw. Pleased with the visible result, Livia grinned defiantly.



Triton, who had let out a hollow laugh, raised his hand to rub his throbbing jaw. He couldn’t hide his astonishment at the unfamiliar pain in an unfamiliar place.

“Ha…?”

After rubbing his chin for a while, he paused and stared at Livia. As his gaze deepened, the force of the water binding her intensified.

The space grew darker, and the pressure holding her down increased.

It seemed he intended to crush her with silence, but it was a futile attempt.

Livia, setting aside her anxiety, keenly observed Triton’s expression. Like watching the footsteps of wolves hunting sheep, she was cautious and alert…

‘Is this not enough?’

In those blue eyes fixed on her, she sensed distrust and disapproval towards humans.

And deeper within, there was a madness that sought to destroy and annihilate.

That was exactly what Livia aimed for.

The sea god’s madness would only grow stronger the more she provoked him.

It must have been both absurd and intriguing for him to see a mere human making such an impossible challenge.

In that case… Livia intended to be the dry wood throwing herself into the fire, determined to fan the flames he possessed.

Even if it meant she would be completely consumed and obliterated in the end.

“…I am a god. I live an eternal, immortal life.”

Eventually, his eerie voice broke the silence.

“A mere human cannot destroy me.”

Livia quickly latched onto his words, which continued indifferently as if they were nothing.

“Yes, you are a god. One who lives an eternal life. Is a mere 100 days so precious to someone like you?”

She knew it was a clumsy provocation, and it was obvious he did too. But sometimes, a provocation whose intent is clear can be more irritating.

“Surely, the great and terrifying sea god isn’t afraid of a mere insignificant woman like me?”

She tried to speak calmly, but anxiety kept slipping through her stern expression.

…Hold on, you must wait. Just a little longer.

An eternity of silence pressed down on her.

Yet, even as Livia bit the inside of her roughened lips until they bled, the man showed no particular reaction.

Damn sea god!

There was definitely curiosity in the eyes that looked at her. She thought that was why he, who claimed to detest humans, had awakened her alone, but he wasn’t reacting as she expected.

“Hmm.”

He rolled his throat low and tilted his head slightly, looking at her with eyes that seemed to devour her thoroughly.

To hide her anxiousness, Livia held her neck straight and met his gaze with fierce eyes.

Livia was quick-witted. It was innate, and she had honed this sixth sense for survival as she grew.

Her instincts screamed that this was the right direction, but she couldn’t be sure.

After all, she was merely human, and no one could predict the whims of a capricious god.

“I assure you, it will be quite an entertaining and thrilling time for you…!”

“But you know.”

Triton abruptly cut off Livia’s anxious words. At the same time, the light that had been pressing on her began to return gradually.

Beyond the now brighter view, she saw him smiling with his eyes crinkled.

“You lack reverence for the gods.”

His hand, which had approached suddenly, clamped her chin and forced her lips apart.

“You’re too insolent, your words are too short.”

Her lips, which she tried to keep shut, were pried open by his overwhelming strength.

Livia resisted the force that seemed about to crush her jaw, glaring at him with a face full of tears.

“Such an ugly human.”

His voice, muttering in disdain, was filled with irritation.

His eyes, narrowed sharply, were fierce, but the hand that slowly and deliberately pushed fingers between her parted lips was languid and sticky.

“…Annoying.”

That was exactly what Livia wanted to say.

What exactly were gods, anyway?

Just as beasts lived with beasts and humans with humans, gods should live among their own kind, yet they insisted on tormenting humans by dragging them into their affairs.

Livia glared at him with all her frustration, but her tear-filled, pain-twisted eyes lacked the fierceness she intended.

Triton, who had been staring at her pitifully, stretched his lips into a wide grin.

Just when she found that smile chilling—



A tingling sensation shot from the fingertips that had been scraping the inside of Livia’s tongue.

“Ah, ugh…!”

Startled, Livia jerked her head like she was having a seizure, but the hand didn’t let go. Grasping his wrist with both hands, she struggled, gritting her teeth as if she intended to bite his fingers off.

“Oh dear… Didn’t you dip your tongue in the Styx?”

The long fingers slid slowly over her wet tongue, rendering her efforts futile.

Her soft tongue was helplessly toyed with.

“100 days…”

The fingertips pushed all the way to the back of her mouth, swirling around, exploring the cavern of her mouth. Her forced-open mouth felt numb and humiliated. Watching her distorted face with interest, he suddenly murmured.

“Yes. It’s just a moment. If it can be enjoyable, then such a brief time doesn’t matter.”

…Had she succeeded?

Unconsciously, she swallowed hard with his fingers still in her mouth, causing her throat to tighten around the deeply lodged fingers.

At that moment, his probing actions stopped.



What was that?

With a chilling feeling, she looked up at him with tear-filled eyes. He gazed down at her expressionlessly, moving his hand slowly. Forward a little, then back again. Repeatedly pressing down on her tongue, a wave of nausea surged up.

“Ugh… ugh…!”

As her breath caught, her throat constricted involuntarily. Livia, tears streaming from the physiological reaction, clutched his forearm. Simultaneously, the movement of the fingers probing her mouth ceased.

“During the 100 days, you will face seven trials. While enduring these trials, you may approach me as much as you like. However, if I remain unharmed after 100 days…”

Suddenly, the hand rummaging in her mouth withdrew, and in an instant, her body was lifted.

Pulled backward as if led by a monster’s hand, her body was swiftly yanked away.

Thud!

“Ugh!”

She slammed into a wall she hadn’t known was there. The pain in her back felt as if it would break, and Livia stifled a groan. A giant shadow loomed over her panting form.

“On the 101st day, you will not be unharmed.”

A massive bubble rose up. The storm of swirling water droplets shook the dark, cold prison that confined her.

“It will be interesting to see whether I die first or you wish for death yourself.”

Clang, clang!

Rusty iron bars clattered as sand and shells collided with them, making a loud noise. She shielded her face with her arms to fend off the stinging debris.

The fierce storm of water subsided as if it had never happened.

When Livia looked up again, only the damp darkness and thick silence remained.



People didn’t know, but Livia’s life had been difficult from the moment she was born.

The harshest part was that she remembered everything from birth.

A two-year-old baby abandoned in a harsh winter, taken in reluctantly by a shabby orphanage. But even that was robbed by thieves, and before she turned six, she was back on the streets.

With thin, emaciated hands, she begged and clung to passersby. Then, by luck, she was struck by a noble’s foot and taken to their home.

“Poor thing, maybe I should just raise her. Once she’s cleaned up, she’s quite pretty.”

The woman’s eyes appraised the six-year-old child up and down. Yet Livia didn’t find it uncomfortable.

Her house was many times larger than the orphanage Livia had known, the clothes they gave her were clean and soft, and warm meals were served at every mealtime.

To a penniless beggar child, the woman was a benefactor.

That year, and the next, Livia was happy. Or rather, she wasn’t unhappy. Life was comfortable, and she didn’t have to worry about the cold or hunger the next day. So she wasn’t unhappy.

Until she had a real ‘child’ of her own.

“…Hmm. It seems difficult to raise a child whose origins are unknown. But since I had grown fond of you, I would find another place that could take you in.”

And so, Livia found herself back on the streets.

The place the noblewoman had promised to find for her took the donation money and sold Livia to a slaver.

The slaver intended to take Livia to a neighboring country known for treating people like livestock.

When she overheard them laughing about how well-fed she looked and how they could get a good price for her, Livia didn’t hesitate to escape.

She held back tears as she ran across endless plains, swam through icy rivers with gritted teeth, and hid in the dark forest, suppressing her fear.

Having not eaten for days, she felt as though she might die at any moment.

Just when she wondered if dying there would be better than living such a harsh life, a small hand grasped hers.

“…Hey, are you hungry?”

It was a little child who looked three or four years younger than Livia. Without hesitation, the child handed her the bread he had been holding tightly with both hands.

“I’m not hungry. You look hungry. Eat this.”

 

The child’s name was Lete.

He was the small hand that had picked up Livia, who had been abandoned twice since birth. The men from the Horn family whom Lete had brought along said they would get adults.

“A child as small as you… How did you end up like this? This won’t do. Let’s get you treated first.”

He carried her in his broad chest while running frantically. Even when she saw the worried face of the adult man examining her condition, she felt indifferent.

She thought she was just lucky. She wouldn’t die this time. Anyway, she would be abandoned again…

In a house full of men, Livia was treated like a precious little pearl. A subtle sadness spread across their faces when they asked where she had come from and how she got there.

But that bitter sympathy was somewhat sweet. At least the pitying looks didn’t starve or hit her.

“Hey kiddo, what’s your name?”

At the orphanage, she had been Ekia, at the noblewoman’s house, she had been Rode, and before being sold to the slaver, she had been called ‘that thing.’ While she hesitated over what to say, the boy asked.

“…Do you not have a name yet?”

Why had she done that?

Without realizing it, Livia nodded. The boy was startled and went to get his father. Little Lete toddled over. The three men put their heads together and then spoke to her.

“How about Livia?”

They said the most beautiful lake in their city was named Livia. They mentioned that the forest surrounding the lake resembled her eyes. They hoped she would have a life as peaceful as that lake, which had remained unchanged for hundreds of years.

Thus, Ekia, who had become Rode, was completed with the name Livia Horn.



If someone had asked her what she hated the most, Livia could have answered without hesitation.

Hunger.

Perhaps due to the memories of wandering the streets and nearly starving to death as a child, Livia detested the feeling of hunger.

The taste didn’t matter much to her. As long as she could fill her stomach without harming herself, that was enough.

So when Livia received the witch’s Blood and entered the sea, she was happiest about not being hungry anymore.

Even when she fell into the underworld shortly after, she was glad not to feel hunger or fatigue. However, now it was the complete opposite.

‘…I feel like I’m going to die.’

The intense hunger, like a long fork scraping her stomach, was close to torture. Honestly, being crushed to death by the sea god’s grip had been less painful than this.

Damn it, at least that had ended quickly.

‘What kind of… trial is this…’

No, the fact that curses came out naturally meant it was indeed a trial.

Livia gritted her teeth, clutching her hungry stomach as she walked through the empty corridor.

‘By the way, where on earth is this place?’

After Triton, that insidious sea god, had left, Livia immediately lost consciousness.

When she opened her eyes again, she found herself in this place.

It resembled an abandoned castle of a forgotten dynasty—grand yet in ruins—inside a massive stone building.

The suffocating humidity she had felt with every breath was gone. Had she somehow emerged from the water without realizing it? Or was she perhaps dreaming?

She allowed herself a moment of hope, but deep down, she knew better than anyone that it wasn’t the case.

For one thing, the wound on her wrist remained, and the excruciating hunger and thirst were too vivid to dismiss as a dream.

Livia, who had been momentarily dazed, soon realized that this was the ‘first trial’ he had mentioned.

In that case, she had to overcome it.

She gathered strength in her trembling legs and stood up.

The castle, draped in cobwebs, was dark and eerie. There were no sounds of anything living.

What was she supposed to do in this castle? Was some legendary monster going to appear?

With a tense expression, Livia struggled to move forward.

Damn it. Her weakened body felt as heavy as a thousand pounds, and her mouth was filled with a bitter, sour taste. Her dry, cracked lips were already bleeding.

A bitter realization washed over her.

Could she really fight off some formidable monster in this condition? Even if she was acting recklessly, she couldn’t help but worry about that.

But what choice did she have? She had already plunged into the trial, and she couldn’t afford to be defeated helplessly here.

Driven to the extreme by hunger, her head spun. Just as her sense of direction began to blur, a savory scent of butter wafted into Livia’s nose.

Livia stopped abruptly and hurriedly looked around for the source of the smell. Where was it coming from?

Half out of her mind, she dashed toward the direction of the scent.

Bang!

It wasn’t this room. Then, over there?

She wanted to shove anything down her parched throat. Her mind was consumed with the thought that she had to eat something. Like a beacon of hope, she spotted a light in the distance.

Please, please, please.

As she limped toward the light, Livia’s face lit up with joy.



A massive kitchen with a dozen connected hearths awaited her.

Various dishes were boiling or frying on each hearth, and the large dining table in front of them was piled high with delicacies.

The intense aroma of the food was dizzying. Just as she was about to reach out and grab some, Livia froze in place. Her fingers trembled in front of a tempting piece of meat.

She closed her eyes tightly and took a deep breath.

…It could be a trap.

A lavish feast laid out as if it were waiting for her.

It looked suspicious to anyone.

Stay calm, Livia. You have to stay calm.

She decided to wait. She didn’t know what might happen, but something could pop out at any moment.

How much time passed like that?

A moment came when Livia could no longer hold back.

Whether it was magic or something else, the food on the stove continued to cook without burning or overcooking, and the dishes on the table remained warm.

Moreover, the aromatic spices that drove her crazy still lingered in the air.

Saliva pooled in her mouth, threatening to drip down her chin like a dog.

Swallowing her spit, she eyed the bread basket on the table. Golden bread that would surely release warm steam when torn open.

…Okay, just one piece.

Just in case. It could be dangerous. So as not to draw attention, just one piece….

With trembling hands, Livia picked up a piece of bread. And just as she was about to bring it to her mouth—

Thud.

Something fell onto the back of her hand. Startled, Livia looked down, and her face turned pale.

“…Uh, ugh!!!”

Dozens of maggots and bugs crawled down her hand. The savory smell transformed into a nauseating stench of rot, and the soft bread was teeming with mold.

Livia Horn recoiled and threw the bread, now infested with bugs, to the floor.

As she quickly looked up, she saw the food on the table. Fortunately, it remained unchanged.

What was this? What was happening? Grimacing, Livia reached for another dish, just in case.



But as soon as she touched it, the food transformed once again into a pile of rotting trash, filling the air with a foul stench. The sight of maggots crawling up her fingers made her gag.

At the same time, rats appeared from nowhere, swarming over the rotten food she had discarded. The sound of the rats gnawing on the maggots and decayed food sent chills down her spine.

“Ugh!”

Her twisted stomach heaved, but with nothing inside, all she could do was dry heave, her eyes reddening from the effort. As she clutched her belly and struggled, a voice echoed around her.

“Eat.”

…Crazy. You eat it.

With bloodshot eyes, she shook her head violently and covered her ears.

But as always, the voice gnawed at her spirit rather than her ears. It grew louder and faster inside her head.

“Eat.”

“Eat.”

“Eat.”

Shut up. Shut up!

Swallowing her curses, Livia stomped her foot and glared into the empty air.

Her true ‘first trial’ had begun.



Yah-!

Following the strong winds blowing from the west, a white wave rose fiercely.

The wave soon transformed into a magnificent winged horse, and on this celestial steed rode Triton, his silver-blue hair streaming as he galloped across the sea.

A few young sea nymphs, secretly watching him, blushed and giggled.

His slender yet robust figure, his beautiful features reflecting both moonlight and sunlight, and his powerful physique glistening with moisture could compete with any god of the heavens or the earth.

While his appearance might seem blindingly beautiful to some, to his servant struggling to keep up, he was merely a speed demon.

“You’re still too slow, Actius!”

Actius, second only in speed on the sea, gritted his teeth in frustration.

Of course, the fastest was right ahead of him.

“Triton, you are simply too fast!”

“How can you call yourself a servant who protects his master when all you do is chase after my tail? If you can’t overtake me even once, I’ll reveal your hideout to Sion.”

At this threat, Actius shuddered.

Sion!

The fiancée whom the goddess of fate had forcibly engaged him to.

Born on a stormy night in a rocky crevice, she had become a servant of the goddess Athena, fearlessly hunting boars every day with her mighty bow!

Everyone knew that Actius lived hidden in the depths of the sea to avoid his fiancée’s attention.

“The more you evade, the more I want to hunt you, Actius.”

Actius shuddered, recalling her words whispered to him at Athena’s banquet.

He had never wanted it, but someday he would become her husband.

Oh, heavens, they would even have children! The thought of Sion carrying his child was terrifying, but there was no way to avoid it.

Such is fate. Even if one wished to escape it, one could not. It flowed as it should!

However,

“You bestowed a trial?”

His master had wielded that power.

Now, Triton sat lazily, leaning against a forgotten old temple. He nodded languidly.

Actius, who had been tending to the celestial horses, was shocked.

“To whom? Surely you don’t mean that human woman?”

Without answering, Triton picked up a few grapes and wild berries from the worn altar.

The fruits, bruised from being tightly held, didn’t look fresh, but Triton brought them to his mouth without concern. The sweet juice and aroma filled his mouth. As he leisurely chewed, he gazed beyond the sea.

Just then, a couple of sailing ships quietly appeared over the horizon.

Actius was the one whose insides burned with anxiety at Triton’s relaxed demeanor.

“Triton!”

What was a trial, after all? It was the greatest power to influence someone’s destiny.

Destiny was the most potent force against ‘chaos,’ and to meddle with it using divine power was akin to tampering with the law of cause and effect.

In essence, even the ‘god’s destiny’ who bestowed the trial could be shaken.

Actius was confused. Why? Why use such great power on an unknown human woman from the land?

“Quiet down. Look over there, Actius.”

But before he could demand answers to his confusion, Triton pointed toward the horizon.

Not far from the island, a couple of medium-sized sailing ships came to a stop. Soon, men appeared on deck carrying buckets on their shoulders.

Actius, who had been quietly observing the ships, grimaced with anger.

“Those scoundrels again….”

The buckets contained rotten animal carcasses, decaying trash that had begun to stink, and chemicals used to kill pests like bugs and rats.

The pirates laughed among themselves and then dumped everything into the sea. In an instant, the water around the ships became polluted with garbage.

The creatures beneath the sea let out groans of agony from the sudden disaster. A curse slipped through Actius’s clenched teeth.

The pirates, who were polluting the sea, brought out large drums and started beating them loudly to create a commotion, intending to catch the attention of the island’s inhabitants.

They had been hired by a noble from the mainland to drive the islanders away.

This small island had been settled by warriors who had lost their families in the last war and had become wanderers. Despite its barren appearance, it was rich in rare medicinal herbs. Although crop cultivation was difficult, there was an abundance of fruit, and selling the herbs provided enough profit for a living.

Somehow, the mainland lord heard about this and became greedy. He tried to forcibly evict the islanders by bringing in spearmen, but the islanders were not easy to deal with.

Though they were wandering mercenaries, they had survived many life-and-death situations in the war. The ragtag soldiers of the local lord were no match for them.

However, using fire arrows recklessly could destroy the island’s resources, so they changed their approach. Like smoking out a rabbit from its burrow, they aimed to make the islanders abandon the island themselves.

They waited for the islanders to sail out and then sank their boats. Next, they dumped foul-smelling garbage around the isolated island, Killing all the fish and shellfish.

It was a truly malicious method, but it proved immediately effective.

An islander guarding the watchtower spotted the pirate ships and urgently blew a conch shell.

Armed villagers rushed out, but they were powerless against the pirates who were aiming catapults from far out at sea.

“You Damns!”

“They’re polluting the sea again! At this rate, the clams and fish will all die!”

“Those scum deserve to be torn apart!”

The enraged islanders brought out fire arrows, but no matter how tightly they drew their bows, they couldn’t reach the ships.

Instead, the catapults on the ships launched large stones onto the beach where the islanders had gathered, causing damage.

It was a one-sided harassment, almost like a massacre. The cries and shouts of the furious islanders echoed throughout the small island.

This had been going on for days. Not only the fish but also the sea spirits were suffering.

Of course, Triton’s presence here wasn’t solely because of that.

Rolling a plump raspberry a few times in his large hand, Triton pursed his lips toward the sea.

The god’s breath carried sound on the wind to a distant place.

Before long, a giant red octopus swimming beneath the sea broke through the surface.



The terrified screams of humans spread widely over the sea. The large sailing ship carrying dozens of people was shattered and sunk by just a few tentacles of the octopus.

Triton’s cherished giant kraken, Oroos, seemed to be in high spirits, enthusiastically destroying the pirate ships.

Triton, who frowned at the unpleasant screams and shouts of the humans, suddenly thought of that human woman.

A woman who hadn’t cried out loudly even amidst harsh trials. A pitiful and humble human who bit her lip and held back sobs with clenched teeth….

Recalling her fierce green eyes, filled with defiance as she fearlessly glared at a god, a chuckle escaped him.

“Just 100 days.”

“Within that time, I will surely destroy you.”

Her audacious words had been as red as her hair.

After surviving death, her boldness had made him bind her tongue, and her wide, innocent eyes seemed surprisingly naive.

Destroy me?

Even thinking about it again made him laugh. He had lived a long time, but he had never encountered a human like her.

“I assure you, it’ll be quite an exciting and thrilling time for you…!”

The woman’s confidence seemed quite believable. She was arrogant, yet intriguing.

How exactly would you make things exciting and thrilling for me? A hint of anticipation curved his lips into a slight smile.

Moreover, it would be convenient to uncover Echidna’s insidious schemes, so keeping her around didn’t seem like a bad choice after all.

However,

“…I wonder if she’ll even pass the first trial.”

At his self-mocking words, Actius looked at him, seemingly questioning what he meant.

Triton waved his hand dismissively, wearing a relaxed smile, as if to indicate it was nothing. Explaining the trials in detail would only invite unnecessary interest and meddling under the presumptuous guise of concern.

Concern? Worrying about a god? What a foolish notion!

Even if she claimed to have the power to change fate, could that truly be her destiny? It would merely shake the fragile and wretched fate of that feeble human to its core.

Triton’s destiny carried a different weight compared to that of other gods. This was due to the existence of his counterparts, the ‘Tritones,’ who were both his avatars and brothers.

While ‘Triton’ succeeded his father and ruled the sea, countless nameless ‘Tritones’ guarded the parts of the ocean beyond his sight.

Even if something were to happen to Triton, his avatars would protect the sea without any gaps.

His avatars existed solely for the purpose of destiny. This was what they referred to as an army of a thousand horses.

As he laughed confidently, he suddenly turned his head slightly. He sensed a presence behind him. Actius seemed to notice it too and whispered discreetly to Triton.

“There’s someone here. Should I check?”

“…No, leave it. Besides, Selene’s messenger has arrived.”

Triton stopped Actius from turning around and reached out into the air. A pure white butterfly flew from somewhere and gently landed on his fingertip.

Soon, the butterfly dissolved into white smoke that lingered in the air, and the smoke quickly formed letters that hovered before him.

The goddess of fate said the sea would soon stir.

Please, beware of the red, my Triton.

The red, the red….

If he thought about the red that circled around him, it could only refer to that one thing.

A woman who dared to threaten Triton, something no one else had ever done, despite being merely human….

He grasped the white smoke floating before his eyes and laughed.

You, of all beings, are what I need to ‘beware’ of? It was unthinkable. Had the goddesses of fate lost their minds? Or could it be that you were capable of doing something so significant that fate itself would send a warning?

Triton found it absurd, yet he couldn’t help but feel a flicker of anticipation.

An infinite lifespan was enough to make a god arrogant. In his ocean-blue eyes lay an old ennui, clinging like dried residue. The sudden intrusion of this red into his otherwise endless life was almost delightful.

Hoping that the human woman would meet his expectations, Triton popped the last raspberry into his mouth.

The tart fruit melted fragrantly on his tongue.



Time passed gently, and several days slipped by in an instant.

One day, two days, three days, four days….

As Triton tried to gauge the passing days, he grew bored of waiting.

She seemed quite confident, but in the end, did she fail to overcome even the first trial?

It was disappointing. Had he placed too much expectation on a weak human? It was almost disheartening. He felt so let down that he wanted to revive that human woman just to mete out divine punishment.

Forget it. It was a futile endeavor.

As he contemplated whether to withdraw the trial and retrieve her body to sever the arm tainted by Chrysaor’s dagger….

The flow of seawater around him shifted. The corals and small fish decorating the surroundings moved uneasily. Triton’s stiff neck slowly lifted.

…Squish, squish.

A heavy, dragging sound echoed.

The things of the sea, being so accustomed to water, never made such heavy sounds.

So this must have come from outside.

His gaze fell on the doorway where pearls had settled. The waves, the presence, and the scent drew closer.

As Triton’s hardened eyes flashed with interest, his lips twisted into a subtle smile.



A disheveled woman dragged her weary body into his room. Her bloodless, pale face was marked by bloodshot eyes glaring at him as if she intended to kill.

“Uh… ugh…!”

The woman ground her teeth, and although harsh words seemed to form, her tongue was stiff, resulting in only unclear mutterings escaping.

“You managed to pass the first trial, human.”

His words, spoken with an air of excitement, seemed to provoke her. Grinding her teeth in frustration, the woman stomped her feet and let out a rough groan as she charged at Triton.

With hands torn and nails missing, she grasped at his neck. Her hands, limp like old, worn-out cloth, lacked any strength.

Barely managing to hold onto Triton’s neck, the woman burst into tears.

“Ugh, uh…! Ugh!”

Her desperate eyes, trying to strangle him somehow, looked pitiful.

Her bloodshot green eyes blocked Triton’s view.

The color of lush greenery, soaked in tears, wavered and faded right before his eyes, only to flare up again.

The green that resembled the earth, the sunlight akin to joy, the flame burning fiercely because it was finite….

Everything the sea could not possess was reflected in her eyes. Her diamond-like sparkling eyes captivated Triton’s gaze.

She was merely a human. A frail human who had barely overcome a single trial.

Arrogant enough to claim she would destroy him, she attempted to strangle him with her clumsy hands.

Yet, was there anything more amusing?

Had he ever wanted to toy with something so much?

Triton’s lips twisted into a broad grin, and he finally burst into laughter.

“This, this… ugh…. ugh!”

The woman’s eyes widened as she watched him laugh. Like he was witnessing something unbelievable, Triton’s image was etched in her tightly constricted pupils, gazing at her with a mist-like smile.

In her moist, glistening green eyes, a myriad of emotions swirled like the waves at sunset. The unrefined emotional turmoil that only humans could feel and enjoy….

For a moment, Triton wanted to carve out those green eyes and keep them. The urge was so strong it made his lower abdomen tingle.

Ah, what would it taste like if he rolled them around in his mouth? They seemed like they would fit perfectly in a box made of pearls and jewels. Common as they might be, those eyes were different somehow.

What was it? What made them different? As he laughed for a while, he reached out and gently touched the tears pooling in her eye sockets.



Her face flinched, turning pale and rigid, but Triton paid no mind.

He felt the round eyes beneath her thin eyelids. The thought of plucking them out persisted in his mind. But he knew he shouldn’t. If he took those eyes out, he would never see those fiercely shining eyes again.

The more he thought he shouldn’t, the more tempting it became. A ravenous hunger stirred within him. Feeling that thirst-like craving, he laughed fiercely. As he licked his dry lips and smacked them, the woman’s brow furrowed even more.

However, her fierce gaze didn’t last long. The strength in her hands, which had been choking his neck, gradually waned. Her eyes, once filled with determination, trembled and then suddenly rolled back.

As the slender woman’s body collapsed to the floor, Triton swiftly pulled her by the waist.

Her red hair, draped over her shadow on the ground, swayed like tattered rags.

Very, very red hair.



Livia suddenly lifted her head and looked around. The familiar scenery captured her weary eyes.

Where was this place?

Flowers bloomed wildly in the fields, the vast sky glowed at sunset, and a faint scent of the sea lingered in the air….

A slow expression of joy spread across Livia’s face as she looked around, her mind still blank.

Finally, she was free from that dreadful place. She had returned!

Tears welled up before she even realized where or from what she had returned. She laughed through her sobs.

It had been a dream! All of it was just a nightmare! She felt so delighted that she wanted to dance with joy.

“…Livia!”

A familiar voice called from afar. It was Lete, announcing that it was time for dinner.

Livia wiped her tears and quickly turned around, waving at her younger brother. “I’ll be there soon!” she shouted, hoping her voice reached him. Lete waved back, urging her to hurry.

With a joyful heart, Livia ran toward the home where her family awaited.

Thank goodness, thank goodness…. I’m so relieved!

She thought about how she needed to tell her family during dinner. That she had a truly terrible dream. That the villagers had burned them, and she had made a pact with a witch to seek revenge against the sea god.

And that she had even gone to the underworld and been struck by some madman’s arrow. Everyone would be shocked, wouldn’t they?

They would probably say, “What a ridiculous dream,” and tell her not to go out tomorrow, but to rest at home if she was tired.

Then she would playfully demand to sleep in the next day, telling them not to wake her up. Just thinking about it made her feel happy and content. With a broad smile, she flung open the door to the cabin where everyone was waiting.

“Dad, Ia…!”

But the scene inside the cabin was not what she had imagined. Livia’s face turned pale, frozen as if she had met Medusa’s gaze.

…What is this? Why, why is this here?

The cozy home was filled with food waste and a foul stench. The floor was sticky with oozing filth, rotten meat lay scattered, and maggots and flies swarmed everywhere.

Livia recognized this scene.

“Eat.”

And that eerie voice as well.

Before she realized it, Livia found herself trembling on the maggots.

“Eat.”

The voice urged again, and without thinking, she grabbed a moldy piece of meat.

“Don’t eat me! You mustn’t eat me!”

The bubbling food waste wept like pus-filled tears, pleading with her.

“Please don’t eat me! If you do, I’ll vanish, I’ll die!”

 

What on earth was this? What was this horrific thing that clung so desperately?

It was hard to identify the crumbling flesh that couldn’t possibly be eaten. No, she didn’t even want to know.

“Eat.”

“Don’t eat!”

“Devour it!”

“No, please, I’m begging you!”

“Eat!”

“No!”

The two voices clashed. Livia covered her ears, denying reality.

Why was this happening to her? Why did she have to endure such a horrible experience? Why, why!

She wanted to escape. From this nightmare, where rotten meat screamed and clung to her ankles like piranhas in the abyss of darkness.

…But no. Leaving meant failure.

Tears of frustration filled her eyes, turning them bloodshot. She glared defiantly at the ground.

She hadn’t even seen the last of her father and brothers. They were chased off a cliff, and not even a handful of their remains could be recovered.

Their only crime had been trusting their neighbors. Taking in a wandering orphan girl as family.

Wasn’t it her kind-hearted father who shed tears when letting go of an old sheep, and her brothers who helped him, never wasting a single piece of flesh or hide?

Livia crawled through the muck, grabbing the screaming piece of meat, and opened her mouth wide.



“…Huh!”

She shot up in bed, gasping for breath. The damp air filled her lungs.

Panting heavily, the remnants of the dream flashed through her mind.

The disgusting, horrifying memory made her want to cut out her tongue and vomit her insides.

Suddenly pale, Livia hurriedly covered her mouth. She tried to empty her mind, but the memory rebounded, twisting her stomach.

“Ugh…!”

She quickly covered her mouth and bolted out of bed. Grabbing onto any wall she could see, she retched, and a dreadful voice came from behind her.

“Oh dear… it seems my trial didn’t suit your taste.”

Her Blood ran cold in an instant.

Forcing her stiff neck to turn, she saw him leaning against the doorway, arms crossed, smirking crookedly.

Triton. The damned sea god. The very man who had subjected her to this trial.
Livia Horn rubbed her face, flushed from retching, with the back of her hand, silently cursing with her eyes. Without a voice, it was all she could do.

Triton seemed to sense her silent outburst and smiled, his eyes crinkling. His bright blue eyes sparkled elegantly, like the midday sea glistening in the sun.

His smile was dazzling enough to make even heavenly goddesses jealous, yet it felt annoyingly out of place given his rotten nature, forcing her to eat spoiled food.

“Even without a voice, your eyes are quite loud,” he said.

He chuckled, shaking his shoulders, and slowly approached Livia. As they drew closer, their eyes silently and sharply assessed each other.

Her weakened body instinctively recoiled, but Livia forced herself to stand tall.

Her body, worn from hardship, revealed her bony frame. Under her stiff collarbones, her thin body strained to stand, breathing in ragged gasps.

In moments like this, she needed to keep her wits about her. No matter how grueling the trials she faced, losing her mind would lead to her downfall.

Hadn’t she already resolved when she plunged into the sea? She believed she could endure anything. If she could survive and avenge her family, then…

Livia’s eyelids fluttered open and shut. Each time, memories of her family flashed by, memories she clung to with all her might.

Her father’s voice telling her it was okay to be a little lazy, Iason always giving her the most food on her plate, and the soft hair of her younger sibling wrapping around her fingers.

That beautiful immortal was merely a means for her revenge.

The catastrophe she willingly embraced to avenge those humans who cruelly burned her family.

Yes, that was all.

As she took a deep breath, her face gradually regained its calm.

Finally, Triton stood before Livia, his gaze glinting with interest.

“As expected, your spirit is something to admire. Your mind seems quick too… not bad for a mere human.”

Triton’s shadow fell over Livia as he approached, so close that Livia had to tilt her head back to look up at him.

He was huge.

Even without transforming into his divine form, the man appeared to be two heads taller than Livia. Considering Livia wasn’t particularly short for a woman, his height was truly immense.

‘That body must be tougher than steel,’ she thought.

Livia’s eyes glided down the contours of Triton’s powerful physique. Each movement made his warrior-like muscles ripple threateningly.

His heart was likely hidden beneath even thicker muscles. How thick could it be? Could Echidna’s dagger pierce it in one swift strike?

Her gaze deepened, trying to gauge the heart hidden beneath the muscles. Though she wanted to press her hand against it, her returning sense stopped her.

And that tattoo…

She wondered what the black tattoo, stretching from one shoulder down to his heart, meant. He must have chosen to bear that image himself, so did it hold some grand significance? Or perhaps it held a clue to his weakness.

‘Is that a conch? That shape looks like a shark…’

Wasn’t the sea god said to be the leader of the sharks? Perhaps that’s why the strange pattern resembling shark teeth kept catching her eye.

As she unconsciously tried to examine the tattoo covering his shoulder, Triton crossed his arms over his chest. His muscles bunched even more tightly, obscuring the tattoo on his chest.

Frustrated by the obscured view, she furrowed her brow, and a voice filled with a chuckle reached her ears.

“You’re practically devouring me with your eyes.”

Not understanding at first, Livia blinked, then realized what he meant. She almost blurted out a denial, but bit her lip and stepped back.

What was the point of explaining with a voice that wouldn’t come out? It didn’t seem necessary to explain anyway.

Turning her head sharply to avoid looking at him, she sensed him staring intently for a while before he walked past her, as if it didn’t matter.

At that moment, the water rippled, and two massive shadows pushed into the room. Startled, she turned to see two beautiful black and white sharks approaching her.



Sharks, and not just any sharks, but a pair of black and white ones.

Even with her limited knowledge, Livia had never heard of such sharks. Especially with that golden conch insignia on their foreheads.

‘Are they the sea god’s envoys?’ she wondered.

Even though they were several times her size, she didn’t feel afraid. In fact, their jet-black eyes looked almost cute to her.

Their circling movements seemed gentle, but that was her naive misconception.

At some point, the black shark began nudging Livia’s shoulder like it was brushing past her. The white shark tried to stop it, pushing the black shark away with its body, but the black shark wouldn’t listen. As Livia stumbled from a swat of its tail, the black shark’s movements became more aggressive.

This troublesome shark…

Glaring at the black shark with undisguised annoyance, Livia found the shark pushing its large head directly toward her.

“Sympho.”

A languid voice stopped the black shark. The black shark, which had been rushing toward Livia, immediately turned and headed for Triton.

Sympho, Sympho… Annoying Sympho, just like its master.

As she repeated the black shark’s name to herself, Triton gently patted the thick flesh of the black shark hovering near him and whispered.

“Why are you being so mischievous, Sympho? You’re not one to bully the weak.”

Triton’s words made Livia feel her spirits sink. It stung to be openly dismissed as weak, but he wasn’t entirely wrong.

‘Being underestimated isn’t necessarily a bad thing for me…’

Perhaps it was better to let them continue underestimating her. Livia furrowed her brow, pretending to be more upset, and glared at the black shark and Triton.

The shark flicked its tail as if to say, ‘What are you going to do about it?’

That blasted creature, really…

As Livia’s gaze sharpened, Triton spoke with amusement.

“You’re really fearless, aren’t you?”

Though his lips didn’t curve into a smile, his interest was evident. The sharks circling around him also kept their eyes fixed on Livia.

“Come here.”

His indifferent voice called out to her, gesturing slightly for her to sit in front of him.

Livia stubbornly continued to glare at him and his sharks before reluctantly moving forward.

Were they really supposed to sit face-to-face like friends? She couldn’t fathom his intentions for asking her to come closer, which made her suspicious.

A strange, squishy chair she had never seen before enveloped her body as she sat.

What on earth was this? It vaguely resembled a jellyfish, but it didn’t seem alive.

“It took about three days.”

Startled by the voice interrupting her inspection of the chair, she looked up.

“You finished later than I expected. You seemed so confident; I thought it wouldn’t take long.”

Livia’s face, previously pale, flushed with anger at his words. It was infuriating to have her life-threatening ordeal dismissed as merely a delayed task.

Her chest burned with frustration and resentment, but having chosen this path, she could only grit her teeth in silence. A fervent wish to repay him with the same pain was deeply etched into her soul.

“You seem to have lost some weight from all the effort. I prepared something for that.”

Just as a mischievous smile appeared on his lips, he let out a low whistle.

The breath that escaped his lips transformed into vibrations, spreading like waves.

Footsteps echoed from beyond the pearl curtain. It wasn’t just one or two people. Sensing something unusual, several nymphs entered, each carrying a large platter.



Livia’s eyes flickered slightly as she observed them.

‘Audike.’

The nymph who had taken her to the gods’ banquet was there. Audike seemed startled to see Livia too, but quickly set down her platter and disappeared in an instant.

The other nymphs did the same. Like well-trained soldiers, they swiftly completed their tasks and vanished without a backward glance.

In the end, all that remained was a table laden with food from the land. Livia looked at Triton with a hardened expression as she took in the sight.

“Eat.”

…Was he mocking her right now?

No matter how hungry she was, Livia didn’t want to eat anything for a while. She feared that if she did, she might throw it all up again.

As she absentmindedly touched her stomach, she was startled by the prominent, bony feel of her ribs.

Livia had never been particularly plump, but she hadn’t been this thin either.

In hindsight, it made sense.

Unlike before, she was relieved that she wouldn’t die even if she didn’t eat, so she really hadn’t consumed anything. Even though the witch’s Blood sustained her body, running and moving without food had naturally worn her down.

Despite having fallen into the world of the gods, she was still just a human.

‘And I don’t even know how long I’ve been unconscious.’

Considering that time, it had been a considerable period without food.

The bizarre trial had forced her to swallow something, but she had vomited it all up as soon as she escaped that strange space, so it couldn’t be counted as eating.

Indeed, the human body was inconvenient.

Swallowing a sigh, Livia glared at the food with irritation.

Watching her, Triton moved his hand. He cut the meat on the plate into smaller pieces, speared a piece with a fork, and offered it to Livia.

“Try it.”

His friendly voice only made Livia’s face harden.

…What was his game?

As he observed her wary expression, he reassured her by taking a bite himself, chewing with apparent satisfaction.

“I went to great lengths to bring in food from the land.”

Food from the land? Now that she thought about it, the table was filled with warm, roasted, and steamed dishes.

How could these items exist in their current state underwater? Judging by his efforts, it seemed the sea god had brought them himself….

Livia continued to eye him with suspicion. It felt odd for a man who had promised to put her through trials that made her wish for death to suddenly offer her a meal.

He looked at her with an ambiguous expression, neither smiling nor frowning. Leaning back, he reached out, and a white shark approached, offering its snout.

He casually petted the smooth skin beneath its fierce teeth. The sight of his long fingers gently scratching the jaw of such a fearsome predator was surreal.

After staring at him for a while, Livia lowered her gaze. The steaming food seemed excessively luxurious for a poor shepherd to consume.

Aromatic, thin soup, well-cooked meat, fresh vegetables, and various fruits…

Yet, Livia found herself momentarily afraid of this appetizing food. She feared it would rot and turn into something foul and maggot-infested the moment she touched it. Her body remembered the sensations from the trials.

Just the thought made her mouth taste bitter. The vivid memories of the dreadful textures and the screaming food made her stomach churn, but she gritted her teeth and endured.

However, considering her situation, food from the land was rare here. No matter how twisted her stomach felt, she didn’t know when she would have the chance to eat such food again. She couldn’t afford to weaken further, especially with the daunting task of facing that god with a body of steel.

‘…I have to eat. I need to eat to gain strength.’

Resolving herself, Livia picked up a fork with determination. She stabbed the food with the large fork, chewing and swallowing without even tasting it.

Fortunately, once it was in her mouth, she didn’t feel like vomiting. The food didn’t turn into nightmares either….

Silently relieved, Livia focused on her meal, chewing slowly to accommodate her weakened stomach.

She had to chew thoroughly.

She needed to muster strength. She had to gather enough strength to drive a golden dagger into the heart of that arrogant sea god.

Casting a chilling glance at the man before her, Livia quickly turned her head as their eyes met. She felt she wouldn’t be able to digest if she kept looking at him.

It was frustrating. Even underwater, she felt parched.

But asking for fresh water here was absurd. Requesting unsalted water in the sea would make even passing lobsters laugh.

Swallowing a sigh, Livia glared at Triton’s knee with displeasure. Why wasn’t he leaving? If he had something to say, he should just say it. He had tied her tongue so she couldn’t speak, yet….

“So.”

Perhaps sensing her dissatisfaction, he finally spoke after a long pause.

“When are you planning to attack?”

Looking up at him, she saw he was watching her with half-lidded eyes, as if he found waiting tiresome.

“It’s quite dull just waiting….”

A low laugh carried a bitter sneer. Livia Horn’s heart sank coldly. Her already absent appetite vanished completely. She felt she could no longer force herself to eat.

He regarded her as an intriguing toy. In his own dignified manner, he urged her to play with him. Her life was at stake in this game.

Of course, she knew how insignificant her life was to a ‘god,’ but she couldn’t shake the feeling of disgust. No one enjoyed being treated as a mere plaything, even by an absolute being.

Given that he despised humans, it must have been amusing for him to witness her struggle.

If that were the case, now was the perfect moment to strike, while he underestimated and mocked her.

After glaring at him for what felt like an eternity, Livia opened her mouth. Though no sound emerged, she mouthed the words silently.

I will definitely destroy you.

Triton squinted, attempting to read her lips, but he seemed to fail. Naturally, she had deliberately mumbled the words to prevent him from understanding.

“I can’t tell what you’re saying.”

He muttered irritably, tapping the floor deep in thought. As she pretended to reach for the food farthest from her on the table, she accidentally knocked a plate to the ground.

With a clatter, his gaze momentarily shifted in that direction.

In that instant, Livia swiftly changed her grip on the fork she was holding and thrust it forcefully toward his face.

“…Well.”

Livia grimaced as she glanced at her captured wrist. It seemed such an attack would not work. Clicking her tongue in disappointment, she heard him chuckle incredulously.

“Showing your intentions right away—how commendable.”

Her captured wrist felt as if it were about to be crushed. Livia groaned and struggled, but her resistance was futile. The more she squirmed, the tighter his grip became.

“Aiming for the eyes, quite cunning, aren’t you?”

He laughed, clearly entertained, and reached out with his other hand. His cold fingers cupped her cheek.

“We seem to have something in common.”

His rounded fingertips traced over her eyeball.

“In fact, I too…”

As he felt the shape of her eye beneath her eyelid, he whispered with a grin.

“…am aiming for your eyes.”

Livia felt a chill as she watched him lick his lips while staring intently at her eyes. The way he smacked his lips, as if savoring the thought, was grotesque.

‘Crazy sea monster.’

Livia trembled with humiliation, mouthing curses with her silent lips. This time, she enunciated clearly, hoping he would read her words. As expected, he laughed delightedly, having understood her meaning.

Laughing at insults—he was indeed insane. He had tied her tongue for lacking reverence, yet here he was, amused.

At the moment she glared at him with gritted teeth, he suddenly released her, pushing her back. Livia retreated as far as she could, quickly drawing the golden dagger from her wrist and aiming it at him.

He wiped his face with one hand, the laughter vanishing as his gaze turned cold again.

His blue eyes caught the edge of the golden dagger. The sharply gleaming tip seemed ready to pierce him, but it couldn’t get any closer. An invisible, powerful current was pushing Livia back.

“Yes, at least you should draw that dagger and aim for me. Something like this.”

Triton reached for the fork Livia had dropped. As if it had a will of its own, the object flew into his palm. The fork crumpled like a sheet of paper in Triton’s hand.



“…is utterly useless.”

He casually tossed aside the fork that had been bent in half and walked past Livia.

Just after brushing past her frozen form, he turned back and spoke.

“Please, don’t disappoint me. Move diligently. I can’t guarantee you’ll survive the second trial. So, shouldn’t you either kill me or ruin me before then?”

The expressionless face looking at her held a hint of contempt and boredom, which made Livia even more uneasy.

No, I can’t. This is a chance I’ve worked so hard to get.

It was because he looked down on her and found her interesting that she had even gotten this close to attack. But if his interest waned… she would likely be killed without mercy.

He might just rip out the arm where the golden dagger was hidden, and perhaps even her eyes that seemed to show some interest.

She hadn’t been awake long since passing the first trial, but her heart was already impatient. It felt as though she had to act immediately.

Livia gritted her teeth and glared at the arched passage where Triton had disappeared.

The crumpled fork lying at her feet, having lost its shape, seemed as pitiful as her own situation.



The witch hid within the black seaweed, staring at the radiant temple of Triton.

The sanctuary of the gods existed deep in the sea, yet it could rise like an island at any time.

It absorbed sunlight to store light, the seawater drifting around the sanctuary was as light as air, and it was the most secretive place, never fading.

A natural paradise beneath the sea, the mysterious and distant utopia that humans longed for.

Atlantis.

The witch’s purple eyes, gazing at it, sank deeply.

‘That place should have been mine.’

She had wanted to become the owner of that beautiful temple. She thought she could. No, she believed she should, naturally.

But Triton not only ignored and trampled her; he tore her apart and cast her into Rubedike’s labyrinth. Just for being greedy, Echidna was pushed into a wretched state, into a darkness reminiscent of an end.

Wasn’t it said by his old followers?

That it was a generous act since he didn’t kill her? No, it was a fate worse than death, the most terrible end. Echidna lost everything that made her shine.

And so, all she could rely on was Medusa’s Blood running through her veins, Hecate’s magic, and the mercy of the goddess she had worshipped for so long.

“Even a very small clue is fine; please tell me the fate of Triton, who shares my Blood.”

“Anything is fine! Even the tiniest thread, please, please…!”

Recalling the past, Echidna’s wrinkled chin trembled. As she ran a powerless hand over her face, her ragged skin scraped against her palm.

Hiding among the worthless seaweed, this pitiful state felt truly miserable. It was indescribably wretched and filled her with resentment.

When her bloodshot eyes glared at the sanctuary, a transparent jellyfish fluttered over from afar and circled around her.

“You’ve come!”

As Echidna reached out with a relieved smile, the jellyfish slowly climbed onto her hand.

Two of the jellyfish’s more than twenty tentacles pierced Echidna’s eyes. A green light shone brightly from her trembling gaze.

Through her closed eyes, all the sensations this small creature saw and felt with its 24 eyes were transmitted directly to her.

‘…Fortunately, that human woman is still alive.’

As she scanned the information the jellyfish provided, Echidna opened her eyes with relief. It would be a lie to say she hadn’t hoped, but she had also considered the possibility of failure.

The red-haired human shedding tears would split the heart of the sea in two.

The goddess Tyche had only mentioned a red-haired human woman, without providing any clues. This meant she couldn’t be sure if the red-haired woman she spoke of was the same human she had picked up.

But Echidna trusted her instincts.

“Goddess of vengeance, I pray with this woman’s life as a sacrifice; please let this poor shepherd avenge her enemy!”

Her eyes shone purely with madness, her desperate cries filled with the courage to not fear her.

Even if she wasn’t the woman Tyche spoke of, those eyes that seemed capable of doing anything were quite trustworthy.

Thus, today, Echidna’s belief turned into certainty. The fact that the human woman stayed by Triton’s side was proof of that.

However, what puzzled her was how that human woman managed to remain by his side.

When that clumsy attack was blocked and she was captured by Triton, that human woman was definitely dead. She hadn’t seen it with her own eyes, but she felt it for sure.



Echidna rubbed the black scar connected to Livia. She knew the golden dagger had left this world.

But as she had promised that woman, there was a way to bring her back. It wasn’t easy, but the ‘helper’ there would assist her.

Echidna, who had watched the storm Triton raised from afar, waited to pick up the abandoned human corpse once he left.

But when the storm subsided, there was nothing left— not even the human corpse.

‘Why? Did he take the corpse to get the golden dagger?’

But it was unnecessary.

If he wanted the dagger, he could have simply cut off the arm. Or, using divine power, he might have tried to break the imprint on the soul and take it. Of course, whichever method was used, the golden dagger would have returned to Echidna.

Triton took the human woman’s corpse. Not only that, it was confirmed that he still kept her alive.

Why was that? Human, what method did you use?

The effects of her Blood must have vanished from that body that died and came back to life, so how was it possible for her to remain in that palace with just a normal human body?

No matter how much she pondered, there was only one answer.

‘Triton accepted her. That red-haired woman.’

Echidna’s wrinkled lips slowly curled into a smile. Huddled among the seaweed, she burst into silent laughter.

My intuition was right! That woman was definitely the human Tyche mentioned!

If that was the case, the only thing left was Triton’s downfall.

Triton.

Triton.

Oh, Triton!!

“Hehehe, hehehaha! That damned fool! Hahaha, hehe! Hahaha!”

Her coarse laughter, which scratched at her throat, was hard to distinguish from sobbing. The witch buried her face in her hands, laughing uncontrollably before suddenly starting to cry.

“Boohoo! Wahh! Hic, hick! Hic… hick…”

Poor Echidna. How did it come to this?

She only wanted one thing.

Wasn’t she also a descendant of the great god? Her father was born holding a golden dagger.

With the greatness that flowed through her bloodline, she thought there was no reason she couldn’t hold a piece of the sea.

And so, she believed there was no reason she couldn’t stand beside that radiant man.

She acted because she wanted it, and because she was desperate, her actions were just a bit hasty.

Weren’t the gods just rolling around anyway? Why was it wrong to desire him, and why did it make her so miserable?

Damn gods!

It was absurd that when they violated and took humans, it was nothing, but as soon as the roles were reversed, it became a sin.

From the moment she was rejected by Triton, they pushed her down this far because her greed was deemed disgusting! Truly selfish beings, those gods.

It wasn’t just Triton who made Echidna this way.

“Selene!”

When Echidna’s limbs were torn apart, it was the goddess of the moon who stripped her of her beauty and turned her into an eternal old woman.

Therefore, Echidna’s revenge was not limited to Triton alone.

I won’t let myself fall alone. If I’m to be called vile, then you should also learn what vileness truly is.

“Echidna, why shouldn’t we have it?”

When she wandered in darkness worse than death, the place she reached was the bottom of the underworld.

The reason why those lost in the labyrinth never returned.

It was because the end of the labyrinth was connected to the cesspool of Tartarus. The one who pulled her up, who should have become nourishment for hell, was her father, who had long departed in death.

“Doesn’t the Blood of the father god flow in us? My mother didn’t die because she defiled the temple of the goddess Athena.”

The old man whispered to his daughter, whom he had pulled up from the pit of Tartarus.

“It was because she was weak.”

Echidna deeply agreed with her father’s words. Perhaps fate also desired Triton’s downfall.

The fact that she met her father in hell and returned might have been for that very reason.

If that’s the case, then I must follow.

If that’s the case…

Then I shall gladly bring down the most beautiful and strong one in the sea.

Echidna rubbed her reddened eyes, bit her finger, and spat it out with a “ptooey.”

As soon as the finger fell away from her, it began to wriggle and crawl across the floor.

Before long, the finger turned black, elongated, and transformed into a beautiful black snake with iridescent eyes, lifting its head.

Echidna’s grandmother was said to be so beautiful that she caught Poseidon’s eye. However, because she defiled a goddess’s temple while making love, only she was cursed.

Thus, her grandmother’s most prized possession, her beautiful hair, turned into snakes, and she returned to her sisters in a hideous form. Unlike her immortal sisters, her grandmother, who was destined to die, was sacrificed by a hero and left this world forever.

Echidna’s father was born from that very Blood. Her grandmother’s sisters personally described that moment to Echidna.

Was it her grandmother’s influence?

Echidna was born with a snake’s tail, could understand the language of snakes, and was skilled in handling them. It was also said that she inherited her grandmother’s enchanting beauty.

Perhaps she even shared that tragic fate.

Go, my dear child. Go and help that poor human.

As Echidna whispered, the snake shook its head and then slithered into the ground. The old woman, with her dim eyes, gazed at the radiant golden castle.

The light streaming from the castle seeped into her dead eyes, but it was soon swallowed up by that evil darkness and disappeared.

Echidna remained buried among the seaweed for a long time, never leaving her place.



A massive wave split the sea.

The wave, draped like a skirt with white foam, swelled with the power of the wind, creating a giant mountain over the endless expanse of the sea.

The rising wave gathered into a circle, forming a castle.

The sight of the castle of waves forming over the vast, untouched blue sea was truly overwhelming and even seemed sacred.

Unfortunately, there were no humans with the privilege of witnessing that magnificent sight. Only the gods above the clouds could glance at the castle of waves with admiration.

It was a gathering of the sea’s guardians.

Triton and lesser gods from various regions gathered, busily discussing and concluding their meetings. Since they had territories to oversee, they couldn’t stay away for long and dispersed after handling the agenda before sunset.

Matters like fights between some species, the increase in salinity, human intrusion, or the extinction of specific sea creatures were trivial issues that didn’t necessarily require Triton’s intervention.

Unless it concerned the Aegean Sea, where Triton resided, the affairs of distant seas were left to the autonomous authority of those who governed them.

He simply lay in the seat of honor, listening to their discussions, and if there was nothing that threatened the safety of the entire sea, he respected the meeting with his silence.

The meeting seemed to be ending smoothly, as usual, until one of them dared to ask Triton a question.

“I heard you took in a human.”

It was Tartan, the god governing the eastern Atlantic. Being Triton’s brother and counterpart, they were very similar, but there were differences upon closer inspection.

For instance, the one facing Triton now had slightly darker eyes and a massive scar across his back. It was a scar he earned when he annihilated about a hundred naval ships engaged in mermaid hunting.

The navy of a nation that worshipped the god of destruction was indeed formidable, managing to leave a mark on his body. Though the cost was their complete annihilation….

“It’s nothing. Just a small amusement… No need to worry, Tartan.”

“Incidents arise from complacency. I don’t know what kind of amusement you’re indulging in, but I humbly request that you kill that human. It’s best to eliminate the seed of misfortune before it sprouts.”

…How dare you.

In an instant, the wall of waves surrounding the meeting hall froze. The sound of the previously relaxed discussion sank immediately.

Triton looked at the god before him with cold eyes. Even a light gaze from him was powerful enough to easily crush a god who ruled a side of the sea.

Truly a being born with a power most akin to the primordial sea… Some swallowed their unspoken admiration and averted their eyes.

Tartan gritted his teeth to withstand the pressure on him, but true to his upright nature, he didn’t stop his advice.

“Humans have always been useless to mermaids. Amusement can be found without humans, as much as you want….”

Crack.

The frozen wave developed a crack that seemed ready to shatter at any moment. Instantly, an even heavier silence descended on the hall.

In the tense atmosphere, where it seemed like the icy wall might crumble with just a drop of water, the man lying alone slowly sat up.

This was bad. If it continues like this, the meeting will be the least of our worries; the sea will overturn.

Dugong and Actius, who were guarding behind Triton, exchanged glances and tensed their bodies, ready to calm the storm in the hall if it erupted.

However,

“Come to think of it, I did like personalities like yours.”

“Yes, you are a god, one who lives an eternal life. Is a mere 100 days truly too precious for you?”

Triton, having just stood up, offered a slight smile. Bubbles began to form on the once-frozen walls of the waves.

“I find it more entertaining to deal with those who are fearless rather than cowards.”

“…Surely, you’re not afraid of a woman as insignificant as she is?”

Muttering to himself, he glanced at the lesser gods who were still watching him warily, then looked at the sky beyond the barrier of waves.

The wings of Astaroth, the god of twilight, had already stretched across the sky. The orange glow of the sunset blazed like someone’s hair. Eyes the color of emerald seas briefly flashed through his mind.

After gazing at the sky for a long time, Triton murmured softly, “The meeting is adjourned.”



The towering waves dispersed, and as the red twilight settled into a purple hue, a thick mist spread over the sea.

“…Strange.”

Actius, who was tidying up the area where the meeting had been held, rubbed his chin with a puzzled expression. Dugong turned back to ask, “What is?”

“He’s not one to hold back. Why did he restrain himself?”

At Actius’s words, Dugong rolled his eyes and tilted his head in confusion. “Hold back what? Who?”

“Who else would it be?”

“Uh…? So, are you talking about Triton?”

Actius looked at his colleague with pity, as if it wasn’t worth answering, and then muttered again in a serious tone, “Anyway, it’s odd. He’s not someone who holds back just because it’s bearable.”

At Actius’s words, Dugong suddenly widened his eyes as if he had realized something significant.

If there was nothing to provoke him, he could remain calm indefinitely, but if anything went awry, he would overturn everything without mercy. That was Triton and his sea. Given the atmosphere that had frozen the hall earlier, it wouldn’t have been surprising if a storm had erupted immediately. So why did he hold back?

“You’re right. He’s not the type to do that… What is it? Did he perhaps eat something bad like seaweed?”

“…Do you think Triton is like you? Picking up and eating random seaweed…”

“Then… could it be rotten clams?”

With his eyes and nostrils flaring, Dugong continued to spout nonsense. Shaking his head, Actius looked in the direction where Triton had disappeared.

An inexplicable anxiety gnawed at his heart. Why did he feel so uneasy and restless? The fact that someone who wasn’t known for holding back had done so meant there was a compelling reason for him to restrain himself.

The reason for his uncharacteristic restraint…

‘…Surely, it’s not because of that human woman?’

It seemed the most plausible reason, yet also the most absurd. Could it be that he stopped at a reasonable point to avoid drawing more attention to that human woman?

He tried to deny it, but recalling the initial reason for Triton’s irritation, it didn’t seem too far-fetched.

The chilling aura that erupted the moment Tartan mentioned the human woman was, in Actius’s view, an emotional disturbance even Triton hadn’t realized himself.

No, it couldn’t be. Surely not. Yes, I’m just overthinking it. The mind of a god is beyond anyone’s comprehension, which is why I’m imagining strange things.

As he shook his head to clear his thoughts, the mist in front of him blurred. Just as he was about to return to the sea, he stopped in his tracks.

Bang!

Something long and sharp sliced through the moonlight, flying straight toward Actius. He quickly reached out to catch the incoming weapon, but its immense force pushed him backward.

“What, what is this! An enemy?”

Dugong, startled by Actius’s outburst, flailed his hands and shook his head.

“Calm down, it’s nothing like that.”

Actius glared at the spear he was holding. It was unmistakably a symbol of the goddess Athena. There was only one person who could have launched this spear at him.

“…Oh my, is this your fiancée’s spear, Actius? Where on earth was it launched from? With this kind of force… is she nearby?”

That couldn’t be. If she had been nearby, she wouldn’t have just shot a spear. She would have surely come running to capture him. Since that wasn’t the case, she must have heard about today’s wave meeting from afar.

Actius lifted the spear with a stern expression and examined it. Upon closer inspection, bold black letters, like they were branded by fire, sparkled on the shaft.

On the night of the next full moon, I will bear your child.

…Sion, you damned woman.

Actius ran a cold hand over his pale face. Whatever was going through her mind, this girl was growing more audacious by the day.

“Hahaha! Isn’t this a declaration of war? Indeed, Sion! The most favored warrior of the goddess Athena!”

The spear plunged into the back of Dugong’s head as he laughed, oblivious to Actius’s turmoil.

Ignoring the massive Dugong’s body sinking into the sea with a groan, Actius quickly disappeared beneath the waves.

His worries about the human woman with red hair were completely forgotten due to his fiancée’s aggressive declaration of war.



After waking up from the first trial, Livia’s daily routine began and ended with chasing Triton. In fact, that was all she could do in this underwater world.

Before facing the next trial, she had to diligently pursue him. She had been allowed to stay by relying on the meager mercy and curiosity of the sea god, so she had to keep piquing his interest by any means necessary. Whether or not her ambush succeeded didn’t matter.

Once again, she searched for him all day, but for some reason, she hadn’t caught a single glimpse of his shimmering blue hair.

Where could he be?

She wanted to grab someone and ask, but everyone avoided her as if making eye contact with Livia would bring disaster. Moreover, since she couldn’t speak, it was even more frustrating.

With no other options, Livia crouched on the spire from where she could clearly see his dwelling. Resting her chin on her knees, she stared at his bedroom, recalling the events of the other day.

On that day, she had sneaked into his bedroom, determined to wait for him all day. Clinging stubbornly to the coral bedpost, she waited until he leaned defenselessly against the bed. Then she jumped at him, trying to slash his neck with the golden dagger. But the result was a dismal failure.

By mere seconds, he had effortlessly overpowered her.

“That was quite a decent attempt.”

Her body was flipped roughly, and her hair was seized by him.

“Have you been waiting for me here all day?”

His soft voice reached her ear as her neck was wrenched backward, making her gasp. His low laughter seemed to mock her.

The more she struggled to escape, the stronger the force pinning her down became. By the end, she felt as if her insides would burst again. Unconsciously, she panted and shivered. Remembering how she had died from the intense pressure, the pulse in her neck throbbed erratically.

At that moment, something happened that made Livia’s heart nearly stop. Triton sank his teeth into the nape of her neck.

Livia, who was panting, gasped and stifled a cry. The tension made her breath come even faster.

The fortunate thing was that, despite seeming like he would tear her neck apart, it wasn’t as painful as she feared. The unfortunate thing was that, because it wasn’t painful, she could feel the cool touch of his lips on her neck all too vividly.

“…Humans are indeed so weak.”

As if hesitating whether to bite or not, Triton slowly rose after gnawing on her neck.

Livia scrambled away from him, but her teeth ground with frustration. What was the point of bathing in the Styx if she couldn’t even defend herself, let alone attack! The spot on her neck where his teeth had marked her burned hotly.

She gritted her teeth, promising to try again, but the laughter sticking to the back of her head was humiliating.

Livia rested her forehead on her bent knees and sighed deeply. She wanted to become stronger, but time was short, and she didn’t know how. To make matters worse, she had to endure the trials he would impose, making time even more pressing.

As she chewed her lip in frustration, something rapidly approached her.

Having faced threats to her life several times, she instinctively sensed danger. Livia snapped her head up. Within her swiftly turning field of vision, she saw a black creature charging at her fiercely.

Startled, Livia’s eyes widened.

A black shark, Sympho.

Its gaping maw seemed poised to swallow Livia whole. Just as it was about to close in, the black shark suddenly stopped.



The sea predator halted right in front of Livia, locking eyes with her. Seemingly puzzled by her standing still and staring back without flinching, it circled around her once before stopping again, directly facing her.

I had thought sharks couldn’t stay still, but apparently, this one defied that common belief.

The shark and Livia stared at each other as if they were observing something strange. Each time the shark opened its mouth, its sharp teeth glinted menacingly. Just one bite from those teeth could easily split a small human woman like Livia in half.

However, if she didn’t have the courage to face a single shark like this, she wouldn’t have dared to confront the god of the sea. Livia focused her gaze and gave a clear command with her voiceless lips.

‘Go.’

You’re not scary at all.

There was no reason to fear a beast that obeyed its master’s orders. After all, that master had decided to let her live for now, so she had the implicit understanding that these creatures wouldn’t harm her.

Grrrk—

Instead of roaring, the shark spewed out a rough stream of bubbles. Then it brushed past her, nudging her body provocatively.

Of course, Livia didn’t hold back. She quickly extended her hands and pushed the shark hard, but the creature, weighing hundreds of kilos, didn’t budge, as if mocking her efforts. Instead, it pressed even closer, teasing her.

Her green eyes filled with determination. She changed tactics, struggling not to be pushed back by the shark. She reached her hand into the shark’s open mouth.

She felt the shark flinch, startled by her reflexive action. It seemed to sense that her skin was different from that of other humans.

Her body had been submerged in the River Styx. Unless a god stronger than the Styx tore her apart with force, no ordinary attack could penetrate Livia’s body. The same applied to the fingers she had placed inside the shark’s mouth.

“Hup…!”

She gripped the jagged teeth tightly, exerting all her strength. Her face turned red, and her heart pounded as if it would burst, but she didn’t stop applying pressure. Her jaw trembled from clenching her teeth so hard.

Annoying toothy fish.

She was determined to pull it out. If she couldn’t do that, she planned to break it somehow. At that moment, as she applied pressure, the triangular tooth shifted.



The shark seemed to feel it too, as it shook its body and suddenly surged upward with incredible speed.

Livia braced herself against the rushing current, using her other hand to grip another tooth to hold on. Her body swayed as if it might come loose at any moment, but she couldn’t give up now.

Even if it meant being eaten alive by this shark.

Crack.

Bit by bit, the tooth that had been loosening finally detached completely from the tissue. As she felt the rough, sharp tooth in her palm, a shiver ran through her entire body.

It was ecstasy. An overwhelming ecstasy that coursed through her whole being.

Livia laughed like a madwoman, clutching the shark’s tooth. She had only pulled out one tooth, but she felt as if she had defeated the shark, no, Triton himself.

In contrast, the shark, frustrated by the loss of its tooth, became even more aggressive in its biting. Just as it opened its jaws wide to finally swallow Livia, a white shark suddenly charged in and rammed into the black shark’s body.

Grrk!

The black shark stirred up angry bubbles, irritating the white shark’s nasty temper. However, the white shark remained unfazed. Called Neo, the white shark swiftly descended with Livia in its mouth.

To say it had bitten her would be inaccurate; it was more like it was simply holding her in its mouth. Its movements were so gentle, it was hard to believe it was a predator of the sea.

What, what is this, why are you doing this?

Livia was just as bewildered by the white shark’s sudden actions. Before she even realized what was happening, she was back at the spot from earlier.

At the top of the spire overlooking Triton’s dwelling.

As the black shark, having chased the white shark with fierce waves, attempted to ram into them, the white shark bared its teeth.

Grrrk!

The white shark, stopping the black shark in its tracks, pointed its snout somewhere. The black shark looked in the direction indicated by the white shark. Livia followed its gaze.

Triton.

The man, who had returned without her noticing, stood by the window, watching her.


“Humans have always been useless to mermaids. Amusement can come from many things, not just humans….”

…Was such amusement common?

Triton, feeling resentful about having his shark’s tooth plucked, thought of Livia as he watched the black shark floating belly-up in the air. It appeared so lifeless, like a dead fish, that it was almost pitiful.

With a small, ironic smile, Triton firmly dismissed Tartan’s earlier words.

No, amusement like Livia was not common at all.

How could a woman who risked her long and tedious life to brandish a dagger at a god for mere revenge, and who laughed joyfully while tearing out a shark’s tooth with her bare hands, be considered common?

That was why she was unique and why she was an intriguing presence.

Lying in the temple surrounded by elegant columns, open to the sea on all sides, Triton closed his eyes to sense the presence of the human woman.

She was the one who, just moments ago, had plucked out Sympho’s tooth and fled from his sight, yet she was undoubtedly lurking nearby.

Her sole purpose in the sea was him. That was why she never took her eyes off him. She focused all her senses on Triton and thought only of him.

How to approach him, how to pierce his heart, how to catch him off guard—those were her thoughts.

A woman who found him wherever he was and followed him, like a fry that never left its mother—a gaze so obsessive it never wavered.

Imagining the woman silently watching him with deep, swamp-like green eyes, Triton felt himself swell with desire.

To feel lust because of a human….

It was an absurd notion, yet it had happened.

For Triton, who as a god had little interest in carnal matters, this was intriguing.

For gods, ‘life’ was tedious. ‘Stimulation’ was the greatest pleasure in continuing that dull existence, and in that sense, ‘carnal relations’ were the quickest and most certain pleasure a god could experience.

Along with this, there was an unusually strong reproductive drive, leading to indiscriminate indulgence. The demigods and heroes born from such unions were in relatively good positions, but those born from the sea god’s seed were often treated as monsters and met tragic ends.

Because of this, Triton seldom indulged in lust. He felt that sowing his seed indiscriminately was a futile and worthless act.

Some gods saw Triton as an eccentric for this, and a few felt challenged to seduce him. Among them, Selene was the most fervent.

Yet here he was, reacting so easily to the gaze of a human who dared to see him as prey.

Unaware that he himself might be emitting an alluring scent, he was being watched by a prey that fearlessly targeted its predator.

Suddenly, his throat tightened. Triton licked his lips, focusing on the sensation of flowing with the currents.

The human woman was likely crouched and waiting nearby.

She wouldn’t know he had chosen to lie in the outer temple rather than submerge himself, making it easier for her to approach.

His slender nerves spread out and touched a corner of the temple.

…There you are.

Triton’s lips curled into a relaxed smile. Sensing the weak, small body hiding nearby after fleeing, he felt a sense of satisfaction, as if he were full without eating.

He decided not to rush Livia, choosing instead to wait for her to approach him.

The way she thought he was off guard and crept closer was so amusing to him.

She might think she was moving stealthily, but everything was in his grasp. The moment he saw her startled and trembling eyes was a delight he couldn’t miss.

However, an elegant beam of moonlight suddenly intruded into the temple, interrupting Triton’s secret enjoyment.

It was the arrival of an unwelcome guest.



The goddess, gliding in on a stream of moonlight, reached out to the man lying languidly.

His cool, pale cheeks, straight nose, and stubbornly set lips were exquisitely beautiful and radiant.

His sleeping form reminded her of her long-lost lover, Endymion, whom she had loved so much that she had trapped him in eternal slumber, cherishing and embracing him forever.

Since Endy was human, that was possible, but Triton was a god, making it impossible. Selene lamented this fact, but she had to accept it.

Still.

“We would make quite the fitting couple…. Why won’t you come to me?”

Selene caressed Triton’s cheek, her desire transparent. At that moment, the corners of Triton’s lips curled up, and through his slowly opening eyes, the calm sea was visible.

Grasping the goddess’s wrist, Triton whispered quietly.

“I didn’t call for you, so why have you come?”

…How insolent.

Selene smiled softly, her eyes curving with amusement.

She had many lovers, but never one who treated her with such indifference. The sea often swallowed the moon, so why did the god of the sea reject the goddess of the moon? It defied nature.

“Isn’t it about time your body started to desire?”

Selene whispered as she gently traced her fingertips down his firm chest. Cool and smooth, it was always so sensual that it made her mouth water.

Though she pretended to relieve his desires, in truth, it was she who was more eager.

Her pale fingertips glided over his rock-hard chest, down to his thick abs, and reached for the fierce and wild organ beneath.

A hint of lasciviousness appeared in Selene’s elegantly smiling eyes.

Triton, who had been watching her without a twitch, let a crooked smile spread across his face. In a somewhat annoyed tone, he whispered, “What should I do? I’m just not in the mood today….”

Her hand, which had been reaching for what should have been proudly  erect, stopped abruptly. She didn’t need to reach out to know. Triton was not aroused at all. In fact, he seemed visibly irritated by her touch.

The goddess’s expression turned cold in an instant.

“…You’re always too cheeky, Triton.”

“I only said I’m not interested because I’m not. What’s wrong with that?”

His words, which mercilessly shattered Selene’s pride, made her eyes grow cold.

“I’m only patient for so long.”

She was by no means a minor deity. She was close to the twelve Olympian gods and another wife of Zeus. She shouldn’t be treated this way. Even though Poseidon had stepped back, Triton had yet to surpass Poseidon’s legacy.

It was infuriating that such a youngster scorned her so, and yet, it was ridiculous that she still desired him despite that.

“…Well, thank you very much for that.”

Triton rose sluggishly, brushing back his cascading hair, and coldly muttered. His voice was full of irritation and annoyance, leaving Selene increasingly bewildered.

He had never pushed her away like this before. Though he usually accepted her reluctantly, Triton and Selene had maintained a relatively amicable relationship.

…So why was everything different today?

“Does the noble goddess really need to humble herself over this? Just let it go, Selene. Turn your back on someone like me.”

With a cold voice, Triton nonchalantly scratched at the goddess’s pride.

“If you can, of course.”

Provoked by his challenge, which implied she couldn’t possibly do so, the goddess quietly seethed. In response, a fierce energy shook the sea.

The fierce aura of the goddess caused icy moonlight to pour into the temple like rain. The blade-like moonlight slashed through the temple with a resounding noise, but Triton merely sat and calmly gazed at Selene.

The sea, which had been quietly settled, momentarily stirred, but that was all. Selene quickly regained her cold demeanor, stepped back, and spoke.

“The moon and the sea are naturally drawn to each other. It’s foolish to deny it. Why go against the natural order?”

“When chaos and love were born at the dawn of time, and the earth, sea, and sky came into being, it was merely a set law. A law is just a law; there’s no need to invest feelings into it.”

The goddess stared at Triton for a moment, then abruptly turned her head and retreated. The moonlight that had been rippling beneath the waves withdrew. As if she had taken even the original moonlight with her, only pitch-black darkness remained.

A profound silence settled into the darkness. The temple, devoid of even a single small fish, was eerily quiet.

With his arms resting on his knees, Triton, perched on the bed, suddenly let out a soft laugh and whispered, “How long do you plan to keep spying?”


Livia hid beneath Triton’s temple, holding her breath. From her experience, the god of the sea was more sensitive and perceptive than one might expect. He was a man who never let his guard down.

‘But today, I must.’

The thrill from pulling out the shark’s tooth hadn’t subsided. With that kind of determination, she felt she could accomplish anything.

As Livia cautiously lifted her head, moonlight shattered through the sea, and an exceedingly beautiful woman glided into the temple.

Livia’s eyes widened.

‘The goddess of the moon…?’

She remembered seeing her at the banquet where she had approached Triton, so it wasn’t hard to recall.

Back then, they seemed like a loving couple. Seeing the goddess approach the bed where Triton lay without hesitation, Livia’s suspicions seemed confirmed.

The goddess slid gracefully towards Triton and gently leaned against his bed. Her gaze, as she quietly watched Triton’s face, was filled with tenderness, and the way she caressed his cheek was as if she were handling something precious.

How could she look at that man with such sweet eyes? Could it be that she loved him?

Well, he was indeed a man whose appearance alone could make anyone fall in love. And the same went for the goddess of the moon.

Being gods, they wouldn’t belittle each other, nor would they have any reason to hate one another, so just seeing each other’s faces would be enchanting for them.

There seemed to be no reason why these beautiful beings wouldn’t fall for each other.

And as if to confirm Livia’s suspicions, she saw the goddess’s pale hand grasp Triton’s cheek. The goddess slowly closed her eyes and leaned towards his lips. Her radiant golden hair cascaded over the face of the sleeping man.

Livia thought she should look away. Even though she was waiting for the chance to ambush, this was not a sight she wanted to see.

It was confusing that, despite not wanting to watch, she found it hard to look away….

At that moment, Triton, who had been lying still with his eyes closed, suddenly opened them and spoke to Selene.

‘…What is he saying?’

Was he whispering sweet nothings? Even though she was quite close, she couldn’t hear their voices.

Seeing Triton and Selene exchange tender words made Livia’s slowly calming mood plummet further. As she tried to understand this feeling, Livia soon realized what it was.

Confusion.

To her, gods were nothing short of ‘monsters.’ Beings or entities of a completely different dimension, lacking any ‘human’ traits.

Thus, Livia assumed they wouldn’t know love. Didn’t legends and rumors often depict divine love as poison or a curse? Like something that would ultimately destroy them.

Yet, seeing the loving gaze as they whispered sweet nothings made it seem as if they, too, could love something, just like humans.

‘That’s impossible.’

They weren’t human.

So naturally, human emotions weren’t something they possessed. Hadn’t Triton tried to kill her and cause her trouble without hesitation? Without any guilt or remorse.

‘But… don’t animals love too? Mumu loves me, doesn’t she? So isn’t it narrow-minded to think that ‘human’ emotions are exclusive to humans? If humans were truly made in the image of gods, then surely gods could feel all the emotions humans do.’

Suddenly, Livia grabbed her arm, which had broken out in goosebumps.

It was a useless thought, an unnecessary one. What did it matter if a man, who was contemplating how to torment her cruelly, could love or not?

It wouldn’t concern her love at all…. It didn’t bother her. She didn’t want it to.

As Livia bit her lip hard, she quickly shook her head to clear away the unnecessary thoughts.

She felt uneasy, as if she had seen something she shouldn’t have, and uncomfortable, like she was in a place where she wasn’t invited. A strange sense of urgency, as if she were falling into her own trap, also made her anxious.

It seemed today was not her day. Just as she thought she should quickly get out of there.

Bang!

A terrifying noise rang out. Startled, she turned her head to see the two, who had been so close just moments before, now glaring at each other from a distance.

‘What happened? Why suddenly…?’

But before she could observe further, Selene disappeared. Just as she had descended with the moonlight, she vanished into thin air.

As if she had taken the moonlight she brought with her, darkness descended upon the temple.

Pitch-black darkness, heavy silence.

It was so quiet that she feared even a wrong breath might release a bubbling sound of air. Just as she thought she would have to endure this position indefinitely.

“How long do you plan to keep spying?”

Suddenly, Triton’s voice echoed through the air.

Livia’s heart, which had been frozen in fear, sank to the pit of her stomach. She hadn’t heard any of their conversation, yet now his voice was as clear as if he were whispering right next to her ear.

‘…Have I been caught?’

Livia stayed rigid, unable to breathe. Her mind, which had been functioning perfectly, went blank.

How did he know, and since when? Could he just be guessing? Being sensitive to his surroundings, he might have sensed something amiss and said it on a whim. No, she hoped that was the case.

Thump, thump, thump, thump.

She feared that the sound of her heart pounding as if it might burst would be heard outside. As she pressed her chest with her fist to steady herself, Triton’s faint laughter suddenly reached her ears.

“I see. No one is there.”

…So, he was just testing the waters? She almost let out a sigh of relief but managed to bite her lip and hold it in.

However, even as she felt relieved, a sense of unease lingered. A creeping anxiety whispered in her ear.

‘But really, could he not sense my presence? Especially when I’m this close?’

She gnawed at the inside of her cheek, contemplating. Given the situation, would it be better to just confront him directly?

Just then, she noticed a swarm of glowing jellyfish approaching from afar.

One, two, three, four….

The temple, now surrounded by dozens of jellyfish, was no longer dark. Instead, it was enveloped in a soft glow, creating a mysterious atmosphere. Livia, who had been staring blankly, finally snapped back to her senses.

The temple was eerily quiet. The silence heightened the tension. Livia relied on the light from the drifting jellyfish to look back.

The glow illuminated the silhouette of a man sitting by the bed. Triton, who had been silent, exhaled softly and lifted his head. She could see his arm moving leisurely.

‘…What is he doing?’

As Livia squinted and observed the man, she suddenly gasped and covered her mouth in shock.



The man’s arm moved up and down, and his lips exhaled warm breaths….

He pushed aside his clothing and revealed his penis, which he grasped gently and began to stroke. Livia’s eyes widened in disbelief. Even from a distance, it was clear how long and thick it was, moving ominously under his touch.

‘What… what am I seeing?’

She knew she should look away from the obscene scene, but her body wouldn’t obey. She couldn’t tear her eyes away. Her stiff eyelids blinked slowly. Her breathing seemed to slow down, and her gaze remained fixed on the man’s hand gripping and moving his cock.

Haah.

The man’s soft breaths felt as if they were whispered right into her ear.

Strangely, even in such a situation, Triton remained beautiful. Holding and moving his thick cock didn’t make him appear vulgar. It was an unbelievably stunning sight.

Perhaps that’s why, despite her head spinning with heat, she couldn’t look away from his lascivious appearance.

Finding an excuse, Livia finally lowered her gaze. Her thighs trembled, and a subtle warmth rose from her intimate area, leaving her flustered.

‘I need to get out. I need to escape quickly.’

Like someone being chased, Livia turned around. Just as she was about to flee, something smooth and cold wrapped around her ankle in an instant.



Before she could even scream, she was dragged away. No matter how much she struggled, she couldn’t escape the chains of water. Realizing this, Livia’s eyes trembled violently.

“…Why, Livia.”

Hearing her name mixed with his languid breath sent shivers down her spine.

She, who was now thrown before him, sharply lifted her head to glare. As his previously closed eyelids opened, his bright blue eyes smiled at her.

“Where do you think you’re going when it’s just getting started?”

He deliberately stroked his ominously  erect cock right before her eyes.



Selene had been right. As she had said, Triton was slowly becoming heated.

Even when Livia returned from her trial and collapsed into his arms, when she tried to ambush him, and when he teased her with his voice, Triton’s dick stood firmly  erect.

Since he hadn’t been able to relieve himself properly each time, how pent-up must he have been?

Exhaling slowly, Triton gripped his hardened cock and stroked it vigorously. The friction generated heat along the cool shaft, and sticky precum flowed down the bulging veins.

Using it as lubricant, he rubbed his dick a bit faster. His gaze remained fixed on the pale, terrified face of the woman dragged before him.

“You’d better not roll your eyes. Unless you truly want them plucked out this time.”

Triton felt Livia’s body trembling through the chains of water. With his eyes closed, he savored the anxiety and fear of the human woman that he could sense through the waves.

Tap, tap, tap!

As the sound of the shaking grew louder, the waves surrounding Livia’s body flinched even more. He opened his eyes slightly to look at the woman, and saw her pupils shaking in confusion.

Though her body was restrained, her head wasn’t forcibly held, yet she couldn’t take her eyes off him.

Thinking about what that meant made his back tingle. The fact that this stiff woman couldn’t look away from this chaotic act, that small surrender, whetted Triton’s appetite. He smiled seductively, gripping his increasingly erect cock more firmly and shaking it.

Ah, I shouldn’t get more aroused here…

If she saw his true form, she would surely be frightened. However, imagining the woman panicking and trying to escape also stirred his appetite. His lower abdomen throbbed once more.

Haah.

He let out a rough breath without restraint and licked his lips. The tip of his tongue, moistening his lips, caught the green eyes of the dazed woman, who then unconsciously moved her lips as if they were following him. It was probably an unconscious movement. But seeing her red tongue and narrow mouth cave gave rise to sinister imaginings.

What if I put my cock in that trembling little mouth… A small mouth sucking on mine. Even a short fantasy like that made him feel the urge to climax.

“Ah, Livia.”

The opportunity soon presented itself. Seemingly reacting to her name, the woman blinked and turned her head sharply. Triton seized the moment, grabbing Livia by the nape and pulling her closer.

“What are you… Hmph!”

Her eyes filled with shock. The woman, who had inadvertently taken his cock into her mouth, glared at Triton with reddened eyes, struggling. Her honest gaze, as if cursing him, made Triton chuckle as he pressed down on her nape.

“Livia…”

With her nape subdued, the woman was forced to bend over and take Triton’s cock into her mouth. Saliva dripped down, making a mess around her mouth as she gagged and gasped. The fiery heat inside her mouth warmed the cool cock, creating friction.

Her tear-blurred eyes and face, stained with humiliation and confusion, were quite a sight. Her blazing green eyes were fixed solely on Triton. As always, they were incredibly provocative eyes.

Triton, inflamed by those sweet eyes, thrust his cock into her mouth without hesitation.

“Hoo! Huh, ugh…!”

Her mouth was so narrow and small that only half could fit in. It was frustrating. He wanted to push deeper. He wanted to thrust until he filled her throat and even her insides with his cock.

As his arousal grew, his violent nature emerged. What he had restrained and suppressed kept baring its teeth, urging him to bite into that slender thing.

Ah… No, I can’t. If I do, she’ll die again. How could he let such a satisfying plaything die so meaninglessly?

Triton scratched his parched throat with his nails, suppressing his rising nature. It felt like his cock, encased in those sweet lips, was about to melt away. It wasn’t easy to control his swelling penis that threatened to split.

Ah… Livia. Livia.

Breathing heavily, he moved the hand gripping Livia’s nape to grasp her hair. Livia’s eyes widened again as she panted and shed tears. Suppressing a laugh, he stroked her small head and whispered.

“You’re quite a sight like this.”

At his words, Livia’s eyes immediately filled with a murderous glint. Still crouched like a dog, she grabbed Triton’s muscular thigh and bared her teeth.

She applied so much force that the muscles above her jaw were visible. However, unfortunately for her, it had no effect on Triton.

Instead, that threat only aroused him more, making Livia pitiable once again. The cock he had barely been controlling began to swell a little more.

“Ugh, ugh…!”

Livia Horn gasped and opened her eyes wide. Her eyes, filled with fear as if she were seeing a monster, were so lovely and apologetic that he gently stroked her cheek. Then, the thrusting began immediately.

Thud, thud, thud, thud!

Triton relentlessly thrust into the narrow throat. Tears streamed down Livia’s face as she gagged, seemingly on the verge of suffocation. Her hands, which had been pushing against him, now clung to his thighs, begging for mercy.

“Ah… ugh…!”

The one struggling to breathe was the woman receiving him, yet it felt as though Triton’s heart might burst. If this hole was so hot, how electrifying would Livia’s lower parts be?

A shiver, like tiny thorns, started at the nape of his neck and ran down his spine to his hips at the dangerous thought. At that moment, his lower abdomen tensed, and the semen shot out forcefully through the urethra.



A surprised Livia tried desperately to spit out the organ she was holding in her mouth, but Triton didn’t allow it. Instead, he lifted her chin, making it easier for her to swallow as he remained inside her. He watched as the semen, forcibly filling her open throat, was swallowed down.

Ah, has he had such a satisfying climax recently?

Only then did he let go of the woman whose lips had burst and started bleeding. The panting woman fell back, covering her mouth with trembling hands, disbelief written all over her face. Her fiercely gleaming green eyes reflected a myriad of emotions.

Shock, fear, anger, frustration, despair… Triton delighted in reading the various emotions in her eyes. At this moment, it seemed even the ‘revenge’ that this human woman clung to so desperately had completely vanished from her mind.

There was only one thing reflected in those big eyes. Triton, just him. That wasn’t so bad. No. To be honest… it wasn’t bad at all; in fact, he quite liked it.

“Ugh… ugh! Ugh!”

The woman screamed in a hoarse voice. Although her words were incomplete, having lost her tongue, he could clearly feel what she wanted to shout at him from her fierce spirit alone.

Poor thing… it seemed her delicate throat, not protected by the river Styx, was all torn up. Remembering the feeling of her throat, which couldn’t properly accommodate him and only tightened desperately, his cock, which had briefly paused after lust, stirred once more. As his organ began to swell again at an alarming rate, Livia watched with terrified eyes and quickly pulled away.

With a crash, she fell off the bed and scrambled backward in a panic.

What should he do with that…

Should he let her go like this, or catch her again and finish the job?

Human women’s bodies were weak, but could she really handle him? Perhaps it was too much to take out his original form from the start. It would break her…

In the moment of brief contemplation, the woman began to flee frantically. Perhaps because of the satisfying climax, Triton, feeling unusually relaxed and leisurely, let out a rough laugh and muttered.

“That’s what you get for peeking recklessly…”

Something you can’t even handle.

As he watched the woman run away as if she had seen something terrifying, Triton let out a dry laugh. His cock, once again shamelessly hard, stood tall.

A lust ignited after so long wasn’t going to be quelled with just a few hand tricks. Though he wasn’t thrilled about having to climax alone without a place to thrust into, he didn’t want to dampen his current excitement.

He recalled the trembling green eyes and the small panting red lips over his tightly closed eyes. He wondered what the saliva inside that mouth tasted like, or how soft it was.

Triton’s wrist began to move wildly again.



A few days passed by powerlessly.

The shock of that day hadn’t faded, so Livia’s behavior became much more cautious than before. Especially, she stopped sneaking into his quarters without hesitation. In fact, since that day, she hadn’t come near him at all.

She observed him from a distance or approached slightly when he was surrounded by his subordinates. As a result, there was no significant progress. Anxiety pricked at Livia’s back, but the memory of the organ that had nearly torn her throat apart was still so vivid that it wasn’t easy to approach him.

Moreover…

‘How can I dream of rolling around in bed with him after being treated like that?’

Livia Horn awoke in shock, pressing her forehead with both hands. Even after waking, the dream’s memories remained vividly clear. She had been overwhelmed by him, feeling as though she was being pierced below. The sensation of a massive organ pushing into her groin was disturbingly real. As she cried and sobbed from the sudden pain, he unexpectedly grabbed her face and showered her with kisses.

“Livia, Livia….”

Even the voice sweetly whispering her name seemed utterly nonsensical. It was something that shouldn’t have happened. He had manipulated and mocked her, yet it felt sweet?

Was the shock so great that she tried to wrap it up even in her dreams?

She didn’t know. She didn’t even have the mental capacity to figure out why she had such a dream.

Livia, who had been sleeping curled up in the shadows of the castle wall, got up and plunged her face into one of the fountains scattered throughout the Atlantis palace.

The water, perhaps low in salt, felt somewhat refreshing. After repeatedly washing her face, she lifted her head.

Yes, she had to accept the situation by now. As things stood, it was disadvantageous. She needed to find a groundbreaking solution. She couldn’t possibly stand up to him like this. She would just keep being swept away by him.

Livia rubbed her face nervously and then slapped her cheek with her open hand.

Slap!

As the stinging sensation spread across her face, it seemed to bring her to her senses.

Don’t start whining already. There’s a long way to go.

Wasn’t the suffering she endured the price for aiming at Triton’s heart? She couldn’t choose trials and tribulations to her liking. So, this abyss-like confusion she felt towards him now should also be considered a kind of trial.

‘…It’s nothing.’

He could never be anything to her. Even if this insignificant body were to crumble under the trials, he wouldn’t be able to destroy her soul and mind.

‘You’re doing well.’

The water in the fountain reflected the face of the woman who silently mouthed her resolve. Her reddened cheeks and the forced determination in her eyes made her look pitifully tenacious.
